<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88225-0018 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.2-25-88.f2.A1017</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 53, No. 37 / Thursday, February 25, 1988/ Rules and Regulations<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF THE TREASURY</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Internal Revenue Service</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">26 CFR Part 1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[T.D. 8175]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Income Tax; Taxable Years Beginning After December 31, 1953; Limitationson Passive Activity Losses and Credits</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Internal Revenue Service, Treasury.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Temporary regulations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>This document contains temporary regulations relatingto the limitations on passive activity losses and passive activity credits.Changes to the applicable tax law were made by the Tax Reform Act of 1986.The temporary regulations affect taxpayers subject to the limitations onpassive activity losses and passive activity credits and provide them withthe guidance needed to comply with the law. The text of the temporary regulationsset forth in this document also serves as the text of the proposed regulationsfor the notice of proposed rulemaking on this subject in the Proposed Rulessection of this issue of the <T4>Federal Register.</T4></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>Except as otherwise provided in andSection; 1.469-11T,the temporary regulations are effective for taxable years beginning afterDecember 31, 1986.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Michael J. Grace of the Legislationand Regulations Division, Office of Chief Counsel, Internal Revenue Service,1111 Constitution Avenue, NW., Washington, DC 20224, Attention: CC:LR:T,(202) 566-3288 (not a toll-free call).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:</T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Background</ITAG>This document amends the Income Tax Regulations (26 CFR Part 1) to providetemporary rules relating to the limitations on passive activity lossesand passive activity credits (the ``passive loss and credit limitations'').The temporary regulations reflect the amendment of the Internal RevenueCode of 1986 (the ``Code'') by sections 501 and 502 of the Tax Reform Actof 1986 (Pub. L. 99-514, 100 Stat. 2233 and 2241), which added section469. Section 469 disallows the passive activity loss and the passive activitycredit for the taxable year.<ITAG tagnum="84">Scope of the Regulations</ITAG>These regulations provide general rules for applying the the passive lossand credit limitations.Section 1.469-1T contains rules relating to the disallowance of the passiveactivity loss and passive activity credit, the taxpayers to whom the passiveloss and credit limitations apply, the general effect of section 469 onthe treatment of items of income, gain, loss, deduction, and credit frompassive activities, definitions of essential terms (including ``passiveactivity,'' ``trade or business activity,'' and ``rental activity''), thetreatment of certain losses from oil and gas working interests, the applicationof the passive loss and credit limitations to C corporations (includingrules relating to the application of the material participation standard,the computation of net active income, and the application of section 469to affiliated groups of corporations filing consolidated returns), andthe treatment of spouses filing joint returns.Section 1.469-2T contains rules for computing the passive activity loss,including rules for identifying passive activity gross income, passiveactivity deductions, and portfolio income and related deductions, and rules(including rules pursuant to section 469 (1), (2), and (3)) requiring thatincome from certain passive activities be treated as income that is notfrom a passive activity.Section 1.469-3T contains rules for computing the passive activity credit,including rules relating to the identification of credits subject to section469 and the computation of the regular tax liability allocable to passiveactivities.Section 1.469-5T contains rules defining the term ``material participation''for purposes of section 469 and the regulations thereunder.Section 1.469-11T explains the effective date of section 469 and the regulationsthereunder and provides guidance under the transitional rule for lossesand credits from preenactment interests in passive activities.Future regulations will provide rules identifying economic undertakingsthat are treated as separate activities for purposes of section 469 andthe regulations thereunder (to be located in andSection; 1.469-4T), rulesrelating to the treatment of losses allowable under section 469(g) uponcertain dispositions of interests in activities (to be located in andSection;1.469-6T), rules relating to the treatment of certain ``self-charged''expenses and related income (to be located in andSection; 1.469-7T), rulesrelating to the application of section 469 to trusts, estates, and theirbeneficiaries (to be located in andSection; 1.469-8T), rules relating tothe application of the $25,000 allowance under section 469 (i) for passiveactivity losses and credits attributable to certain rental real estateactivities (to be located in andSection; 1.469-9T), rules relating to thetreatment of publicly traded partnerships under section 469(k) (to be locatedin andSection; 1.469-10T), and rules relating to the application of the passiveloss and credit limitations in the case of former passive activities andcorporations that change status from year to year, i.e., corporations thatcease to be ``personal service corporations,'' corporations that ceaseto be ``closely held corporations,'' and C corporations that become S corporations(to be located in andSection; 1.469-1T (k)).<ITAG tagnum="84">Significant Policy Issues</ITAG>I. Effect of Section 469 on Other Provisions<ITAG tagnum="81">A. Items of Income or Gain</ITAG>Section andSection; 1.469-1T(d)(1) provides that the characterization ofitems of income or deduction as passive activity gross income or passiveactivity deductions does not affect the treatment of any item of incomeor gain under any provision of the Code other than section 469. Thus, forexample, an item of capital gain from a passive activity that is treatedunder the regulations as an item of passive activity gross income is takeninto account in determining both the passive activity loss and credit forthe taxable year and the allowable capital loss for the taxable year.<ITAG tagnum="81">B. Items of Deduction</ITAG>Section 1.469-1T(d)(3) provides that, except as otherwise provided by regulations,a deduction that is disallowed for a taxable year under section 469 isnot taken into account as a deduction that is allowed for the taxable yearin computing the amount subject to any tax imposed by subtitle A of theCode. Thus, for example, if a deduction is disallowed under section 469for purposes of computing taxable income subject to income tax, the deductionis not taken into account in computing the taxpayer's net earnings fromself-employment for purposes of the tax on self-employment income imposedunder chapter 2 of the Code.II. Definition of Passive Activity<ITAG tagnum="81">A. Trade or Business Activity</ITAG>Under section 469(c)(1), an activity which involves the conduct of a tradeor business and in which the taxpayer does not materially participate isa passive activity. Section 1.469-1T(e)(2) generally defines the term ``tradeor business activity'' to mean an activity that involves the conduct ofa trade or business within the meaning of section 162.Under section 469(c)(6), the term ``trade or business'' may include, tothe extent provided in regulations, any activity in connection with a tradeor business, and any activity with respect to which expenses are allowableas a deduction with respect to which expenses are allowable as a deductionunder section 212. Although the Service is studying the possibility oftreating certain activities in connection with a trade or business andcertain section 212 activities as trade or business activities for purposesof section 469, these regulations do not so treat any such activities.<ITAG tagnum="81">B. Rental Activity </ITAG>Section 469(j)(8) provides that the term ``rental activity'' means anyactivity where payments are principally for the use of tangible property.Section 1.469-1T(e)(3)(i) provides that an activity generally is a rentalactivity for a taxable year if the gross income attributable to the conductof the activity for the year represents amounts paid or to be paid principallyfor the use of tangible property. In addition, an activity may be a rentalactivity if tangible property in the activity is held for rent and theexpected gross income from the activity will represent payments principallyfor the use of such property. Section 1.469-1T(e)(3)(ii) provides six exceptions to the general rule.The first exception provides that an activity involving the use of tangibleproperty is not a rental activity if, on the average, the period for whicheach customer uses the property is seven days or less. This exception willexclude from treatment as a ``rental activity'' most activities involvingshort-term use of tangible personal property such as automobiles, videocassettes,tuxedos, and tools, and short-term use of hotel and motel rooms. The rationalefor the ``seven-day rule'' is that a customer's use of property for sevendays or less generally will require the person furnishing the propertyto provide services significant enough to justify the conclusion that theperson is engaged in a service business rather than a rental activity.The second exception provides that an activity involving the use of tangibleproperty is not a rental activity if (a) on the average, the period forwhich each customer uses the property is greater than seven days but notgreater than 30 days and (b) significant personal services are provided.Thus, for example, a taxpayer operating a hotel will not be treated asengaged in a rental activity, even if guests stay for an average periodthat exceeds seven days, if significant personal services are provided.Section 1.469-1T(e)(3)(iv) provides that only services performed by individualsare treated as personal services. Thus, services such as telephone andcable television service are not taken into account. Section 1.469-1T(e)(3)(iv)(B)also provides that certain specified services, referred to as ``excludedservices'' are not taken into account. The excluded services are (a) allservices necessary to permit the lawful use of the property, (b) servicesin connection with the construction of improvements or in connection withthe performance of repairs that extend the useful life of the property,and (c) in the case of improved real property, the kinds of services commonlyprovided in connection with long-term rentals of high-grade commercialand residential property (e.g., janitorial services). The third exception provides that an activity involving the use of tangibleproperty is not a rental activity if extraordinary personal services areprovided by or on behalf of the owner in connection with making propertyavailable for use by customers. This exception applies even if, on theaverage, the period for which each customer uses the property exceeds 30days. Extraordinary personal services are provided only if the servicesare performed by individuals, and the customers' use of the property isincidental to their receipt of the services provided. For example, theuse by patients of a hospital's boarding facilities generally is incidentalto their receipt of the personal services provided by the hospital's medicaland nursing staff. In some cases, it may be difficult to determine whetherthe use of property is incidental to the services provided. The Serviceinvites comment on the extraordinary services rule. The fourth exception is for rentals incidental to certain nonrental activitiesof the taxpayer. This exception applies if (a) an insubstantial amountof rental income is derived from renting property incidental to an activityof holding such property for investment, (b) the rented property is lodgingprovided to the taxpayer's employees for the convenience of the taxpayer,(c) an insubstantial amount of rental income is derived from property thatwas recently used in a trade or business activity of the taxpayer and istemporarily rented, (d) the property is held for sale to customers in theordinary course of a trade or business and is in fact sold during the taxableyear. The fifth exception provides that an activity of making property availablefor use by customers is not a rental activity if the taxpayer customarilymakes the property available during defined business hours for nonexclusiveuse by various customers. Thus, operating a facility (such as a golf course)that is used by customers who would normally be characterized as inviteesor licensees rather than lessees or tenants is not a rental activity. The sixth exception relates to property provided for use in a nonrentalactivity of a partnership, S corporation, or joint venture in which thetaxpayer owns an interest. The provision of such property is not a rentalactivity if the taxpayer does not rent the property to the partnership,S corporation or joint venture, but provides the property in the taxpayer'scapacity as an owner of such an interest.III. Special Rules Treating Certain Activities as Nonpassive<ITAG tagnum="81">A. Exception for Certain Oil and Gas Working Interests</ITAG>1. <T3>Property unit to which exception applies.</T3> Section 469(c)(3)(A)provides that the term ``passive activity'' does not include any workinginterest in any oil or gas property which the taxpayer holds directly orthrough an entity which does not limit the taxpayer's liability with respectto such interest. Section 1.469-1T(e)(4)((i) applies this rule on a well-by-wellbasis. Thus, if a taxpayer owns a working interest in a tract of land,assigns the working interest in part of the tract to a partnership in exchangefor a limited partnership interest, and drills a well on the retained portionof the tract, the working interest exception will apply to that well. If,however, the partnership drills a well on the assigned portion of the tract,the working interest exception will not apply to the taxpayer's interestin that well.2. <T3>Entities that limit liability.</T3> Section 1.469-1T(e)(4)(v) providesthat an entity limits the liability of a holder of an interest in the entityonly if, under the applicable State law, the holder's potential liabilityfor all obligations of the entity is limited (as in the case of a limitedpartner or a stockholder) to a determinable fixed amount. Thus, the workinginterest exception may apply even if the taxpayer is protected againstloss by an indemnification agreement, a stop loss arrangement, insurance,any similar arrangement, or any combination of such devices.In addition, a partnership in which a taxpayer is a general partner istreated as an entity that does not limit the taxpayer's liability, andany working interest that the taxpayer holds through such a partnershipis treated as an interest in an activity that is not a passive activity.Thus, deductions from the working interest (including deductions allocableto a limited partnership interest of the taxpayer) will not be subjectto the passive loss limitation.Taxpayers should draw no inferences from these rules concerning the applicationof section 465(b)(4). If deductions and losses from a working interestare subject to limitation under section 465, then the provisions of section465(b)(4) apply without regard to the treatment of such deductions andlosses under section 469. As explained below, the regulations include rulescoordinating the limitations under sections 465 and 469.3. <T3>Effect of limited liability at the time economic performance occurs.</T3>Under andSection; 1.469-1T(e)(4)(i), the working interest exception appliesfor a taxable year to an interest in an oil or gas well drilled or operatedpursuant to a working interest that the taxpayer holds at any time duringsuch year either directly or through an entity that does not limit theliability of the taxpayer with respect to such well. Section 1.469-1T(e)(4)(ii)provides that notwithstanding the working interest exception a portionof the taxpayer's deductions from an oil or gas well will be treated aspassive activity deductions (and a corresponding portion of any gross incomefrom the well will be treated as passive activity gross income) if thetaxpayer has a net loss from the well, and economic performance occurswith respect to expenses deducted for the taxable year in connection withthe drilling or operation of the well at a time when the taxpayer holdsthe interest in the well through an entity that limits the taxpayer's liabilitywith respect to such drilling or operation. For this purpose, the term``economic performance'' has the same meaning as in section 461(h), withoutregard to the exceptions for recurring items or the spudding of oil andgas wells.Under this rule, the working interest exception may apply for a taxableyear to a well drilled by a partnership in which the taxpayer owns a generalpartnership interest that is convertible at the taxpayer's option intoa limited partnership interest. If, however, the interest is convertedbefore economic performance has occurred with respect to all items of deductiontaken into account by the taxpayer for the taxable year in connection withthe drilling or operation of the well, the working interest exception willnot apply for the taxable year to that portion of the taxpayer's net lossfor the year that is attributable to deductions for expenses with respectto which economic performance occurred after the conversion.4.<T3> Income recharacterization rule.</T3> If any loss for a taxable yearfrom an interest in an oil or gas property is treated under the workinginterest exception as a loss that is not from a passive activity, thenany net income from the property for any subsequent taxable year is treatedas income that is not from a passive activity. This rule is explained morefully below under the heading ``Income from oil or gas properties withrespect to which the taxpayer benefited from the working interest exception.''<ITAG tagnum="81">B. Trading Personal Property</ITAG>In some circumstances, the activity of trading personal property (suchas securities or commodities or other property of a type that is activelytraded) for one's own account has been treated as a trade or business.Even in those circumstances, however, the income or loss from the activityresembles portfolio income or loss in that it results entirely from theholding and sale of personal property. Accordingly, andSection; 1.469-1T(e)(6)provides that an activity of trading personal property of a type that isactively traded for the account of owners of interests in the activityis not a passive activity even if the activity is treated as a trade orbusiness.IV. Identification of Items of Deduction and Credit That Are DisallowedUnder Section 469Section 1.469-1T(f) provides rules identifying the items of deduction andcredit that are disallowed when any part of the taxpayer's passive activityloss or passive activity credit is disallowed for the taxable year. Inthe case of losses, the regulations generally provide that the amount ofthe disallowed loss is first allocated ratably among all of the taxpayer'spassive activities that have net losses for the year. Any loss allocatedto an activity is then generally allocated ratably among all passive activitydeductions from the activity for the year. In the case of credits, thefirst step is omitted; the disallowed passive activity credit is allocatedratably among all of the taxpayer's credits from passive activities.Taxpayers generally need not account separately for each item of deductionor credit disallowed under section 469. The regulations provide that separateaccounting is required if and only if separate identification of an itemof deduction or credit may affect the taxpayer's tax liability for anytaxable year. For example, if 40 percent of the loss from a passive activityis disallowed for the taxable year, and one of the deductions from theactivity is a loss from the sale of a capital asset, the taxpayer mustseparately identify 40 percent of that deduction as a deduction that isdisallowed for the taxable year. Separate identification of the capitalloss is required because the limitation on capital losses under section1211 applies after section 469 and, thus, the disallowance of a capitalloss (rather than an ordinary deduction) may affect the taxpayer's taxliability for one or more taxable years.V. Application of Section 469 to C Corporations<ITAG tagnum="81">A. Definition of ``Personal Service Corporation''</ITAG>For purposes of section 469, andSection; 1.469-1T(g)(2)(i) defines the term``personal service corporation'' by cross reference to the definition ofsuch a corporation in andSection; 1.441-4T(d). Those regulations generallyprovide that a corporation is not a personal service corporation unlessit is a C corporation and its principal activity is the performance ofservices in the fields of health, law, engineering, architecture, accounting,actuarial science, performing arts, or consulting.<ITAG tagnum="81">B. Effect of Net Active Income of a Closely Held Corporation</ITAG>Section 469(e)(2)(A) provides that the passive activity loss of a closelyheld corporation shall be allowable as a deduction against the net activeincome of such a corporation, and that a similar rule shall apply in thecase of any passive activity credit of such a taxpayer. Section 1.469-1T(g)(4)provides that a closely held corporation's passive activity loss for thetaxable year is decreased by the corporation's net active income for theyear.Section 1.469-1T(g)(5) provides that a closely held corporation's passiveactivity credit for the taxable year is decreased by the corporation'snet active income tax liability for the year. For purposes of this rule,a closely-held corporation's net active income tax liability is the regulartax liability that is allocable to the corporation's net active income,reduced by all credits other than credits from passive activities.Since net active income is computed by modifying taxable income, net operatingloss carrybacks and carryforwards to the taxable year must be taken intoaccount. Therefore, a net operating loss carryback which requires a closelyheld corporation to recompute its net active income and net active incometax liability for one or more years may also require a recomputation ofthe corporation's passive activity loss and passive activity credit forone or more years.<ITAG tagnum="81">C. Treatment of Affiliated Groups of Corporations Filing ConsolidatedReturns</ITAG>Section 1.469-1T(h) contains special rules for applying section 469 andthe regulations thereunder to an affiliated group of corporations filinga consolidated return for the taxable year (a ``consolidated group'').Under these rules, a consolidated group generally is treated as a singlecorporation for purposes of section 469 and the regulations thereunder.Thus, a single passive activity loss and passive activity credit are computedfor such a group. In addition, the status of each member of an affiliatedgroup as a personal service corporation or closely held corporation isthe same as the status of the entire consolidated group, determined asthough the group were a single corporation. In making this determination,and in applying the participation tests set forth in andSection; 1.469-1T(g)(3),only stockholders of the group's common parent are treated as stockholdersof the hypothetical single corporation.Section 1.469-1T(h)(5) contains rules for allocating a consolidated group'sdisallowed passive activity loss and credit among the group's members.Under these rules, the disallowed loss or credit is first allocated amongthe members of the group and is then allocated among the activities ofthe members under the general rules in andSection; 1.469-1T(f).Section 1.469-1T(h)(6) contains rules relating to intercompany transactions(within the meaning of andSection; 1.1502-13(a)(1)). These rules generallyare intended to attribute all items of income and deduction of all membersthat are attributable to an intercompany transaction to the activitiesof the purchasing member (within the meaning of andSection; 1.1502-13(a)).The Service invites comment on all aspects of the rules in andSection; 1.469-1T(h).<ITAG tagnum="81">D. Coordination With Other Provisions</ITAG>The Service recognizes that further rules are needed to coordinate section469 with certain other provisions applicable to corporations (e.g., sections381, 382, and 1502) and invites comment on these rules.VI. Treatment of Spouses Filing a Joint ReturnSection 469(h)(5) provides that in determining whether a taxpayer materiallyparticipates in an activity, the participation of the taxpayer's spouseshall be taken into account. Section 469(i)(6)(D) provides a parallel rulefor active participation. Section 469(1)(5) provides that the Secretaryshall prescribe such regulations as may be necessary or appropriate tocarry out provisions of section 469, including regulations relating tochanges in marital status and changes between joint returns and separatereturns. The Service believes that treating married persons filing a joint returnas separate taxpayers for purposes of section 469 would present undesirableadministrative difficulties, and that it is generally preferable to treatsuch persons as one taxpayer. In some situations, however, this treatmentwould frustrate the purposes of the passive loss and credit limitations.For example, the fact that one spouse holds a working interest in an oilor gas well through an entity that does not limit the spouse's liabilityshould not be taken into account in determining whether the working interestexception applies to any portion of the working interest that is held bythe other spouse. In addition, if two individuals cease filing a jointreturn, it is necessary for each individual to account for the deductionsand credits treated under section 469(b) as allocable to his or her passiveactivities. Accordingly, andSection; 1.469-1T(j) provides that spouses filing a jointreturn for a taxable year generally are treated for such year as one taxpayerfor purposes of section 469 and the regulations thereunder. For purposesof the working interest exception, however, married persons are treatedas separate taxpayers. In addition, if any deductions or credits are disallowedunder section 469, the disallowed deductions and credits attributable toeach spouse's activities must be separately identified. The Service invites comment on the treatment of married persons. VII. Definition of Passive Activity Loss Section 469(d)(1) defines the term ``passive activity loss'' as the amount(if any) by which the aggregate losses from all passive activities forthe taxable year exceed the aggregate income from all passive activitiesfor such year. In the interest of clarity, andSection; 1.469-2T(b) definesthe passive activity loss for the taxable year as the amount, if any, bywhich the passive activity deductions for the taxable year exceed the passiveactivity gross income for the taxable year. The rules in andSection; 1.469-2T(c) and (d) identify the items treated as passive activity gross incomeand passive activity deductions, respectively, for the taxable year.VIII. Identification of Items of Gross Income and Deductions From PassiveActivities The regulations state that, except as otherwise provided, all items ofgross income from a passive activity are included in passive activity grossincome, and all deductions arising in connection with a passive activityare passive activity deductions. The regulations do not require that anyparticular method be employed in determining (a) whether items of incomeare derived from an activity, (b) whether deductions arise in connectionwith an activity, or (c) how shared costs should be allocated among activities.The regulations contemplate the use of reasonable methods in making thesedeterminations, and the Service will disregard unreasonable determinations.The Service invites public comment regarding the desirability of detailedrules relating to these issues. IX. Treatment of Gain From the Disposition of an Interest in an Activityor Property Used in an Activity <ITAG tagnum="81">A. General Rule: Characterization of Gain at the Time of the Disposition</ITAG>Gain from a disposition of property used in an activity or of an interestin an activity held through a partnership or S corporation generally istreated as gross income from that activity. Except in the case of gainfrom a disposition of substantially appreciated property formerly usedin a nonpassive activity and gain attributable to such property from adisposition of an interest in a partnership or S corporation, such gainis passive activity gross income if the activity is a passive activityfor the taxable year of the disposition. For purposes of this rule, the gain recognized upon the disposition ofa partnership interest or S corporation stock is treated as gain from thedisposition of an interest in the activities in which the partnership orS corporation has an interest. Rules relating to the allocation of gainamong the activities of a partnership or S corporation and the treatmentof gain allocated to an activity that includes substantially appreciatedproperty formerly used in a nonpassive activity are discussed under theheading ``Dispostions of interests in partnerships and S corporations''.The Service recognizes that an approach that focuses on the character ofthe activity at the time of a disposition may in many circumstances appeararbitrary, and considered various other approaches. These approaches, includingapproaches taking into account the nature of the activity or the use ofthe property during the taxpayer's entire holding period, were rejectedbecause they are found to be equally arbitrary and substantially more difficultto administer.The Service invites comment on the rules relating to the treatment of gainfrom dispositions of interests in activities and interests in propertyused in activities.  <ITAG tagnum="81">B. Disposition of Property Used in More Than One Activity in the 12Months Preceding the Disposition  </ITAG>To ensure that the character of gain realized on the disposition of propertyreflects the use of the property for a reasonable period preceding thedisposition, andSection;1.469-2T(c)(2)(ii) requires the taxpayer to allocatethe amount realized on the disposition and the adjusted basis of the propertyamong the activities in which the property was used during the 12-monthperiod preceding the disposition. For purposes of this rule, the term ``activity''includes, e.g., personal use and holding for investment.  The regulations provide only that the allocation of amount realized andadjusted basis must be reasonable. Examples illustrate that an allocationamong activities is considered reasonable if it is based on the periodfor which the property is used in each such activity during the 12-monthperiod. These examples are not intended to foreclose the use of other reasonableallocation methods.  In recognition of the recordkeeping burden that this allocation rule mayimpose, andSection;1.469-2T(c)(2)(ii) also provides a <T3>de minimis</T3> exception under which the amount realized and adjustedbasis of property that was predominantly used in one activity during the12-month period preceding its disposition may be allocated solely to thatactivity if the value of the property does not exceed the lesser of (a)$10,000 and (b) 10 percent of the value of all property used in the activityat the time of the disposition.  The Service invites comment on the feasibility of the allocation requirementgenerally, including comment on allocation rules that may be helpful totaxpayers.  <ITAG tagnum="81">C. Disposition of Substantially Appreciated Property Formerly Usedin a Nonpassive Activity  </ITAG>The general rule characterizing gain by reference to the character of theactivity in which property is used at the time of disposition could, ifnot limited, encourage taxpayers to structure dispositions in a mannerthat generates passive activity gross income in inappropriate situations.Accordingly, andSection;1.469-2T(c)(2)(iii) provides that any gain from adisposition of substantially appreciated property is treated as not froma passive activity unless the property was used in a passive activity foreither (a) 20 percent of the taxpayer's holding period for the propertyor (b) the entire 24-month period ending on the date of the disposition.For purposes of this rule, property is substantially appreciated if itsfair market value is more than 120 percent of its adjusted basis.  <ITAG tagnum="81">D. Pre-1987 Installment Sales  </ITAG>In Notice 87-8, 1987-3 I.R.B. 11, the Service announced that, under theseregulations, gain recognized on the installment method would be treatedas not from a passive activity if, but for the use of the installment method,the taxpayer would have taken the gain into account for a taxable yearbeginning before January 1, 1987. This rule is inconsistent with a proposedtechnical correction to section 469, and is not included in these regulations.Moreover, the Service will not enforce the rule announced in Notice 87-8unless and until it is adopted in regulations under section 469.  X. Portfolio Income Excluded From Passive Activity Gross Income  <ITAG tagnum="81">A. General Rule  </ITAG>Section 1.469-2T(c)(3) provides that passive activity gross income doesnot include portfolio income, which is defined as gross income that isderived from specified sources (including interest, dividends, annuities,and royalties) and is not derived in the ordinary course of a trade orbusiness. Section 1.469-2T(c)(3)(ii) provides that, for purposes of thisrule, gross income is treated as derived in the ordinary course of a tradeor business only to the extent specifically provided in the regulations.That provision also specifically identifies certain types of income asderived in the ordinary course of a trade or business and provides thatthe Commissioner may similarly treat additional types of income as similarlyderived. The Service invites comment on and ruling requests relating tothe treatment of interest, dividends, annuities, and royalties as derivedin the ordinary course of a trade or business.  <ITAG tagnum="81">B. Characterization of Royalties From Licensing Intangible Property </ITAG>Section 1.469-2T(c)(3)(iii)(B) provides that royalties from licensing intangibleproperty may be treated as derived in the ordinary course of a trade orbusiness only if the person receiving such royalties either created theproperty or performed substantial services or incurred substantial costswith respect to the development or marketing of the property. Althoughthe determinations under this rule are generally based on all of the factsand circumstances, a person will be treated as deriving royalties in theordinary course of a trade or business if either of two quantitative testsare satisfied. The Service invites public comment on the appropriatenessof this rule and the need for additional guidance. In particular, the Serviceseeks comment on the quantitative tests.<ITAG tagnum="81">C. Mineral Royalties</ITAG>The regulations do not include special rules for determining whether mineralroyalties are derived in the ordinary course of a trade or business becausethe Service is continuing to develop criteria for making this determination.The regulations include only one example illustrating the treatment ofmineral royalties. This example, which follows from andSection; 1.469-2T(c)(3)(ii)(D),indicates that royalty income derived from royalty interests held in atrade or business activity of trading or dealing in such interests is treatedas derived in the ordinary course of a trade or business.Under andSection; 1.469-2T(c)(3)(ii), the only other mineral royalties treatedas income derived in the ordinary course of a trade or business are thoseidentified by the Commissioner. Therefore, unless and until these regulationsare amended, taxpayers may not treat mineral royalties (other than royaltiesderived from a trade or business of trading or dealing in royalty interests)as derived in the ordinary course of a trade or business without obtaininga ruling.Nonetheless, the Service believes that it may be appropriate to treat aportion of a mineral royalty payment as derived in the ordinary courseof a trade or business in some cases not involving a trade or businessof trading or dealing in royalty interests. Assume, for example, that royaltyincome is derived from an overriding royalty interest created on the transferof a working interest by a partnership engaged in the trade or businessof oil and gas development, and that the partnership is not taxed uponreceipt of the royalty interest. In such a case, it may be appropriateto treat the royalty payments, by analogy to sections 483 and 1274, asdeferred payments with respect to the sale of the working interest. Underthis approach, the portion of each royalty payment that represents considerationpaid to the partnership for the working interest would be treated as incomederived in the ordinary course of a trade or business, and only the interestelement in the payments would be treated as portfolio income. The Serviceinvites public comment on whether and how such distinctions should be made,and how depletion deductions should be allocated between portfolio andnonportfolio components of royalty payments.XI. Personal Service Income Excluded From Passive Activity Gross Income<ITAG tagnum="81">A. Payments to Partners for the Performance of Services</ITAG>Section 469(e)(3) provides that earned income (within the meaning of section911(d)(2)(A)) shall not be taken into account in computing the income orloss from a passive activity for any taxable year. Section 911(d)(2)(A)defines earned income in a manner that includes all payments to partnersfor the performance of services. Accordingly, the regulations provide,in andSection; 1.469-2T (c)(4)(i)(A) and (e)(2), that any payments to a partnerthat are described in section 707 (a) or (c) and represent compensationfor the performance of services are excluded from passive activity grossincome.The regulations do not, however, adopt the suggestion of some commentatorsto treat as personal service income the portion of a partner's distributiveshare of partnership income that represents the value of the partner'sservices performed on behalf of the partnership.<ITAG tagnum="81">B. Income From Retirement Plans</ITAG>Taxable distributions from pension, profit-sharing, and other retirementplans generally are comprised of compensation for past services and investmentincome. Both of these components generally are excluded from passive activitygross income. Therefore, andSection; 1.469-2T(c)(4) provides that personalservice income includes all income from such distributionsXII. Income From Section 481 AdjustmentsIf a change in accounting method results in an increase in taxable incomeunder section 481 (a ``positive section 481 adjustment''), the portionof the adjustment attributable to activities that were passive activitiesin the year of change is treated, under andSection; 1.469-2T(c)(5), as passiveactivity gross income. The portion of the adjustment attributable to anactivity is determined by allocating the adjustment among the activitiesthat would have given rise to a positive section 481 adjustment if a separatesection 481 adjustment were computed with respect to each activity, inproportion to such hypothetical positive adjustments.XIII. Income From Oil or Gas Properties With Respect to Which the TaxpayerBenefited From the Working Interest ExceptionSection 469(c)(3)(B) provides that, if a taxpayer has a loss for a taxableyear from a working interest in an oil or gas property that is treatedas not from a passive activity, any net income from such property for anysucceeding taxable year shall be treated as not from a passive activity.<ITAG tagnum="81">A. Pre-1987 Losses and Losses From Material Participation Activities</ITAG>Section 1.469-2T(c)(6)(i) provides that section 469(c)(3)(B) applies onlywhere a loss from a working interest arises in a taxable year beginningafter December 31, 1986, and is treated as not from a passive activitysolely by reason of the special working interest exception in section 469(c)(3)(A).Thus, the fact that a loss for a taxable year from an oil or gas well drilledor operated pursuant to a working interest was not subject to limitationunder section 469 will not cause income for any succeeding year to be treatedas not from a passive activity if either (a) the loss was taken into accountfor a taxable year beginning prior to January 1, 1987, or (b) the losswas not subject to limitation because the taxpayer materially participatedin the activity in which the loss arose.<ITAG tagnum="81">B. Definition of ``Property''</ITAG>Neither section 469(c)(3)(B) nor the legislative history defines the term``oil or gas property.'' Section 1.469-2T(c)(6)(iii) provides that, forpurposes of applying section 469(c)(3)(B) with respect to a working interest,the term ``oil or gas property'' means any oil or gas property the valueof which is directly enhanced by activities the costs of which are borneby the taxpayer as a result of drilling an oil or gas well with respectto the working interest. Thus, the definition of ``property'' in section614(a) and the regulations thereunder is not relevant for this purpose.The definition of the term ``oil or gas property'' for purposes of section469(c)(3)(B) is illustrated by three examples. The first example indicatesthat if the drilling of a well on one tract reveals that a single reservoirunderlies that tract and another tract in which the taxpayer owns an interest,the taxpayer's interests in both tracts are treated as part of the sameoil or gas property. The second example indicates that if a well is drilledthrough two formations, both formations are treated as part of the sameoil or gas property. The third example indicates that the mere fact thatdrilling activities generate information indicating the presence of oilor gas in a general geographical area is insufficient to establish thatthe value of oil or gas properties in such area is ``directly'' enhancedby the activities generating the information.XIV. Passive Activity Deductions<ITAG tagnum="81">A. General Rule</ITAG>Section 1.469-2T(d)(1) provides that a deduction is a ``passive activitydeduction'' for a taxable year if the deduction (a) arises in connectionwith the conduct of an activity that is a passive activity for the taxableyear or (b) is carried over from the preceding taxable year under section469(b). For purposes of this rule, a deduction is treated as arising inthe taxable year in which the deduction would be allowable if taxable incomefor all taxable years were determined without regard to sections 469 and1211. Thus, for example, if a partner's distributive share of a partnershipdeduction is disallowed under section 704(d) in 1987, but is not disallowedunder section 704(d) (or any other provision other than section 469 or1211) in 1988, the deduction is treated as arising in 1988.This rule has two significant effects. First, a deduction is not takeninto account in computing the passive activity loss and credit until thefirst taxable year in which the deduction is not disallowed by any applicablelimitation other than those contained in sections 469 and 1211. Second,the determination of whether a deduction from an activity is a passiveactivity deduction does not depend on the character of the activity intaxable years in which the deduction is disallowed under limitations otherthan section 469. Thus, in the example in the preceding paragraph, thedetermination of whether the partner's deduction is a passive activitydeduction in 1988 depends solely on whether the activity in which it arisesis a passive activity of the partner in 1988.Section 501(c)(2) of the Tax Reform Act of 1986 provides that section 469shall not apply to any loss, deduction, or credit carried to a taxableyear beginning before January 1, 1987. Consistent with the rule, andSection;1.469-2T(d)(2)(x) provides that an item of loss or deduction that wouldhave been allowed for a taxable year beginning before January 1, 1987,but for section 465, 704(d), or 1366(d), is not treated as passive activitydeduction.<ITAG tagnum="81">B. Losses From Dispositions</ITAG>Section 1.469-2T(d)(5) generally treats any loss recognized upon the dispositionof property used in an activity or of an interest in an activity held througha partnership or S corporation as a deduction from such activity. Rulesrelating to the allocation of loss among activities of a partnership orS corporation are discussed under the heading ``Dispositions of interestsin partnerships and S corporations.'' Under section 469(g)(1), the lossfrom a disposition may be treated in whole or in part as a loss that isnot from a passive activity. Future regulations will provide rules fordetermining when a loss is treated under section 469(g)(1) as not froma passive activity.<ITAG tagnum="81">C. Coordination With Sections 465, 704 (d), and 1366(d)</ITAG>Since, for purposes of section 469, a deduction is not treated as arisingin a taxable year in which it is disallowed under section 465, 704(d),or 1366(d), rules are needed to determine which deductions are disallowedfor the taxable year under such sections. Section 1.469-2T(d)(6) providessuch rules.Under andSection; 1.469-2T(d)(6), if section 465, 704(d), or 1366(d) disallowsall or any part of the taxpayer's loss attributable to an activity (withinthe meaning of section 465), or to an interest in a partnership or S corporation,as the case may be, a portion of each deduction taken into account in computingsuch loss is disallowed. To the extent the regulations under those provisionsare not consistent with the rules in andSection; 1.469-2T(d)(6), the Serviceexpects that such regulations will be amended.The regulations do not include any other rules coordinating section 469with other limitations on losses and deductions. The Service invites commenton the the need for additional coordination rules.XV. Special Rules for Partners and S Corporation Shareholders<ITAG tagnum="81">A. In General</ITAG>The determination of whether an item of income or deduction from a partnershipor S corporation is an item of passive activity gross income or a passiveactivity deduction, respectively, is made by reference to the taxpayer'sparticipation in the activity that generated the item of income or deduction.Section 1.469-2T(e)(1) provides that, in the case of items of income, gain,loss, and deduction from an activity conducted through a fiscal year partnershipor S corporation, the taxpayer's participation is determined for the entity'staxable year. The Service invites comment on the application of this rule.<ITAG tagnum="81">B. Certain Payments to Partners</ITAG>Section 1.469-2T(e)(2)(i) provides that items of gross income and deductionattributable to a transaction between a partner and a partnership shallbe characterized for purposes of section 469 in a manner consistent withthe treatment of such transaction under section 707(a). Section 1.469-2T(e)(2)(ii)provides that a payment to a partner for the performance of services orthe use of capital, if described in section 707(c) or section 736(a)(2),is generally characterized for purposes of section 469 and the regulationsthereunder as a payment of compensation for services or interest, as thecase may be, and not as a distributive share of partnership income. TheService expects that a conforming amendment will be made to andSection; 1.707-1.In addition, andSection; 1.469-2T(e)(2)(iii) provides that any gain or losstaken into account by a retiring partner or a deceased partner's successorin interest as a result or a deceased partner's successor in interest asa result of a payment under section 736(b) is treated a passive activitygross income or a passive activity deduction only to the extent that thegain or loss would have been treated as passive activity gross income ora passive activity deduction if it had been recognized at the time thatthe liquidation of the retiring or deceased partner's interest commenced.<ITAG tagnum="81">C. Dispositions of Interests in Partnerships and S Corporations</ITAG>In general, for Federal income tax purposes, a disposition of an interestin a partnership or S corporation (a ``passthrough entity'') is treatedas a disposition of such interest, rather than as a disposition of an interestin each of the entity's assets. The Service believes that the accuratemeasurement of passive activity gross income and deductions would be furtheredby requiring such a disposition to be treated as a disposition of an interestin the passthrough entity's assets. The regulations nonetheless have notadopted this approach as the general rule because a reasonably accuratemeasurement of passive activity gross income and deductions generally maybe accomplished by allocating the gain or loss from the disposition ofan interest in a passthrough entity among the entity's activities.Section 1.469-2T(e)(3) contains rules governing the treatment, for purposesof the passive loss and credit limitations, of a disposition of an interestin a passthrough entity by a holder of such an interest (the ``holder'').A transitional rule also is provided.The general rule, contained in andSection; 1.469-2T(e)(3)(ii), requires aholder's gain or loss from a disposition of an interest in a passthroughentity (including gain or loss recognized under section 731(a)) to be allocatedamong the activities of the passthrough entity in proportion to the amountsof gain or loss, respectively, that would have been allocated to the holderby the passthrough entity with respect to each of the entity's activitiesif the entity had sold its interests in such activities on the applicablevaluation date. Generally, the passthrough entity may select either thebeginning of the taxable year of the passthrough entity in which the holder'sdisposition occurs or the date of such disposition as the applicable valuationdate. The date of the holder's disposition of an interest in the passthroughentity must be used as the applicable valuation date, however, if sincethe beginning of the entity's taxable year the entity has sold a significantamount of the property used in any activity or the holder has contributeda significant amount of substantially appreciated or substantially depreciatedproperty to the passthrough entity. For purposes of this rule, propertyis substantially appreciated if its fair market value exceeds 120 percentof its adjusted basis, and property is substantially depreciated if itsadjusted basis exceeds 120 percent of its fair market value.Under andSection; 1.469-2T(e)(3)(iii), gain from a holder's disposition ofan interest in a passthrough entity that is allocated to a passive activityunder the general rule will nonetheless be treated as gain that is notfrom a passive activity if (a) gain that would be treated as gain thatis not from a passive activity under andSection; 1.469-2T(c)(2)(iii) wouldhave been allocated to the holder if all of the property used in the activityhad been sold, and (b) the amount of that gain exceeds 10 percent of theholder's gain from the disposition that is allocated to the activity underthe general rule. This rule is designed to prevent taxpayers from usingpassthrough entities to structure dispositions of property in a mannerthat generates passive income in situations where such income would otherwisebe treated as not from a passive activity under andSection; 1.469-2I(c)(2)(iii).Section 1.469-2T(c)(3)(iv) provides a transitional rule for dispositionsof interests in a passthrough entity that occur during any taxable yearof the entity beginning prior to February 19, 1988. Under this transitionalrule, gain or loss from a qualifying disposition of an interest in theentity may be allocated among the activities of the entity under any reasonablemethod that the selects. This transitional rule does not apply to any saleof an interest in a passthrough entity that occurs after February 19, 1988,if the holder contributes certain substantially appreciated property (asdefined above) to the entity after that date.The Service continues to study the issues presented by dispositions ofinterests in passthrough entities and invites comment on the treatmentaccorded these dispositions under andSection; 1.469-2T(e)(3).XVI. Recharacterization of Certain Passive Activity Gross Income<ITAG tagnum="81">A. In General</ITAG>Section 469 was intended to prevent taxpayers from using losses from rentalactivities and passive business activities to shelter any of three typesof income: (a) Personal service income, (b) active business income, and(c) Portfolio investment income. Congress recognized the difficulty ofwriting statutory rules that would clearly distinguish income in theseclasses from income properly falling in the rental or passive businessincome category, and anticipated the need for additional rules to addresstransactions structured in order to maximize the amount of income treatedas rental or passive business income. Consequently, Congress enacted section469 (1), (2), and (3), granting to the Secretary the authority to prescriberegulations that eliminate certain items of gross income, or the net incomefrom certain activities, from the computation of the passive activity lossand credit.The Conference Report accompanying the Act states that the Secretary'sregulatory authority is intended to be ``exercised to protect the underlyingpurpose of the passive loss provision, i.e., preventing the shelteringof positive income sources through the use of tax losses derived from passivebusiness activities.'' H.R. Conf. Rep. No. 99-841, 99th Cong., 2nd Sess.,vol. II, at 147 (1986).In the absence of regulations, taxpayers would be encouraged to generatepassive activity gross income by (a) changing their participation in, andthe ownership structure of, their active businesses, and (b) replacingtheir portfolio investments with investments in rental or passive businessactivities that share many of the investment characteristics of traditionalportfolio investments. Although attempts to derive capital income fromrental or passive business sources are not generally abusive, they could,if undeterred, frustrate Congress' intent that the passive loss provisionprevent ``the sheltering of positive income sources.'' Thus, andSection;1.469-2T(f) requires that income from certain activities be treated asincome that is not from a passive activity.Since taxpayers could not clearly foresee the particular recharacterizationrules that these regulations would adopt, the provisions in andSection; 1.469-2T(f)that recharacterize income from activities based on factors other thanthe taxpayer's participation in such activities do not apply to gross incometaken into account for any taxable year beginning before January 1, 1988.In addition, the rule recharacterizing income from self-rented propertydoes not apply to income that is attributable to the rental of propertypursuant to a written binding contract entered into before February 19,1988.The rules contained in andSection; 1.469-2T(f) apply only to gross incomethat, in the absence of such rules, would be treated as passive activitygross income. Thus, if an activity is not a passive activity, the rulesin andSection; 1.469-2T(f) do not apply to gross income from the activity.Moreover, except as specifically provided by regulation, the fact thatan amount of gross income from an activity is recharacterized under andSection;1.469-2T(f) does not cause that activity to be treated as other than apassive activity for purposes of section 469 or these regulations.<ITAG tagnum="81">B. Rules Preventing Conversion of Active Business Income Into PassiveActivity Gross Income</ITAG><T3>1. Passive activities in which the taxpayer's participation is significant.</T3>The Service recognizes that, in the case of an activity that is notthe full-time occupation of the taxpayer, the rules regarding materialparticipation set forth in andSection; 1.469-5T are stringent. As a result,a taxpayer spending relatively small amounts of time in unrelated activitiescould, in the absence of regulations, treat the gross income from suchactivities as passive activity gross income even though the taxpayer'sparticipation and services are significant factors in generating the incomefrom the activities.In view of this concern, andSection; 1.469-2T(f)(2) provides that an amountof the taxpayer's gross income from a significant participation passiveactivity equal to the taxpayer's net passive income from the activity istreated as not from a passive activity. For purposes of this rule, a significantparticipation passive activity is an activity (other than a rental activity)in which the taxpayer participates for more than 100 hours, but does notmaterially participate, for the taxable year.The Service does not believe it appropriate to treat the taxpayer's netincome, but not the taxpayer's net losses, from activities as nonpassiveif the taxpayer's involvement in such activities is substantial. Accordingly,andSection; 1.469-5T(a)(4) provides that a taxpayer materially participatesin activities that would otherwise be significant participation passiveactivities for purposes of andSection; 1.469-2T(f)(2) if the taxpayer's participationin all such activities exceeds 500 hours for the taxable year.<T3>2. Activities involving the rental of property developed by the taxpayer.</T3>In general, an activity involving the rental of property is a passiveactivity. Under andSection; 1.469-2T(c)(2), gain from the disposition ofproperty used in a passive activity generally is treated as passive activitygross income. It is not appropriate, however, to treat a taxpayer's gainfrom the sale of a rental property as passive activity gross income ifthe taxpayer materially or significantly participated in the developmentof the property and the gain is predominantly attributable to the developmentof the property rather than to appreciation during the rental period.Accordingly, andSection; 1.469-2T(f)(5) provides that, in certain situations,an amount of a taxpayer's gross income from renting and selling an itemof property equal to the taxpayer's net passive income from such rentaland sale is treated as not from a passive activity. This rule applies if(a) any gain from the sale, exchange, or other disposition of the propertyis included in the taxpayer's income for the taxable year, (b) during anytaxable year the taxpayer materially or significantly participated in atrade or business activity involving the performance of services for thepurpose of enhancing the value of the property, and (c) a binding contractfor the sale or exchange was entered into less than 24 months after therental of the property commenced.In general, the effect of this rule is that property developed by the taxpayermust be rented for at least 24 months prior to selling the property orcontracting for its sale or the taxpayer's gain from the sale will notbe treated as passive activity gross income.<T3>3. Self-rented property. </T3>As indicated above, section 469 is intended,in part, to prevent taxpayers from sheltering active business income withlosses from rental activities and passive business activities. Income froman active business consists of both income from services and income fromcapital invested in the business. In the absence of regulations, a taxpayercould derive passive activity gross income from an active business in whichtangible property is used by renting the property to an entity conductingthe activity (or by causing an entity holding the property to rent theproperty to the taxpayer). It would be inconsistent with the purposes ofsection 469 to treat rental income as passive activity gross income insuch cases, and the Conference Report accompanying the Act states thatit would be appropriate for the Service to exercise its regulatory authorityunder section 469(1)(3) in the case of ``related party leases or sub-leases,with respect to property used in a business activity, that have the effectof reducing active business income and creating passive income.'' H.R.Conf. Rep. No. 99-841, 99th Cong., 2nd Sess., vol. II, at 147 (1986).Accordingly, andSection; 1.469-2T(f)(6) provides that an amount of the taxpayer'sgross income from renting an item of property equal to the taxpayer's netpassive income from such rental is treated as not from a passive activityif the property is rented for use in a trade or business activity in whichthe taxpayer materially participates for the taxable year. The Servicerecognizes that it has the authority to treat part or all of the taxpayer'srental expense in such cases as a self-charged item, and that the amountof rental income that is recharacterized under andSection; 1.469-2T(f)(6)may exceed the amount of income that it would be appropriate to recharacterizeas a self-charged item. The Service invites comments on the relationshipbetween this rule and the rules to be provided under andSection; 1.469-7T(relating to the treatment of self-charged items of income and expense).<ITAG tagnum="81">C. Rules Preventing Conversion of Portfolio Income Into Passive ActivityGross Income</ITAG><T3>1. Activities involving the rental of nondepreciable property. </T3>TheConference Report accompanying the Act states that it may be appropriatefor the Service to treat ``ground rents that produce income without significantexpenses'' as not from a passive activity. Consistently with this suggestion,andSection; 1.469-2T(f)(3) provides that an amount of the taxpayer's grossincome from an activity of renting nondepreciable property equal to thetaxpayer's net passive income from the activity is treated as not froma passive activity. Since nondepreciable property may be rented togetherwith incidental depreciable property (e.g., land with minor improvements),raising a factual issue as to whether an activity in which nondepreciableproperty is leased consists primarily of renting such property, andSection;1.469-2T(f)(3) provides a bright line for distinguishing activities involvingthe rental of nondepreciable property from other rental activities. Underthe regulations, income from a rental activity is subject to this recharacterizationrule if the unadjusted basis of the depreciable property rented in theactivity is less than 30 percent of the unadjusted basis of all propertyrented in the activity. The Service invites comment regarding the appropriatenessof this objective standard.<T3>2. Equity-financed lending activities. </T3>Under andSection; 1.469-2T(c)(3)(ii)(A),interest income from loans made in the ordinary course of a trade or businessof lending money is not portfolio income. Absent a regulation expresslytreating income from such an activity as nonpassive income, taxpayers couldderive passive income from investments substantially similar to mutualfund investments by becoming passive investors in partnerships or S corporationsthat engage in a trade or business of lending equity funds contributedby the taxpayers. Permitting such income to be treated as passive incomewould be inconsistent with the purpose of section 469 to prevent the shelteringof portfolio income with losses from rental and passive business activities.On the other hand, income derived from borrowing money and lending theproceeds at a higher interest rate does not resemble the kind of portfolioincome which Congress intended to protect from sheltering by passive losses.Accordingly, andSection; 1.469-2T(f)(4) treats as nonpassive income an amountof the taxpayer's gross income from an equity-financed lending activityequal to the lesser of (a) the taxpayer's equity-financed interest incomefrom the activity or (b) the taxpayer's net passive income from the activity.This rule applies to the lending activities in which the average balanceof debt incurred in the activity (determined at the entity level) doesnot exceed 80 percent of the average balance of interest-bearing assetsheld in the activity. In general, the taxpayer's equity-financed interestincome from the activity is equal to the taxpayer's interest income fromthe activity multiplied by the activity's ratio of equity to interest-bearingassets. This rule is designed to treat as nonpassive income only that portionof the taxpayer's income from the activity that approximates the productof (a) the average interest rate of the activity's interest-bearing assetsand (b) the taxpayer's equity contribution to the activity.<T3>3. Passthrough entities licensing intangible property.</T3> SectionandSection; 1.469-2T(c)(3)(iii)(B) provides that royalty income receivedby a passthrough entity from the licensing of intangible property may betreated as income derived in the ordinary course of a trade or businessif the entity (a) created the property or (b) performed substantial servicesor incurred substantial costs with respect to the development or marketingof the property. This treatment is appropriate in the case of a taxpayerwho owns an interest in such an entity at the time that the entity createssuch property, performs such services, or incurs such costs. If, however,a taxpayer acquires an interest in such an entity after the entity createssuch property, performs such services, or incurs such costs, the taxpayer'sroyalty income resembles portfolio income rather than income derived inthe ordinary course of a trade or business. Accordingly, andSection; 1.469-2T(f)(7)provides that an amount of the taxpayer's gross income from such propertyequal to the taxpayer's net passive income from such property is generallytreated as not from a passive activity. The Service invites comment onthe rules employed in andSection; 1.469-2T(f)(7) to determine when taxpayersare subject to this rule.<ITAG tagnum="81">D. Limitation on Recharacterized Income</ITAG>The rules contained in andSection; 1.469-2T(f)(2) (relating to significantparticipation activities), andSection; 1.469-2T(f)(3) (relating to the rentalof nondepreciable property), and andSection; 1.469-2T(f)(4) (relating toequity-financed lending activities) treat as nonpassive income an amountof the taxpayer's gross income from an activity equal to the taxpayer'snet passive income from the activity. Under andSection; 1.469-2T(f)(9)(i),the taxpayer's ``net passive income'' from an activity for a taxable yearis the excess of the taxpayer's passive activity gross income from theactivity for the year (determined without regard to these recharacterizationrules) over the taxpayer's passive activity deductions from the activityfor the year. The rules contained in andSection; 1.469-2T(f)(5) (relatingto the rental of property developed by the taxpayer), andSection; 1.469-2T(f)(6)(relating to self-rented property), and andSection; 1.469-2T(f)(7) (relatingto passthrough entities licensing intangible property) are similar, butapply on a property-by-property basis.Taxpayers should note that, under andSection; 1.469-2T(d)(1)(ii), a deductionfrom an activity that is disallowed under section 469 for a taxable yearis treated as a passive activity deduction from the activity for the succeedingtaxable year and that, under andSection; 1.469-2T(f)(7)(ii)(B) and (9)(iv),a similar rule applies when deductions reasonably allocable to an itemof property are disallowed. Thus, if a taxpayer's loss from an activityor an item of property is disallowed for a taxable year, the taxpayer'snet passive income from the activity or property for the succeeding yearis reduced by the amount of such disallowed loss. As a result, the regulationsdo not treat income from an activity or an item of property as nonpassiveincome while, at the same time, prohibiting the deduction of previouslydisallowed losses from such activity or property.Although prior-year losses from an activity or an item of property subjectto the rules contained in andSection; 1.469-2T(f) generally carry forwardand reduce the amount of gross income that is treated as nonpassive incomeunder those rules, this is not the case to the extent any such loss forthe prior taxable year exceeds the disallowed loss allocated to such activityor property for such year under the rules of andSection; 1.469-1T(f). Inthat event, the excess loss has in effect absorbed passive income, therebyresulting in the disallowance of passive losses from other activities.The Service is studying the interaction between the rules for allocatingdisallowed losses and rules, such as those contained in andSection; 1.469-2T(f)and those to be provided with respect to former passive activities, underwhich a carryover loss may be allowed to the extent of income that wouldotherwise be treated as nonpassive income. The Service invites suggestionsfor the coordination of those rules.<ITAG tagnum="81">E. Possible Recharacterization Rules to be Contained in Future Regulations</ITAG>The Service recognizes that the rules in these regulations are not exhaustiveand that taxpayers may structure additional investments that have economiccharacteristics similar to those of portfolio investments so as to derivepassive activity gross income from such investments. The Service intendsto monitor developments in this area closely, and anticipates prescribingadditional regulations to the extent necessary to prevent portfolio-typeincome from being treated as passive activity gross income. In general,any such additional regulations would apply prospectively only. In appropriatecircumstances, however, the regulations might apply to income, derivedafter the date the regulations are published, from investments made priorto such date, but in such cases the rules would be issued in proposed form(rather than as temporary regulations), with a period for public commentbefore the regulations become final.During the preparation of these regulations, the Service considered anapproach to recharacterizing certain passive activity gross income thatis illustrative of the kinds of additional regulations the Service mayprescribe in the future. Under this approach, gross income attributableto a preferred or guaranteed return from an investment (i.e., a returnthat through preferences or other arrangements is derived from sourcesother than the taxpayer's own invested capital) would be treated as portfolioincome. Some commentators have suggested that such a rule should address the followingsituation:<ITAG tagnum="21">A limited partnership is formed to acquire a rental property for $10million. The general partner contributes $5 million to the partnershipand the remaining $5 million of partnership capital is raised through aprivate placement of limited partnership interests to five individuals.The partnership agreement allocates 99 percent of partnership taxable incometo the limited partners until the income allocated to them equals a 10percent cumulative annual return on their invested capital, with any remainingtaxable income allocated 15 percent to the limited partners and 85 percentto the general partner. Thus, the income earned on the general partner'sinvested capital will be applied, if necessary, to satisfy the limitedpartners' right to a 10 percent cumulative return.</ITAG>Because of the limited partners' preferential right to income, their interests,depending on circumstances such as the nature of the partnership's investment,may have the characteristics of a portfolio investment. The Service consideredan approach under which a limited partner's gross income attributable toa preferred return would in certain circumstances be treated as portfolioincome. The Service continues to study this approach and invites commenton the circumstances in which a ``preferred'' or ``guaranteed'' returnshould be treated as portfolio income. XVII. Passive Activity Credit<ITAG tagnum="81">A. Credits Subject to Section 469</ITAG>A credit may be limited under section 469 if it is from a passive activityand is described in section 38 (b) (1) through (5) (relating to generalbusiness credits), section 27(b) (relating to section 936 corporations),section 28 (relating to clinical testing of certain drugs), or section29 (relating to fuel from nonconventional sources). Section 1.469-3T(b) provides that a credit is treated as from a passiveactivity if (a) it arises in connection with a passive activity (i.e.,an activity that is passive for the taxable year in which the credit wouldbe allowed if section 469 and other specified limitations did not apply)or (b) in the case of a credit attributable to qualified progress expenditures(within the meaning of section 46(d)), it is reasonable to believe thatthe progress expenditure property (within the meaning of section 46(d)(2))will be used in a passive activity when it is placed in service. Thus,for example, a credit attributable to qualified rehabilitation expenditures(within the meaning of section 48(g)(2)) which is allowed for the taxableyear under section 46(d), is treated as a credit from a passive activityof the taxpayer if either (a) the activity in which the qualified rehabilitationexpenditures are paid or incurred is a passive activity of the taxpayerfor the taxable year in which such expenditures are paid or incurred, or(b) it is reasonable to believe that the rehabilitated property will beused in a passive activity of the taxpayer when it is placed in service.<ITAG tagnum="81">B. Determination of Regular Tax Liability Allocable to Passive Activities</ITAG>Under section 469(d)(2), the passive activity credit is the amount by whichthe sum of the taxpayer's credits that are subject to section 469 for thetaxable year exceeds the taxpayer's regular tax liability allocable toall passive activities for such year. Section 469(j)(3) provides that theterm ``regular tax liability'' has the meaning given such term by section26(b). Section 1.469-3T(d)(1) provides that the taxpayer's regular taxliability for the taxable year that is allocable to all passive activitiesis the regular tax liability on the excess of the taxpayer's taxable incomefor the year over the amount by which the taxpayer's passive activity grossincome exceeds the taxpayer's passive activity deductions for the taxableyear. <ITAG tagnum="81">C. Coordination With Other Limitations on Credits </ITAG>In general, the limitation on the passive activity credit applies beforeall other limitations that may apply to credits from passive activities(other than the limitation in section 41(g) (relating to research creditsof certain individuals)). If a credit is subject to section 469 for a taxableyear but is not disallowed by section 469, the credit becomes subject toother limitations in the same manner as credits from activities that arenot passive activities. In determining the years to which a general businesscredit may be carried, the credit is treated for purposes of section 39as a current year business credit in the first taxable year in which thecredit is subject to section 469 but is not disallowed thereby. XVIII. Material Participation<ITAG tagnum="81">A. In General</ITAG>Under andSection; 1.469-5T(a), an individual is treated as materially participatingin an activity for a taxable year if and only if the individual meets oneof seven tests. The first four tests (contained in andSection; 1.469-5T(a)(1) through (4)) are quantitative in nature, and are based on the numberof hours spent participating in the activity during the year. The fifthand sixth tests (contained in andSection; 1.469-5T(a) (5)) and (6)) are basedon material participation by the taxpayer in prior years. The seventh test(contained in andSection; 1.469-5T (a)(7)) is a facts-and-circumstances test.<ITAG tagnum="81">B. Quantitative tests </ITAG>Under andSection; 1.469-5T(a)(1), an individual is treated as materiallyparticipating in an activity for a taxable year if the individual participatesin the activity for more than 500 hours during the year. The Service believes that the 500-hour test will have the effect of restrictingdeductions from the types of trade or business activities that Congressintended to treat as passive activities, since few investors in traditionaltax shelters devote more than 500 hours during a taxable year to any suchinvestment. In addition, the Service believes that income from an activityin which an individual participates for more than 500 hours during a taxableyear is not properly classified as income from a passive activity. Under andSection; 1.469-5T(a)(2), an individual is treated as materiallyparticipating in an activity for a taxable year if the individual's participationin the activity for the year constitutes substantially all of the participationin the activity for the taxable year. Section 1.469-5T(a)(3) treats anindividual as materially participating in an activity for a taxable yearif the individual participates in the activity for more than 100 hoursduring the taxable year, and the individual's participation in the activityfor the year is not less than that of any other individual. These rulesare included because the service recognizes that the operation of someactivities may not require more than 500 hours of participation, or maynot require more than 500 hours of participation by any one individualduring a taxable year.Under andSection; 1.469-5T(a)(4), an individual is treated as materiallyparticipating in all of the individual's significant participation activitiesfor a taxable year if the individual's aggregate participation is significantparticipation activities for the year exceeds 500 hours. For purposes ofthis rule, a significant participation activity is a trade or businessactivity in which the individual participates for more than 100 hours duringthe taxable year but in which the individual does not materially participatefor the year (without regard to this rule). This rule is included becausethe Service believes that an individual who devotes more than 500 hoursduring a taxable year to several activities, each of which is significantactivity of such individual, should be treated similarly to an individualwho devotes an equivalent amount of time to a single activity.<ITAG tagnum="81">C. Tests Based on Material Participation in Prior Years</ITAG>Under andSection; 1.469-5T(a)(5), an individual is treated as materiallyparticipating in an activity for a taxable year if the individual materiallyparticipated in such activity for any five of the ten taxable years thatimmediately precede the taxable year.Under andSection; 1.469-5T(a)(6), an individual is treated as materiallyparticipating in a personal service activity for a taxable year if thetaxpayer materially participated in the activity for any three taxableyears that precede the taxable year. For purposes of this rule, an activityis a personal service activity if it principally involves the performanceof personal services in (a) the fields of health, law, engineering, architecture,accounting, actuarial science, performing arts, or consulting, or (b) anyother trade or business in which capital is not a material income-producingfactor.These rules are included because the Service believes that an activityin which an individual has materially participated over a long period oftime or a personal service activity in which an individual has participatedfor a substantial period of time is likely to represent the individual'sprincipal livelihood rather than a passive investment. In particular, theService does not believe that withdrawal from a longstanding active businessor from a personal service business that has been active for a substantialperiod should convert an individual's earnings from the business to passiveincome. Thus, the Service believes the income from such businesses generallyis part of the earned income base that section 469 was intended to protect.In the case of a longstanding active business (other than a personal servicebusiness), however, the Service believes that a continuing interest insuch an activity is more appropriately viewed as an investment in a passiveactivity if the individual has not materially participated in the activityfor a significant period of time during the 10-year period immediatelypreceding the taxable year.<ITAG tagnum="81">D. Facts-and-Circumstances Test</ITAG>Section 1.469-5T(a)(7) provides that an individual may be treated as materiallyparticipating in an activity for a taxable year based on all of the factsand circumstances. The general principles to be followed in applying thefacts-and-circumstances test are not addressed in these regulations, andwill be included in future regulations. Section 1.469-5T(b), however, providesthat certain participation is insufficient to constitute material participation,or is not taken into account, under this test. Thus, except as providedin section 469(h)(3), the fact that an individual satisfies participationstandards in other provisions of the Code and the regulations (such asthe ``material participation'' standards in sections 1402 and 2032A) isnot taken into account in determining whether the individual materiallyparticipates in an activity for purposes of section 469. In addition, anindividual's participation in management of an activity is not taken intoaccount in applying the facts-and-circumstances test to the individualif a paid manager participates in the activity or if the management servicesperformed by such individual are exceeded by those performed by any otherindividual. Finally, an individual who does not participate in an activityfor more than 100 hours during the taxable year cannot satisfy the facts-and-circumstancestest for the year.<ITAG tagnum="81">E. Treatment of Limited Partners</ITAG>Section 469(h)(2) provides that, except as provided in regulations, nointerest in a limited partnership shall be treated as an interest withrespect to which a taxpayer materially participates. Section 1.469-5T(d)provides two exceptions to this general rule. First, the general rule doesnot apply to an activity for a taxable year if (a) the taxpayer participatesin the activity for more than 500 hours during the taxable year, or (b)the taxpayer is treated as materially participating in the activity forthe taxable year under either the longstanding material participant testor the personal-service-activity test. Second, the general rule does notapply with respect to a limited partnership interest in a partnership inwhich the taxpayer is also a general partner.<ITAG tagnum="81">F. Trusts and Estates</ITAG>Material participation rules for trusts and estates will be included infuture regulations providing rules for the application of section 469 totrusts, estates, and their beneficiaries.<ITAG tagnum="81">G. Meaning of ``Participation''</ITAG>Section 1.469-5T(f) generally provides that all work done in an activityby an individual who owns an interest in the activity (other than an interestowned through a C corporation) is taken into account as participation bythe individual in the activity, without regard to the capacity in whichthe individual does such work. Thus, work performed by an individual asan employee of a C corporation in connection with an activity in whichthe individual owns an interest (other than an interest owned through aC corporation) is taken into account as participation by the individualin the activity.Section 1.469-5T(f) includes two exceptions to this general rule. First,under andSection; 1.469-5T(f)(2)(i), work that is not customarily done byan owner is not taken into account if a principal purpose for the performanceof such work is to avoid the disallowance of a passive activity loss orcredit. Second, under andSection; 1.469-5T(f)(2)(ii), work done by an individualin connection with an activity in the individual's capacity as an investorin the activity is not taken into account.In the case of a married individual, andSection; 1.469-5T(f)(3) providesthat the participation of the individual's spouse is treated as participationby such individual for purposes of the passive loss and credit limitations,without regard to whether the participation of the spouse is material participationin its own right, whether the spouse owns an interest in the activity,or whether the individual and the individual's spouse file a joint returnfor the taxable year.<ITAG tagnum="81">H. No Recordkeeping Requirements</ITAG>Notwithstanding the quantitative tests set forth in the regulations, andSection;1.469-5T(f)(4) expressly provides that taxpayers need not keep contemporaneousrecords of their hours of participation in each activity. The Service recognizesthat, while lawyers and certain other professionals are accustomed to maintainingdetailed records of how they spend their work days, most individuals donot customarily maintain such records. Accordingly, under the regulations,taxpayers will be allowed to prove the requisite number of hours by anyreasonable means, including, but not limited to, appointment books, calenders,and narrative summaries.<ITAG tagnum="81">I. Material Participation for Taxable Years Beginning Before January1, 1987</ITAG>A taxpayer's participation in an activity for a taxable year beginningbefore January 1, 1987, may be relevant under rules such as those relatingto longstanding material participants and personal service activities.Section 1.469-5T(j) provides that in any case in which it is necessaryto determine whether an individual materially participated in an activityfor any taxable year beginning before January 1, 1987 (other than a taxableyear of a partnership, S corporation, estate, or trust ending after December31, 1986), the individual is treated as materially participating in theactivity for such year only if the individual participated in the activityfor more than 500 hours during the year. The Service believes that the500-hour test represents the only administrable rule for dealing with thedetermination of material participation for taxable years beginning before1987.XIX. Effective date and transition rules.<ITAG tagnum="81">A. In General</ITAG>Section 469 and the regulations thereunder generally apply for taxableyears beginning after December 31, 1986. However, under andSection; 1.469-11T(a)(2),specified rules in andSection; 1.469-2T(f) treating certain income as notfrom a passive activity apply only for taxable years beginning after December31, 1987. These provisions are andSection; 1.469-2T(f)(3) (relating to therental of nondepreciable property), andSection; 1.469-2T(f)(4) (relatingto equity-financed lending activities), andSection; 1.469-2T(f)(5) (relatingto the rental of property developed by the taxpayer), andSection; 1.469-2T(f)(6)(relating to self-rented property), and andSection; 1.469-2T(f)(7) (relatingto passthrough entities licensing intangible property). In addition, andSection;1.469-2T(f)(6) does not apply to income attributable to the rental of propertypursuant to a written binding contract entered into before February 19,1988.If a taxpayer is a partner, shareholder, or beneficiary of a partnership,S corporation, estate, or trust with a taxable year ending within the taxpayer'sfirst taxable year beginning after December 31, 1986, passive items fromsuch partnership, S corporation, estate, or trust are taken into accountin computing the taxpayer's passive activity loss or credit even if suchitems are attributable to taxable years of such entities beginning beforeJanuary 1, 1987, or are attributable to amounts paid or incurred priorto January 1, 1987. Under andSection; 1.469-2T(e)(1), the treatment of anitem of gross income, deduction, or credit from a fiscal year partnershipor S corporation as passive activity gross income, as a passive activitydeduction, or as a credit from a passive activity, respectively, is determinedby reference to the taxpayer's participation in the activity to which suchitem relates for the partnership's or S corporation's taxable year in whichthe item arose. Future regulations relating to the treatment of beneficiariesof estates and trusts will provide guidance on this issue with respectto such taxpayers.<ITAG tagnum="81">B. Effect of Events Occurring in Years Beginning Prior to 1987</ITAG>Because in certain instances the treatment under the regulations of anitem of gross income, deduction, or credit for the taxable year is determinedin part by reference to events in prior taxable years, andSection; 1.469-11T(a)(4)provides that events in prior taxable years generally are taken into accountin making such determinations. For example, under andSection; 1.469-5T(a)(5),an individual is treated as materially participating in an activity forthe taxable year if the individual materially participated in the activityfor any five of the ten taxable years that immediately precede the taxableyear. Under andSection; 1.469-11T(a)(4), a taxable year beginning prior toJanuary 1, 1987, is taken into account for this purpose, but only if theindividual participated in the activity for more than 500 hours duringsuch taxable year.<ITAG tagnum="81">C. Transitional Rule for Losses From Pre-Enactment Interest</ITAG><T3>1. In general.</T3> Section 469(m) provides a transitional rule forlosses and credits attributable to pre-enactment interests in passive activities.Under that rule, which applies for taxable years beginning prior to 1991,the amount of the taxpayer's passive activity loss or passive activitycredit that would be disallowed in the absence of the transitional ruleis reduced by an amount equal to the product of a percentage and the lesserof (a) the amount of the passive activity loss or passive activity creditthat would be disallowed in the absence of the transitional rule, or (b)the amount of the passive activity loss or passive activity credit thatwould be disallowed in the absence of the transitional rule (determinedwithout taking into account previously disallowed passive items or passiveitems that are not attributable to the taxpayer's pre-enactment interestsin passive activities). The percentage is 65 percent for taxable yearsbeginning in 1987, 40 percent for taxable years beginning in 1988, 20 percentfor taxable years beginning in 1989, and 10 percent for taxable years beginningin 1990. Paragraphs (b) and (c) of andSection; 1.469-11T (b) contain rules relatingto the identification of pre-enactment interests in passive activitiesand the computation of the amount of the passive activity loss and creditthat would be disallowed if passive items that are not attributable tothe taxpayer's pre-enactment interests in passive activities were not takeninto account.<T3>2. Indentification of pre-enactment interests.</T3> Under section 469(m),a taxpayer's pre-enactment interests must be identified for each taxableyear during the transition period. Thus, for each such taxable year, thetaxpayer must determine which of the taxpayer's interests in activitiesthat are passive activities for the taxable year are pre-enactment interests.Under andSection; 1.469-11T (c)(1), a pre-enactment interest is a ``qualifiedinterest'' in a ``pre-enactment activity.''Section 1.469-11T(c)(3) provides that an activity is a ``pre-enactmentactivity'' if the activity was being conducted by any person on October22, 1986, or if at least 50 percent (by value) of the property used inthe activity during the taxable year was in existence or under constructionon August 16, 1986, or was acquired or constructed at any time pursuantto a written binding contract in effect on August 16, 1986 (without regardto whether the taxpayer or any person related to the taxpayer was a partyto such contract). Thus, for example, in the case of an activity of rentinga building, the activity is a pre-enactment activity if the building wasin existence or under construction on August 16, 1986.Section 1.469-11T(c)(2) provides that an interest in an activity is a ``qualifiedinterest'' if the interest was held by the taxpayer on October 22, 1986,and at all times thereafter, or was acquired by the taxpayer pursuant towritten binding contracts to which the taxpayer was a party on October22, 1986. Section 1.469-11T(c)(7) provides rules for determining whethera taxpayer was a party to a written binding contract on October 22, 1986.Under those rules, for example, if on October 22, 1986, a taxpayer wasa party to a written binding contract to acquire a partnership interest,and the partnership was a party to a written bining contract to acquirean interest in an activity, the taxpayer is treated as a party to the partnership'scontract.<T3>3. Computation of pre-enactment loss and credit.</T3> Section 1.469-11T(b)(3)and (4) contains rules relating to the computation of the amount of thepassive activity loss and credit that would be disallowed if the passiveitems that are not attributable to the taxpayer's pre-enactment interestsin passive activities were not taken into account. The amounts determinedunder andSection; 1.469-11T(b)(3) (relating to the pre-enactment loss) andandSection; 1.469-11T(b)(4) (relating to the pre-enactment credit) are theamounts of the passive activity loss and the passive activity credit, respectively,that would be disallowed under andSection; 1.469-1T(a)(1) taking into accountall of the provisions of section 469 and the regulations thereunder, butapplying such provisions as though the taxpayer had no interests in passiveactivities other than the taxpayer's pre-enactment interests. Under theserules, deductions and credits disallowed in a prior year and taken intoaccount for the taxable year under section 469(b) (including deductionsand credits attributable to pre-enactment interests) also are not takeninto account.<ITAG tagnum="84">Special Analyses</ITAG>The Commissioner of Internal Revenue has determined that this temporaryrule is not a major rule as defined in Executive Order 12291 and that aregulatory impact analysis therefore is not required. A general noticeof proposed rulemaking is not required by 5 U.S.C. 553 for temporary regulations.Accordingly, the temporary regulations do not constitute regulations subjectto the Regulatory Flexibility Act (5 U.S.C. chapter 6).<ITAG tagnum="84">Drafting Information</ITAG>The principal author of these temporary regulations is Michael J. Graceof the Legislation and Regulations Division of the Office of Chief Counsel,Internal Revenue Service. However, personnel from other offices of theInternal Revenue Service and Treasury Department participated in developingthe regulations on matters of both substance and style.<ITAG tagnum="85">List of Subjects in 26 CFR 1.441-1_1.483-2</ITAG>Income taxes, Accounting, Deferred compensation plans.<ITAG tagnum="84">Adoption of Amendments to the Regulations</ITAG>For the reasons set forth in the preamble, Title 26, Chapter I, SubchapterA, Part 1 of the Code of Federal Regulations is amended as set forth below:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 1_[AMENDED]  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Income Tax Regulations  </ITAG><T4>Paragraph 1.</T4> The authority for Part 1 is amended by adding thefollowing citation:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 26 U.S.C. 7805. * * * Sections 1.469-1T, 1.469-2T,1.469-3T, 1.469-5T, and 1.469-11T also issued under 26 U.S.C. 469(1).</ITAG><T4>Par. 2. </T4>The following new sections are added to Part 1 in theappropriate place:  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1.469-0T </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Table of contents (temporary).  </ITAG>This section lists the captions that appear in the temporary regulationsunder section 469.  <ITAG tagnum="74">andSection;1.469-1T General rules (temporary).  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Passive activity loss and credit disallowed.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) In general.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Exceptions.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) Taxpayers to whom these rules apply.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) Cross references.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Definition of passive activity.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Passive activity loss.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Passive activity credit.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Effect of rules for other purposes.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Special rule for oil and gas working interests.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) Treatment of disallowed losses and credits.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(7) Corporations subject to section 469.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(8) Consolidated groups.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(9) Joint returns.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(10) Material participation.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(11) Effective date and transition rules.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(12) Future regulations.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) Effect of section 469 and the regulations thereunder for otherpurposes.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Treatment of items of passive activity income and gain.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Coordination with section 1211.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Treatment of passive activity losses.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) Definition of ``passive activity.''  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) In general.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Trade or business activity.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) In general.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Certain activities not involving the conduct of a trade or businesstreated as trade or business activities. [Reserved]  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Rental activity.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) In general.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Exceptions.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Average period of customer use.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Significant personal services.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) In general.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) Excluded services.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(v) Extraordinary personal services.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(vi) Rental of property incidental to a nonrental activity of thetaxpayer.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) In general.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) Property held for investment.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(C) Property used in a trade or business.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(D) Property held for sale to customers.     </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(E) Lodging rented for convenience of employer. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(F) Unadjusted basis.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(vii) Property made available for use in a nonrental activity conductedby a partnership, S corporation, or joint venture in which the taxpayerowns an interest.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(viii) Examples.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Special rule for oil and gas working interests.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) In general.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Exception for deductions attributable to a period during whichliability is limited.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) In general.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) Coordination with rules governing the identification of disallowedpassive activity deductions.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(C) Meaning of certain terms.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(<T3>1</T3>) Allocable deductions.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(<T3>2</T3>) Disqualified deductions.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(<T3>3</T3>) Net loss.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(<T3>4</T3>) Ratable portion.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Examples.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Definitions of ``working interest.''  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(v) Entities that limit liability.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) General rule.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) Other limitations disregarded.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(C) Examples.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(vi) Cross reference to special rule for income from certain oil orgas properties.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Rental of dwelling unit.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) Activity of trading personal property.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) In general. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Personal property.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Example.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(f) Treatment of disallowed passive activity losses and credits. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Scope of this paragraph.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Identification of disallowed passive activity deductions.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Allocation of disallowed passive activity loss among activites. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) General rule.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) Loss from an activity.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(C) Significant participation passive activities.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(D) Examples.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Allocation within loss activities.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) In general.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) Excluded deductions.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Separately identified deductions.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Identification of disallowed credits from passive activites.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) General rule.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Coordination rule.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Separately identified credits.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Carryover of disallowed deductions and credits.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(g) Application of these rules to C corporations.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) In general.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Definitions.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Participation of corporations.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Material participation.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Significant participation.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Participation of individual.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Modified computation of passive activity loss in the case of closelyheld corporations.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) In general.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Net active income.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Examples.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Allowance of passive activity credit of closely held corporationsto extent of net active income tax liability.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) In general.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Net active income tax liability.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(h) Special rules for affiliated group filing consolidated return. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) In general.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Definitions.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Disallowance of consolidated group's passive activity loss orcredit.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Status and material participation of members.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Determination by reference to status and participation of group. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Determination of status and material participation of consolidatedgroup.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Modification of rules for identifying disallowed passive activitydeductions and credits.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Identification of disallowed deductions.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Ratable portion of disallowed passive activity loss.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Identification of disallowed credits.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) Transactions between members of a consolidated group.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Scope.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Recharacterization of gain or loss from intercompany transactionsother than deferred intercompany transactions.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) In general.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) Recharacterization of gain or loss as portfolio items.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Deferred intercompany transactions.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) In general.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) Deferred intercompany transactions involving property subjectto depreciation, amortization, or depletion.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(C) Restoration of deferred gain or loss or dispositions.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(D) Certain recharacterized items treated as portfolio items.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(E) Property involved in deferred intercompany transaction.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Definitions.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) Deferred intercompany transaction.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) Directly related.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(C) Intercompany transaction.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(D) Purchasing member.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(E) Selling member.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(7) Disposition of stock of a member of an affiliated group.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(8) Dispositions of property used in multiple activities.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) [Reserved]  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(j) Spouses filing joint return.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) In general.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Exceptions to treatment as one taxpayer.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Identification of disallowed deductions and credits.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Treatment of deductions disallowed under sections 704(d), 1366(d)and 465.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Treatment of losses from working interests.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Joint return no longer filed.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Participation of spouses.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(k) Former passive activities and changes in status of corporations.[Reserved]  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">andSection;1.469-2T Passive activity loss (temporary).  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Scope of this section.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) Definition of passive activity loss.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) In general.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Cross references.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) Passive activity gross income.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) In general.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Treatment of gain from disposition of an interest in an activityor an interest in property used in an activity.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) In general.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) Treatment of gain.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) Dispositions of partnership interests and S corporation stock. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(C) Interest in property.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(D) Examples.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Disposition of property used in more than one activity in 12-monthperiod preceding disposition.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Dispostion of substantially appreciated property formerly usedin nonpassive activity.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) In general.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) Date of disposition.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(C) Substantially appreciated property.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(D) Coordination with paragraph (c)(2)(ii) of this section.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(E) Coordination with section 163(d).  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(F) Example.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Items of portfolio income specifically excluded.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) In general.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Gross income derived in the ordinary course of a trade or business. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Special rules.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) Income from property held for investment by dealer.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) Royalties derived in the ordinary course of the trade or businessof licensing intangible property.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(<T3>1</T3>) In general.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(<T3>2</T3>) Substantial services or costs.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(<T3>i</T3>) In general.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(<T3>ii</T3>) Exception.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(<T3>iii</T3>) Expenditures taken into account.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(<T3>3</T3>) Passthrough entities. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(<T3>4</T3>) Cross reference.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(C) Mineral production payments.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Examples.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Items of personal service income specifically excluded.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) In general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Example.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Income from section 481 adjustment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) In general. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Positive section 481 adjustments. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Ratable portion.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) Gross income from certain oil or gas properties.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) In general. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Net income from the property.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Property.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Examples.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(7) Other items specifically excluded.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) Passive activity deductions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) In general. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Exceptions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Interest expense.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Clearly and directly allocable expenses.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Treatment of loss from disposition.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) In general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Disposition of Property used in more than one activity in 12-monthperiod preceding disposition.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Other applicable rules.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) Interest in property.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) Dispositions of partnership interests and S Corporation stock.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) Coordination with other limitations on deduction that apply beforesection 469.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) In general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Proration of deductions disallowed under basis limitations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) Deductions disallowed under section 704(d).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) Deductions disallowed under section 1366(d).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Proration of deductions disallowed under at-risk limitation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Coordination of basis and at-risk limitations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(v) Separately identified items of deduction and loss.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(7) Deductions from section 481 adjustment. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) In general. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Negative section 481 adjustment. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Ratable portion.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(8) Taxable year in which item arises.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) Special rules for partners and S corporation shareholders.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) In general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Payments under section 707(a), 707(c), and 736(b).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Section 707(a).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Section 707(c).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) In general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) Exception.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Section 736 (b). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Sale or exchange of interest in passthrough entity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Application of this paragraph (e) (3).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) General rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) Allocation among activities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) Ratable portion.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(<T3>1</T3>) Dispositions on which gain is recognized. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(<T3>2</T3>) Dispositions on which loss is recognized. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(C) Default rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(D) Special rules.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(<T3>1</T3>) Applicable valuation date.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(<T3>i</T3>) In general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(<T3>ii</T3>) 2Exception.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(<T3>2</T3>) Basis adjustments.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(<T3>3</T3>) Tiered passthrough entities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(E) Meaning of certain terms.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Treatment of gain allocated to certain passive activities asnot from a passive activity. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Dispositions occurring in taxable years beginning before February19, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) In general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) Exceptions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(v) Treatment of portfolio assets. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(vi) Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(vii) Examples.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(f) Recharacterization of passive income in certain situations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) In general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Special rule for significant participation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) In general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Significant participation passive activity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Example.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Rental of nondepreciable property.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Net interest income from passive equity-financed lending activity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) In general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Equity-financed lending activity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) In general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) Certain liabilities not taken into account.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Equity-financed interest income.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Net interest income.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(v) Interest-bearing assets.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(vi) Liabilities incurred in the activity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(vii) Average outstanding balance.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(viii) Example.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Net income from certain property rented incidental to developmentactivity. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) In general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Commencement of use.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Services performed for the purpose of endhancing the value ofproperty. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Example.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) Property rented to a nonpassive activity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(7) Special rules applicable to the acquisition of an interest ina passthrough entity engaged in the trade or business of licensing intangibleproperty.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) In general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Royalty income from property.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Exceptions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Capital expenditures.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(v) Example.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(8) Limitation on recharacterized income.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(9) Meaning of certain terms.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(10) Coordination with section 163 (d).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(11) Effective date.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">andSection; 1.469-3T Passive activity credit (temporary).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Computation of passive activity credit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) Credits subject to section 469.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) In general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Treatment of credits attributable to qualified progress expenditures.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Special rule for partners and S corporation shareholders.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Exception for pre-1987 credits.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) Taxable year to which credit is attributable.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) Regular tax liability allocable to passive activities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) In general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Regular tax liability.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) Coordination with section 39.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(f) Examples.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">andSection; 1.469-4T Definition of activity (temporary). [Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">andSection; 1.469-5T Material participation (temporary).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) In general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) Facts and circumstances.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) In general. [Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Certain participation insufficient to constitute material participationunder this paragraph (b).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Participation satisfying standards not contained in section 469.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Certain management activities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Participation less than 100 hours.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) Significant participation activity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) In general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Significant participation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) Personal service activity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) Treatment of limited partners.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) General rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Exceptions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Limited Parntership interest.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) In general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Limited Partner holding general partner interest.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(f) Participation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) In general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Exceptions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Certain work not customarily done by owners.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Participation as an investor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(A) In general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) Work done in individual's capacity as an investor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Participation of spouse.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Methods of proof.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(g) Material participation of trusts and estates. [Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(h) Miscellaneous rules.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Participation of corporations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Treatment of certain retired farmers and surviving spouses ofretired or disabled farmers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) [Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(j) Material participation for taxable years beginning before January1, 1987.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(k) Examples.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">andSection; 1.469-6T Treatment of losses upon certain dispositions (temporary).[Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">andSection; 1.469-7T Treatment of self-charged items of income and expense(temporary). [Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">andSection; 1.469-8T Application of section 469 to trusts, estates,and their beneficiaries (temporary). [Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">andSection; 1.469-9T Treatment of income, deductions, and credits fromcertain rental real estate activities (temporary). [Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">andSection; 1.469-10T Application of section 469 to publicly tradedpartnerships (temporary). [Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">andSection; 1.469-11T Effective date and transition rules (temporary).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Effective date.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) In general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Application of certain income recharacterization rules.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) In general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Property rented to a nonpassive activity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Qualified low-income housing projects.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Effect of events occurring in years prior to 1987.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Examples.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) Transitional rule for pre-enactment loss and pre-enactment credit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) In general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Applicable percentage.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Pre-enactment loss.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Pre-enactment credit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Examples.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) Definitions of pre-enactment interest.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) General rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Qualified interest.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) In general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Stock in a C corporation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Pre-enactment activity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) In general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Character before 1987 irrelevant.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Examples.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Effect of changes in a taxpayer's interest in a pre-enactmentactivity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) In general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Partnership terminations under section 708(b)(1)(B).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Examples.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) Special rule for beneficiaries of trusts or estates.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) In general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Interests distributed to beneficiaries.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(7) Written binding contract.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) In general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Special rule for contract of partnership or S corporation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Application of rule to partnership agreements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1.469-1T</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General rules (temporary). </ITAG>(a) <T3>Passive activity loss and credit disallowed_</T3>(1) <T3>In general.</T3> Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (a)(2) ofthis section_(i) The passive activity loss for the taxable year shall not be allowedas a deduction; and(ii) The passive activity credit for the taxable year shall not be allowed.(2) <T3>Exceptions.</T3> Paragraph (a)(1) of this section shall not apply tothe passive activity loss or the passive activity credit for the taxableyear to the extent provided in_(i) Section 469(i) and the rules to be contained in andSection; 1.469-9T(relating to losses and credits attributable to certain rental real estateactivities); and (ii) Section 1.469-11T (relating to losses and credits attributable tocertain pre-enactment interests in activities).(b) <T3>Taxpayers to whom these rules apply.</T3> The rules of section 469and the regulations thereunder generally apply to_(1) Individuals;(2) Trusts (other than trusts (or portions of trusts) described in section671);(3) Estates;(4) Personal service corporations (within the meaning of paragraph (g)(2)(i)of this section); and (5) Closely held corporations (within the meaning of paragraph (g)(2)(ii)of this section).(c) <T3>Cross references_</T3>(1) <T3>Definition of ``passive activity.''</T3> Rules relating to the definitionof the term ``passive activity'' are contained in paragraph (e) of thissection.(2) <T3>Passive activity loss.</T3> Rules relating to the computation of thepassive activity loss for the taxable year are contained in andSection; 1.469-2T.(3) <T3>Passive activity credit.</T3> Rules relating to the computation ofthe passive activity credit for the taxable year are contained in andSection;1.469-3T.(4) <T3>Effect of rules for other purposes.</T3> Rules relating to the effectof section 469 and the regulations thereunder for other purposes underthe Code are contained in paragraph (d) of this section.(5) <T3>Special rule for oil and gas working interests.</T3> Rules relatingto the treatment of losses and credits from certain interests in oil andgas wells are contained in paragraph (e)(4) of this section (6) <T3>Treatment of disallowed losses and credits.</T3> Paragraph (f) of thissection contains rules relating to_(i) The treatment of deductions from passive activities in taxable yearsin which the passive activity loss is disallowed in whole or in part underparagraph (a)(1)(i) of this section; and(ii) The treatment of credits from passive activities in taxable yearsin which the passive activity credit is disallowed in whole or in partunder paragraph (a)(1)(ii) of this section.(7) <T3>Corporation subject to section 469.</T3> Rules relating to the applicationof section 469 and regulations thereunder to C corporations are containedin paragraph (g) of this section.(8) <T3>Consolidated groups.</T3> Rules relating to the application of section469 and the regulations thereunder to affiliated groups of corporationsfiling a consolidated return for the taxable year are contained in paragraph(h) of this section.(9) <T3>Joint returns.</T3> Rules relating to the application of section 469and the regulations thereunder to spouses filing a joint return for thetaxable year are contained in paragraph (j) of this section.(10) <T3>Material participation</T3>. Rules defining the term ``material participation''are contained in andSection; 1.469-5T.(11) <T3>Effective date and transition rules.</T3> Rules relating to the effectivedate of section 469 and the regulations thereunder and transition rulesapplicable to pre-enactment interests in activities are contained in andSection;1.469-11T.(12) <T3>Future regulations.</T3> (i) Rules relating to former passive activitiesand changes in corporate status will be contained in paragraph (k) of thissection.(ii) Rules relating to the definition of ``activity'' will be containedin andSection; 1.469-4T.(iii) Rules relating to the treatment of deductions from activities thatare disposed of in certain transactions will be contained in andSection;1.469-6T.(iv) Rules relating to the treatment of self-charged items of income andexpense will be contained in andSection; 1.469-7T.(v) Rules relating to the application of section 469 and the regulationsthereunder to trusts, estates, and their beneficiaries will be containedin andSection;  1.469-8T. (vi) Rules relating to the treatment of income, deductions, and creditsfrom certain rental real estate activities of individuals and certain estateswill be contained in andSection;  1.469-9T.(vii) Rules relating to the application of section 469 to publicly tradedpartnerships will be contained in andSection;  1.469-10T.(d) <T3>Effect of section 469 and the regulations thereunder for other purposes_</T3>(1)<T3>Treatment of items of passive activity income and gain.</T3> Neitherthe provisions of section 469 (a) (1) and paragraph (a)(1) of this sectionnor the characterization of items of income or deduction as passive activitygross income (within the meaning of andSection;  1.469-2T (c)) or passiveactivity deductions (within the meaning of andSection; 1.469-2T (d)) affectsthe treatment of any item of income or gain under any provision of theInternal Revenue Code other than section 469. The following example illustratesthe application of this paragraph (d)(1):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example.</T3> (i) In 1991, an individual's only income and loss frompassive activities are a $10,000 capital gain from passive activity andmultiply;and a $12,000 ordinary loss from passive activity Y. The taxpayer alsohas a $10,000 capital loss that is not derived from a passive activity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Under andSection;  1.469-2T (b), the taxpayer has a $2,000 passiveactivity loss for the taxable year. The only effect of section 469 andthe regulations thereunder is to disallow a deduction for the taxpayer's$2,000 passive activity loss for the taxable year. Thus, the taxpayer'scapital loss for the taxable year is allowed because the $10,000 capitalgain from passive activity andmultiply; is taken into account under section1211 (b) in computing the taxpayer's allowable capital loss for the year.</ITAG>(2) <T3>Coordination with section 1211.</T3> A passive activity deduction thatis not disallowed for the taxable year under section 469 and the regulationsthereunder may nonetheless be disallowed for the taxable year under section1211. The following example illustrates the application of this paragraph(d)(2):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example.</T3> In 1987, an individual derives $10,000 of ordinary incomefrom passive activity X, no gains from the sale or exchange of captialassets or assets used in a trade or business, $12,000 of capital loss frompassive activity Y, and no income, gain, deductions, or losses from anyother passive activity. The capital loss from activity Y is a passive activitydeduction (within the meaning of andSection;  1.469-2T(d)). Under section469 and the regulations thereunder, the taxpayer is allowed $10,000 ofthe $12,000 passive activity deduction and has a $2,000 passive activityloss for the taxable year. Since the $10,000 passive activity deductionallowed under section 469 is a capital loss, such deduction is allowablefor the taxable year only to the extent provided under section 1211. Therefore,the taxpayer is allowed $3,000 of the $10,000 capital loss under section1211 and has a $7,000 capital loss carryover (within the meaning of section1212 (b)) to the succeeding taxable year.</ITAG>(3) <T3>Treatment of passive activity losses.</T3> Except as otherwise providedby regulations, a deduction that is disallowed for a taxable year undersection 469 and the regulations thereunder is not taken into account asa deduction that is allowed for the taxable year in computing the amountsubject to any tax imposed by subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code.The following example illustrates the application of this paragraph (d)(3):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example.</T3> An individual has a $5,000 passive activity loss fora taxable year, all of which is disallowed under paragraph (a)(1) of thissection. All of the disallowed loss is allocated under paragraph (f) ofthis section to activities that are trades or businesses (within the meaningof section 1402(c)). Such loss is not taken into account for the taxableyear in computing the taxpayer's taxable income subject to tax under section1. In addition, under this paragraph (d)(3), such loss is not taken intoaccount for the taxable year in computing the taxpayer's net earnings fromself-employment subject to tax under section 1401.</ITAG>(e) <T3>Definition of ``passive activity''_</T3>(1) <T3>In general.</T3> Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (e),an activity is a passive activity of the taxpayer for a taxable year ifand only if the activity_(i) Is a trade or business activity (within the meaning of paragraph (e)(2)of this section) in which the taxpayer does not materially participatefor such taxable year; or (ii) Is a rental activity (within the meaning of paragraph (e) (3) of thissection), without regard to whether or to what extent the taxpayer participatesin such activity.(2) <T3>Trade or business activity_</T3>(i) <T3>In general.</T3> An activity is a trade or business activity for ataxable year if for such year_(A) (<T3>1</T3>) The activity involves the conduct of a trade or business (withinthe meaning of section 162);(<T3>2</T3>) Research or experimental expenditures paid or incurred withrespect to the activity are deductible under section 174 (or would be deductibleif the taxpayer adopted the method described in section 174(a)); or (<T3>3</T3>) The activity is described in paragraph (e)(2)(ii) of this section;and(B) The activity is not a rental activity or an activity involving therental of property described in paragraph (e)(3) (vi)(B) of this section.(ii) <T3>Certain activities not involving the conduct of a trade or businesstreated as trade or business activities.</T3> [Reserved](3) <T3>Rental activity_</T3>(1) <T3>In general.</T3> Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (e)(3),an activity is a rental activity for a taxable year if_(A) During such taxable year, tangible property held in connection withthe activity is used by customers or held for use by customers; and (B) The gross income attributable to the conduct of the activity duringsuch taxable year represents (or, in the case of an activity in which propertyis held for use by customers, the expected gross income from the conductof the activity will represent) amounts paid or to be paid principallyfor the use of such tangible property (without regard to whether the useof the property by customers is pursuant to a lease or pursuant to a servicecontract or other arrangement that is not denominated a lease). (ii) <T3>Exceptions. </T3>For purposes of this paragraph (e)(3), an activityinvolving the use of tangible property is not a rental activity for a taxableyear if for such taxable year_ (A) The average period of customer use for such property is seven daysor less; (B) The average period of customer use for such property is 30 days orless, and significant personal services (within the meaning of paragraph(e)(3)(iv) of this section) are provided by or on behalf of the owner ofthe property in connection with making the property available for use bycustomers; (C) Extraordinary personal services (within the meaning of paragraph (e)(3)(v)of this section) are provided by or on behalf of the owner of the propertyin connection with making such property available for use by customers(without regard to the average period of customer use); (D) The rental of such property is treated as incidental to a nonrentalactivity of the taxpayer under paragraph (e)(3)(vi) of this section; (E) The taxpayer customarily makes the property available during definedbusiness hours for nonexclusive use by various customers; or (F) The provision of the property for use in an activity conducted by apartnership, S corporation, or joint venture in which the taxpayer ownsan interest is not a rental activity under paragraph (e)(3)(vii) of thissection. (iii) <T3>Average period of customer use. </T3>For purposes of this paragraph(e)(3), the average period of customer use for property held in connectionwith an activity is determined for a taxable year by dividing_ (A) The aggregate number of days in all periods of customer use for suchproperty ending during the taxable year; by (B) The number of such periods of customer use. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">For this purpose, each period during which a customer has a continuousor recurring right to use an item of property held in connection with theactivity (without regard to whether the customer uses the property forthe entire period or whether such right to use the property is pursuantto a single agreement or to renewals thereof) is treated as a separateperiod of customer use. (iv) <T3>Significant personal services_</T3>(A) <T3>In general. </T3>For purposes of paragraph (e)(3)(ii)(B) of this section,personal services include only services performed by individuals, and donot include excluded services (within the meaning of paragraph (e)(3)(iv)(B)of this section). In determining whether personal services provided inconnection with making property available for use by customers are significant,all of the relevant facts and circumstances shall be taken into account.Relevant facts and circumstances include the frequency with which suchservices are provided, the type and amount of labor required to performsuch services, and the value of such services relative to the amount chargedfor the use of the property. (B) <T3>Excluded services. </T3>For purposes of paragraph (e)(3)(iv)(A) ofthis section, the term ``excluded services'' means, with respect to anyproperty made available for use by customers_ (<T3>1</T3>) Services necessary to permit the lawful use of the property;(<T3>2</T3>) Services performed in connection with the construction of improvementsto the property, or in connection with the performance of repairs thatextend the property's useful life for a period substantially longer thanthe average period for which such property is used by customers; and (<T3>3</T3>) Services, provided in connection with the use of any improvedreal property, that are similar to those commonly provided in connectionwith long-term rentals of high-grade commercial or residential real property(e.g., cleaning and maintenance of common areas, routine repairs, trashcollection, elevator service, and security at entrances or perimeters).(v) <T3>Extraordinary personal services. </T3>For purposes of paragraph (e)(3)(ii)(C)of this section, extraordinary personal services are provided in connectionwith making property available for use by customers only if the servicesprovided in connection with the use of the property are performed by individuals,and the use by customers of the property is incidental to their receiptof such services. For example, the use by patients of a hospital's boardingfacilities generally is incidental to their receipt of the personal servicesprovided by the hospital's medical and nursing staff. Similarly, the useby students of a boarding school's dormitories generally is incidentalto their receipt of the personal services provided by the school's teachingstaff.(vi) <T3>Rental of property incidental to a nonrental activity of the taxpayer</T3>_(A)<T3>In general. </T3>For purposes of paragraph (e)(3)(ii)(D) of this section,the rental of property shall be treated as incidental to a nonrental activityof the taxpayer only to the extent provided in this paragraph (e)(3)(vi).(B) <T3>Property held for investment. </T3>The rental of property during ataxable year shall be treated as incidental to an activity of holding suchproperty for investment if and only if_ (<T3>1</T3>) The principal purpose for holding the property during suchtaxable year is to realize gain from the appreciation of the property (withoutregard to whether it is expected that such gain will be realized from thesale or exchange of the property in its current state of development);and (<T3>2</T3>) The gross rental income from the property for such taxableyear is less than two percent of the lesser of_(<T3>i</T3>) The unadjusted basis of such property; and(<T3>ii</T3>) The fair market value of such property.(C) <T3>Property used in a trade or business.</T3> The rental of property duringa taxable year shall be treated as incidental to a trade or business activity(within the meaning of paragraph (e)(2) of this section) if and only if_(<T3>1</T3>) The taxpayer owns an interest in such trade or business activityduring the taxable year;(<T3>2</T3>) The property was predominantly used in such trade or businessactivity during the taxable year or during at least two of the five taxableyears that immediately precede the taxable year; and (<T3>3</T3>) The gross rental income from such property for the taxableyear is less than two percent of the lesser of_(<T3>i</T3>) The unadjusted basis of such property; and (<T3>ii</T3>) The fair market value of such property.(D) <T3>Property held for sale to customers. </T3>The rental of property duringthe taxable year in which the property is sold or exchanged (in a transactionin which gain or loss is recognized) shall be treated as incidental toan activity of dealing in such property if at the time of the sale or exchangethe property is held by the taxpayer primarily for sale to customers inthe ordinary course of a trade or business of the taxpayer (within themeaning of section 1221(1)).(E) <T3>Lodging rented for convenience of employer.</T3> The provision of lodgingto an employee or to an employee's spouse or dependents shall be treatedas incidental to the activity (or activities) of the taxpayer in whichthe employee performs services if such lodging is furnished for the taxpayer'sconvenience (within the meaning of section 119).(F) <T3>Unadjusted basis.</T3> For purposes of this paragraph (e)(3)(vi), theterm ``unadjusted basis'' means adjusted basis determined without regardto any adjustment described in section 1016 that decreases basis.(vii) <T3>Property made available for use in a nonrental activity conducted bya partnership, S corporation, or joint venture in which the taxpayer ownsan interest.</T3> If the taxpayer owns an interest in a partnership, Scorporation, or joint venture conducting an activity other than a rentalactivity, and the taxpayer provides property for use in the activity inthe taxpayer's capacity as an owner of an interest in such partnership,S corporation, or joint venture, the provision of such property is nota rental activity. Thus, if a partner contributes the use of property toa partnership, none of the partner's distributive share of partnershipincome is income from a rental activity unless the partnership is engagedin a rental activity. In addition, a partner's gross income attributableto a payment described in section 707(c) is not income from a rental activityunder any circumstances (see andSection; 1.469-2T (e)(2)). The determinationof whether property used in an activity is provided by the taxpayer inthe taxpayer's capacity as an owner of an interest in a partnership, Scorporation, or joint venture shall be made on the basis of all of thefacts and circumstances. (viii) <T3>Examples.</T3> The following examples illustrate the application ofthis paragraph (e)(3):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1).</T3> The taxpayer is engaged in an activity of leasingphotocopying equipment. The average period of customer use for the equipmentexceeds 30 days. Pursuant to the lease agreements, skilled techniciansemployed by the taxpayer maintain the equipment and service malfunctioningequipment for no additional charge. Service calls occur frequently (threetimes per week on average) and require substantial labor. The value ofthe maintenance and repair services (measured by the cost to the taxpayerof employees performing these services) exceeds 50 percent of the amountcharged for the use of the equipment. Under these facts, services performedby individuals are provided in connection with the use of the photocopyingequipment, but the customers' use of the photocopying equipment is notincidental to their receipt of the services. Therefore, extraordinary personalservices (within the meaning of paragraph (e)(3)(v) of this section) arenot provided in connection with making the photocopying equipment availablefor use by customers, and the activity is a rental activity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2)</T3>. The facts are the same as in example (1), exceptthat the average period of customer use for the photocopying equipmentexceeds seven days but does not exceed 30 days. Under these facts, significantpersonal services (within the meaning of paragraph (e)(3)(iv) of this section)are provided in connection with making the photocopying equipment availablefor use by customers and, under paragraph (e)(3)(ii)(B) of this section,the activity is not a rental activity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (3).</T3> The taxpayer is engaged in an activity of transportinggoods for customers. In conducting the activity, the taxpayer providestractor-trailers to transport goods for customers pursuant to arrangementsunder which the tractor-trailers are selected by the taxpayer, may be replacedat the sole option of the taxpayer, and are operated and maintained bydrivers and mechanics employed by the taxpayer. The average period of customeruse for the tractor-trailers exceeds 30 days. Under these facts, the useof tractor-trailers by the taxpayer's customers is incidental to theirreceipt of personal services provided by the taxpayer. Accordingly, theservices performed in the activity are extraordinary personal services(within the meaning of paragraph (e)(3)(v) of this section) and, underparagraph (e)(3)(ii)(C) of this section, the activity is not a rental activity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (4).</T3> The taxpayer is engaged in an activity of owningand operating a residential apartment hotel. For the taxable year, theaverage period of customer use for apartments exceeds seven days but doesnot exceed 30 days. In addition to cleaning public entrances, exists, stairways,and lobbies, and collecting and removing trash, the taxpayer provides adaily maid and linen service at no additional charge. All of the servicesother than maid and linen service are excluded services (within the meaningof paragraph (e)(3)(iv)(B) of this section), because such services aresimilar to those commonly provided in connection with long-term rentalsof high-grade residential real property. The value of the maid and linenservices (measured by the cost to the taxpayer of employees performingsuch services) is less than 10 percent of the amount charged to tenantsfor occupancy of apartments. Under these facts, neither significant personalservices (within the meaning of paragraph (e)(3)(iv) of this section) norextraordinary personal services (within the meaning of paragraph (e)(3)(v)of this section) are provided in connection with making apartments availablefor use by customers. Accordingly, the activity is a rental activity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (5).</T3> The taxpayer owns 1,000 acres of unimproved landwith a fair market value of $350,000 and an unadjusted basis of $210,000.The taxpayer holds the land for the principal purpose of realizing gainfrom appreciation. In order to defray the cost of carrying the land, thetaxpayer leases the land to a rancher, who uses the land to graze cattleand pays rent of $4,000 per year. Thus, the gross rental income from theland is less than two percent of the lesser of the fair market value andthe unadjusted basis of the land (.02andmultiply;$210,000=$4,200). Accordingly,under paragraph (e)(3)(ii)(D) of this section, the rental of the land isnot a rental activity because the rental is treated under paragraph (e)(3)(vi)(B)of this section as incidental to an activity of holding the property forinvestment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (6). </T3>(i) A calendar year taxpayer owns an interest ina farming activity which is a trade or business activity (within the meaningof paragraph (e)(2) of this section) and owns farmland which was used inthe farming activity in 1985 and 1986. The fair market value of the farmlandis $350,000 and its unadjusted basis is $210,000. In 1987, 1988, and 1989,the taxpayer continues to own an interest in the farming activity but doesnot use the land in the activity. In 1987, the taxpayer leases the landfor $4,000 to a rancher, who uses the land to graze cattle. In 1988, thetaxpayer leases the land for $10,000 to a film production company, whichuses the land to film scenes for a movie. In 1989, the taxpayer again leasesthe land for $4,000 to the rancher.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) For 1987 and 1989, the taxpayer owns an interest in a trade orbusiness activity, and the farmland which the taxpayer leases to the rancherwas used in such activity for two out of the five immediately precedingtaxable years. In addition, the gross rental income from the land ($4,000)is less than two percent of the lesser of the fair market value and theunadjusted basis of the land (.02x$210,000=$4,200). Accordingly, the taxpayer'srental of the land is treated under paragraph (e)(3)(vi)(C) of this sectionas incidental to the taxpayer's farming activity, and is not a rental activity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Because the taxpayer's gross rental income from the land for1988 ($10,000) is not less than two percent of the lesser of the fair marketvalue and the unadjusted basis of the land, the requirement of paragraph(e)(3)(vi)(C)(<T3>3</T3>) of this section is not met. Therefore, the taxpayer's rentalof the land in 1988 is not treated as incidental to the taxpayer's farmingactivity and is a rental activity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (7). </T3>(i) In 1988, the taxpayer acquires vacant land forthe purpose of constructing a shopping mall. Before commencing construction,the taxpayer leases the land under a one-year lease to an automobile dealer,who uses the land to park cars held in its inventory. The taxpayer commencesconstruction of the shopping mall in 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) The taxpayer acquired the land for the principal purpose of constructingthe shopping mall, not for the principal purpose or realizing gain fromthe appreciation of the property. Therefore, the rental of the propertyin 1988 is not treated under paragraph (e)(3)(vi)(B) of this section asincidental to an activity of holding the property for investment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) The land has not been used in any taxable year in any tradeor business of the taxpayer. Therefore, the rental of the property in 1988is not treated under paragraph (e)(3)(vi)(C) of this section as incidentalto a trade or business activity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Since the rental of the land in 1988 is not treated under paragraph(e)(3)(vi) of this section as incidental to a nonrental activity of thetaxpayer, the rental of the land in 1988 is a rental activity. See andSection;1.469-2T(f)(3) for a special rule relating to the treatment of gross incomefrom the rental of nondepreciable property.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (8). </T3>The taxpayer makes farmland available to a tenantfarmer pursuant to an arrangement designated a ``crop-share lease.'' Underthe arrangement, the tenant is required to use the tenant's best effortsto farm the land and produce marketable crops. The taxpayer is obligatedto pay 50 percent of the costs incurred in the activity (without regardto whether any crops are successfully produced or marketed), and is entitledto 50 percent of the crops produced (or 50 percent of the proceeds frommarketing the crops). For purposes of paragraph (e)(3)(vii) of this section,the taxpayer is treated as providing the farmland for use in a farmingactivity conducted by a joint venture in the taxpayer's capacity as anowner of an interest in the joint venture. Accordingly, under paragraph(e)(3)(ii)(F) of this section, the taxpayer is not engaged in a rentalactivity, without regard to whether the taxpayer performs any servicesin the farming activity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (9). </T3>The taxpayer owns a taxicab which the taxpayer operatesduring the day and leases to another driver for use at night under a one-yearlease. Under the terms of the lease, the other driver is charged a fixedrental for use of the taxicab. Assume that, under the rules to be containedin andSection; 1.469-4T, the taxpayer is engaged in two separate activities,an activity of operating the taxicab and an activity of making the taxicabavailable for use by the other driver. Under these facts, the period forwhich the other driver uses the taxicab exceeds 30 days, and the taxpayerdoes not provide extraordinary personal services in connection with makingthe taxicab available to the other driver. Accordingly, the lease of thetaxicab is a rental activity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (10). </T3>The taxpayer operates a golf course. Some customersof the golf course pay green fees upon each use of the golf course, whileother customers purchase weekly, monthly, or annual passes. The golf courseis open to all customers from sunrise to sunset every day of the year exceptcertain holidays and days on which the taxpayer determines that the courseis to wet for play. The taxpayer thus makes the golf course available duringprescribed hours for nonexclusive use by various customers. Accordingly,under paragraph (e)(3)(ii)(E) of this section, the taxpayer is not engagedin a rental activity, without regard to the average period of customeruse for the golf course.</ITAG>(4) <T3>Special rule for oil and gas working interests</T3>_(i) <T3>In general. </T3>Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (e)(4)(ii)of this section, an interest in an oil or gas well drilled or operatedpursuant to a working interest (within the meaning of paragraph (e)(4)(iv)of this section) of a taxpayer is not an interest in a passive activityfor the taxpayer's taxable year (without regard to whether the taxpayermaterially participates in such activity) if at any time during such taxableyear the taxpayer holds such working interest either_(A) Directly; or(B) Through an entity that does not limit the liability of the taxpayerwith respect to the drilling or operation of such well pursuant to suchworking interest.(ii) <T3>Exception for deductions attributable to a period during which liabilityis limited</T3>_(A) <T3>In general. </T3>If paragraph (e)(4)(i) of this section applies fora taxable year to the taxpayer's interest in an oil or gas well that would,but for the application of paragraph (e)(4)(i) of this section, by an interestin a passive activity for the taxable year, and the taxpayer has a netloss (within the meaning of paragraph (e)(4)(ii)(C)(<T3>3</T3>) of this section) from the well for the taxable year_(<T3>1</T3>) The taxpayer's disqualified deductions (within the meaningof paragraph (e)(4)(ii)(C)(<T3>2</T3>) of this section) from such oil or gas well for such year shallbe treated as passive activity deductions for such year (within the meaningof andSection; 1.469-2T(d)); and(<T3>2</T3>) A ratable portion (within the meaning of paragraph (e)(4)(ii)(C)(<T3>4</T3>) of this section) of the taxpayer's gross income from such oilor gas well for such year shall be treated as passive activity gross incomefor such year (within the meaning of andSection; 1.469-2T(c)). (B) <T3>Coordination with rules governing the identification of disallowedpassive activity deductions. </T3>If gross income and deductions from anactivity for a taxable year are treated as passive activity gross incomeand passive activity deductions under paragraph (e)(4)(ii)(A) of this section,such activity shall be treated as a passive activity for such year forpurposes of applying paragraph (f) (2) and (4) of this section.(C) <T3>Meaning of certain terms. </T3>For purposes of this paragraph (e)(4)(ii),the following terms shall have the meanings set forth below:(<T3>1</T3>) <T3>Allocable deductions. </T3>The deductions allocable to a taxable yearare any deductions that arise in such year (within the meaning of andSection;1.469-2T (d)(8)) and any deductions that are treated as deductions forsuch year under paragraph (f)(4) of this section. (<T3>2</T3>) <T3>Disqualified deductions. </T3>The taxpayer's ``disqualified deductions''from an oil or gas well for a taxable year are the taxpayer's deductions_(<T3>i</T3>) That are attributable to such well and allocable to the taxableyear; and (<T3>ii</T3>) With respect to which economic performance (within the meaningof section 461(h), without regard to section 461 (h)(3) or (i)(2)) occursat a time during which the taxpayer's only interest in the working interestis held through an entity that limits the taxpayer's liability with respectto the drilling or operation of such well. (<T3>3</T3>) <T3>Net loss. </T3>The ``net loss'' of a taxpayer from an oil or gas wellfor a taxable year equals the amount by which the taxpayer's deductionsthat are attributable to such oil or gas well and allocable to such yearexceeds the gross income of the taxpayer from such well for such year.(<T3>4</T3>) <T3>Ratable portion. </T3>The ``ratable portion'' of the taxpayer's grossincome from an oil or gas well for a taxable year equals the total amountof such gross income multiplied by the fraction obtained by dividing_(<T3>i</T3>) The disqualified deductions from such oil or gas well for thetaxable year; by(<T3>ii</T3>) The total amount of the deductions that are attributable tosuch oil or gas well and allocable to the taxable year.(iii) <T3>Examples. </T3>The following examples illustrate the application ofparagraphs (e)(4) (i) and (ii) of this section:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1). </T3>(i) A, a calendar year individual, acquires on January1, 1987, a general partnership interest in P, a calendar year partnershipthat holds a working interest in an oil or gas property. Pursuant to thepartnership agreement, A is entitled to convert the general partnershipinterest into a limited partnership interest at any time. On December 1,1987, pursuant to a contract with D, an independent drilling contractor,P commences drilling a single well pursuant to the working interest. Underthe drilling contract, P pays D for the drilling only as the work is performed.All drilling costs are deducted by P in the year in which they are paid.At the end of 1987, A converts the general partnership interest into alimited partnership interest, effective immediately. The drilling of thewell is completed on February 28, 1988. A's interest in the well wouldbut for this paragraph (e)(4) be an interest in a passive activity. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Throughout 1987, A holds the working interest through an entitythat does not limit A's liability with respect to the drilling of the wellpursuant to the working interest. In 1988, however, A holds the workinginterest through an entity that limits A's liability with respect to thedrilling and operation of the well throughout such year. Accordingly, underparagraph (e)(4)(i) of this section, A's interest in P's well is not aninterest in a passive activity for 1987 but is an interest in a passiveactivity for 1988. Moreover, since economic performance occurs in 1987with respect to all items of deduction for drilling costs that are allocableto 1987, A has no disqualified deductions for 1987.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2). </T3>The facts are the same as in example (1), exceptthat all costs of drilling under the contract with D (including costs ofdrilling performed after 1987) are paid before the end of 1987 and A hasa net loss for 1987. In addition, A has $15,000 of total deductions thatare attributable to the well and allocable to 1987, but economic performance(as that term is used in paragraph (e)(4)(ii)(C)(<T3>2</T3>)(<T3>ii</T3>) of this section) does not occur with respect to $5,000 ofthose deductions until 1988. Under paragraph (e)(4)(ii) of this section,the $5,000 of deductions with respect to which economic performance occursin 1988 are disqualified deductions and are treated as passive activitydeductions for 1987. In addition, one-third ($5,000/$15,000) of A's grossincome from the well for 1987 is treated as passive activity gross income.</ITAG>(iv) <T3>Definition of ``working interest.'' </T3>For purposes of section 469and the regulations thereunder, the term ``working interest'' means anoperating mineral interest (within the meaning of section 614(d) and theregulations thereunder).(v) <T3>Entities that limit liability_</T3>(A) <T3>General rule. </T3>For purposes of paragraph (e)(4)(i)(B) of this section,an entity limits the liability of the taxpayer with respect to the drillingor operation of a well pursuant to a working interest held through suchentity if the taxpayer's interest in the entity is in the form of_(<T3>1</T3>) A limited partnership interest in a partnership in which thetaxpayer is not a general partner;(<T3>2</T3>) Stock in a corporation; or(<T3>3</T3>) An interest in any entity (other than a limited partnershipor corporation) that, under applicable State law, limits the potentialliability of a holder of such an interest for all obligations of the entityto a determinable fixed amount (for example, the sum of the taxpayer'scapital contributions).(B) <T3>Other limitations disregarded. </T3>For purposes of this paragraph(e)(4), protection against loss through any of the following is not takeninto account in determining whether a taxpayer holds a working interestthrough an entity that limits the taxpayer's liability:   (<T3>1</T3>) An indemnification agreement;   (<T3>2</T3>) A stop loss arrangement;   (<T3>3</T3>) Insurance;   (<T3>4</T3>) Any similar arrangement; or   (<T3>5</T3>) Any combination of the foregoing.   (C) <T3>Examples. </T3>The following examples illustrate the application ofthis paragraph (e)(4)(v):   <ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1). </T3>A owns a 20 percent interest as a general partnerin the capital and profits of P, a partnership which owns oil or gas workinginterests. The other partners of P agree to indemnify A against liabilityin excess of A's capital contribution for any of P's costs and expenseswith respect to P's working interests. As a general partner, however, Ais jointly and severally liable for all of P's liabilities and, under paragraph(e)(4)(v)(B)(<T3>1</T3>) of this section, the indemnification agreement is not takeninto account in determining whether A holds the working interests throughan entity that limits A's liability. Accordingly, the partnership doesnot limit A's liability with respect to the drilling or operation of wellspursuant to the working interests.   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2).</T3> B owns a 10 percent interest in X, an entity (otherthan a limited partnership or corporation) created under applicable Statelaw to hold working interests in oil or gas properties. Under applicableState law, B is liable without limitation for 10 percent of X's costs andexpenses with respect to X's working interests but is not liable for theremaining 90 percent of such costs and expenses. Since B's liability forthe obligations of X is not limited to a determinable fixed amount (withinthe meaning of paragraph (e)(4)(v)(A)(<T3>3</T3>) of this section), the entity does not limit B's liability withrespect to the drilling or operation of wells pursuant to the working interests.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (3). </T3>C is both a general partner and a limited partnerin a partnership that owns a working interest in oil or gas property. BecauseC owns an interest as a general partner in each well drilled pursuant tothe working interest, C's entire interest in each well drilled pursuantto the working interest is treated under paragraph(e)(4)(i) of this sectionas an interest in an activity that is not a passive activity (without regardto whether C materially participates in such activity).</ITAG>(vi) <T3>Cross reference to special rule for income from certain oil or gasproperties. </T3>A special rule relating to the treatment of income fromcertain interests in oil or gas properties is contained in andSection; 1.469-2T(c)(6).  (5) <T3>Rental of dwelling unit. </T3>An activity involving the rental of adwelling unit that is used as a residence by the taxpayer during the taxableyear (within the meaning of section 280A(c)(5)) is not a passive activityof the taxpayer for such year.   (6) <T3>Activity of trading personal property</T3>_(i) <T3>In general. </T3>An activity of trading personal property for the accountof owners of interests in the activity is not a passive activity (withoutregard to whether such activity is a trade or business activity (withinthe meaning of paragraph (e)(2) of this section)).   (ii) <T3>Personal property. </T3>For purposes of this paragraph (e)(6), theterm ``personal property'' means personal property (within the meaningof section 1092(d), without regard to paragraph (3) thereof).   (iii) <T3>Example. </T3>The following example illustrates the application ofthis paragraph (e)(6):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example. </T3>A partnership is a trader of stocks, bonds, and othersecurities (within the meaning of section 1236(c)). The capital employedby the partnership in the trading activity consists of amounts contributedby the partners in exchange for their partnership interests, and fundsborrowed by the partnership. The partnership derives gross income fromthe activity in the form of interest, dividends, and capital gains. Underthese facts, the partnership is treated as conducting an activity of tradingpersonal property for the account of its partners. Accordingly, under thisparagraph (e)(6), the activity is not a passive activity.</ITAG>(f) <T3>Treatment of disallowed passive activity losses and credits</T3>_(1)<T3>Scope of this paragraph. </T3>The rules in this paragraph (f)_   (i) Identify the passive activity deductions that are disallowed for anytaxable year in which all or a portion of the taxpayer's passive activityloss is disallowed under paragraph (a)(1)(i) of this section;   (ii) Identify the credits from passive activities that are disallowed forany taxable year in which all or a portion of the taxpayer's passive activitycredit is disallowed under paragraph (a)(1)(i) of this section; and             (iii) Provide for the carryover of disallowed deductions and credits.(2) <T3>Identification of disallowed passive activity deductions</T3>_(i) <T3>Allocation of disallowed passive activity loss among activities</T3>_(A)<T3>General rule.</T3> If all or any portion of the taxpayer's passiveactivity loss is disallowed for the taxable year under paragraph (a)(1)(i)of this section, a ratable portion of the loss (if any) from each passiveactivity of the taxpayer is disallowed. For purposes of the preceding sentence,the ratable portion of a loss from an activity is computed by multiplyingthe passive activity loss that is disallowed for the taxable year by thefraction obtained by dividing_(<T3>1</T3>) The loss from the activity for the taxable year; by(<T3>2</T3>) The sum of the losses for the taxable year from all activitieshaving losses for such year.(B) <T3>Loss from an activity. </T3>For purposes of this paragraph (f)(2)(i),the term ``loss from an activity'' means_(<T3>1</T3>) The amount by which the passive activity deductions from theactivity for the taxable year (within the meaning of andSection; 1.469-2T(d))exceed the passive activity gross income from the activity for the taxableyear (within the meaning of andSection; 1.469-2T(c)); reduced by(<T3>2</T3>) Any part of such amount that is allowed under section 469(i)and the rules to be contained in andSection; 1.469-9T (relating to the $25,000allowance for certain rental real estate activities).(C) <T3>Significant participation passive activities. </T3>If the taxpayer'spassive activity gross income from significant participation passive activities(within the meaning of andSection; 1.469-2T(f) (2)(ii)) for the taxable year(determined without regard to andSection; 1.469-2T(f)(2) through (4)) exceedsthe taxpayer's passive activity deductions from such activities for thetaxable year, such activities shall be treated, solely for purposes ofapplying this paragraph (f)(2)(i) for the taxable year, as a single activitythat does not have a loss for such taxable year.(D) <T3>Examples. </T3>The following examples illustrate the application ofthis paragraph (f)(2)(i):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1). </T3>An individual holds interests in three passive activities,A, B, and C. The gross income and deductions from these activities forthe taxable year are as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L2,b2,tp0,p6,6/7,i1,s10,7)0,8)0,7)0,8)0</C> <H1> </H1><H1>A</H1><H1>B</H1><H1>C</H1><H1>Total</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Gross income <D>$7,000</D><D>$4,000</D><D>$12,000</D><D>$23,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Deductions<D>(16,000)</D><D>(20,000)</D><D>(8,000)</D><D>(44,000)</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Net income (loss)</ITAG><D>($9,000)</D><D>($16,000)</D><D>$4,000</D><D>($21,000)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The taxpayer's $21,000 passive activity loss for the taxable yearis disallowed under paragraph (a)(1)(i) of this section. Therefore, a ratableportion of the losses from activities A and B is disallowed. The disallowedportion of each loss is determined as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L0,tp0,p0,8/9,g1,t1,i1,s100,7</C> <H1> </H1><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="1">A: $21,000 andmultiply; $9,000/$25,000<D>$7,560</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">B: $21,000 andmultiply; $16,000/$25,000<D>$13,440</D><R>n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Total</ITAG><D>$21,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2)</T3>. An individual holds interests in four passive activities,A, B, C, and D. The results of operations of these activities for the taxableyear are as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>6,L2,tp0,i1,s200,9)0,9)0,9)0,9)0,9)0</C> <H1> </H1><H1>A</H1><H1>B</H1><H1>C</H1><H1>D</H1><H1>Total</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Gross income<D>15,000</D><D>5,000</D><D>10,000</D><D>10,000</D><D>40,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Deductions<D>(5,000)</D><D>(10,000)</D><D>(20,000)</D><D>(8,000)</D><D>(43,000)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Net income (loss)</ITAG><D>10,000</D><D>(5,000)</D><D>(10,000)</D><D>2,000</D><D>(3,000)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Activities A and B are significant participation passive activities(within the meaning of andSection; 1.469-2T(f)(2)(ii)). The gross incomefrom these activities for the taxable year ($20,000) exceeds the passiveactivity deductions from those activities for the taxable year ($15,000)by $5,000 and, under andSection; 1.469-2T(f)(2), $5,000 of gross income fromthose activities is treated as not from a passive activity. Therefore,solely for purposes of applying this paragraph (f)(2)(i) for the taxableyear, activities A and B are treated as a single activity that does nothave a loss for the taxable year. Under andSection; 1.469-2T(b), the taxpayer'spassive activity loss for the taxable year is $8,000 ($43,000 of passiveactivity deductions minus $35,000 of passive activity gross income). Theresults of treating activities A and B as a single activity that does nothave a loss for the taxable year is that none of the $8,000 passive activityloss is allocated under this paragraph (f)(2)(i) to activity B for thetaxable year, even though the taxpayer incurred a loss in that activityfor the taxable year.</ITAG>(ii) <T3>Allocation within loss activities</T3>_(A) <T3>In general.</T3> If all or any portion of a taxpayer's loss from anactivity is disallowed under paragraph (f)(2)(i) of this section for thetaxable year, a ratable portion of each passive activity deduction (otherthan an excluded deduction (within the meaning of paragraph (f)(2)(ii)(B)of this section)) of the taxpayer from such activity is disallowed. Forpurposes of the preceding sentence, the ratable portion of a passive activitydeduction of a taxpayer is the amount of the disallowed portion of thetaxpayer's loss from the activity (within the meaning of paragraph (f)(2)(i)(B)of this section) for the taxable year multiplied by the fraction obtainedby dividing_ (<T3>1</T3>) The amount of such deduction; by(<T3>2</T3>) The sum of all passive activity deductions (other than excludeddeductions (within the meaning of paragraph (f)(2)(ii)(B) of this section))of the taxpayer from such activity from the taxable year.(B) <T3>Excluded deductions. </T3>The term ``excluded deduction'' means anypassive activity deduction of a taxpayer that is taken into account incomputing the taxpayer's net income from an item of property for a taxableyear in which an amount of the taxpayer's gross income from such item ofproperty is treated as not from a passive activity under andSection; 1.469-2T(c)(6)or andSection; 1.469-2T(f) (5), (6), or (7).(iii) <T3>Separately identified deductions. </T3>In identifying the deductionsfrom an activity that are disallowed under this paragraph (f)(2), the taxpayerneed not account separately for a deduction unless such deduction may,if separately taken into account, result in an income tax liability forany taxable year different from that which would result were such deductionnot taken into account separately. For related rules applicable to partnershipsand S corporations, see andSection; 1.702-1(a)(8)(ii) and section 1366(a)(1)(A),respectively. Deductions that must be accounted for separately include(but are not limited to) deductions that_(A) Arise in a rental real estate activity (within the meaning of section469(i) and the rules to be contained in andSection; 1.469-9T) in taxableyears in which the taxpayer actively participates (within the meaning ofsection 469(i) and the rules to be contained in andSection; 1.469-9T) insuch activity;(B) Arise in a rental real estate activity (within the meaning of section469(i) and the rules to be contained in andSection; 1.469-9T) in taxableyears in which the taxpayer does not actively participate (within the meaningof section 469(i) and the rules to be contained in andSection; 1.469-9T)in such activity; or(C) Are taken into account under section 1211 (relating to the limitationon capital losses) or section 1231 (relating to property used in a tradeor business and involuntary conversions).(3) <T3>Identification of disallowed credits from passive activities</T3>_(i)<T3>General rule. </T3>If all or any portion of the taxpayer's passiveactivity credit is disallowed for the taxable year under paragraph (a)(1)(ii)of this section, a ratable portion of each credit from each passive activityof the taxpayer is disallowed. For purposes of the preceding sentence,the ratable portion of a credit of a taxpayer is computed by multiplyingthe portion of the taxpayer's passive activity credit that is disallowedfor the taxable year by the fraction obtained by dividing_(A) The amount of the credit; by(B) The sum of all of the taxpayer's credits from passive activities forthe taxable year.(ii) <T3>Coordination rule. </T3>For purposes of paragraph (f)(3)(i) of thissection, the credits from a passive activity do not include any creditor portion of a credit that_(A) Is allowed for the taxable year under section 469(i) and the rulesto be contained in andSection; 1.469-9T (relating to the $25,000 allowancefor certain rental real estate activities); or (B) Increases the basis of property during the taxable year under section469(j)(9) and the rules to be contained in andSection; 1.469-6T (relatingto the election to increase the basis of certain property by disallowedcredits).(iii) <T3>Separately identified credits. </T3>In identifying the credits froman activity that are disallowed under this paragraph (f)(3), the taxpayerneed not account separately for any credit unless such credit may, if separatelytaken into account, result in an income tax liability for any taxable yeardifferent from that which would result were such credit not taken intoaccount separately. For related rules applicable to partnerships and Scorporations, see andSection; 1.702-1(a)(8)(ii) and section 1366(a)(1)(A),respectively. Credits that must be accounted for separately include (butare not limited to)_(A) Credits (other than the low-income housing and rehabilitation investmentcredits) from a rental real estate activity (within the meaning of section469(i) and the rules to be contained in andSection; 1.469-9T) that arisein a taxable year in which the taxpayer actively participates (within themeaning of section 469(i) and the rules to be contained in andSection; 1.469-9T)in such activity;(B) Credits (other than the low-income housing and rehabilitation investmentcredits) from a rental real estate activity (within the meaning of section469(i) and the rules to be contained in andSection; 1.469-9T) that arisein a taxable year in which the taxpayer does not actively participate (withinthe meaning of section 469(i) and the rules to be contained in andSection;1.469-9T) in such activity;(C) Low-income housing and rehabilitation investment credits from a rentalreal estate activity (within the meaning of section 469(i) and the rulesto be contained in andSection; 1.469-9T); and(D) Any credit that is subject to the limitations of sections 26(a), 28(d)(2),29(b)(5), or 38(c) in a manner that differs from the manner in which anyother credit is subject to such limitations.(4) <T3>Carryover of disallowed deductions and credits. </T3>Any deductionor credit from an activity of the taxpayer that is disallowed for a taxableyear under paragraph (f)(2) or (3) of this section, respectively, shallbe treated for purposes of section 469 and the regulations thereunder asa deduction or credit, as the case may be, from such activity for the taxpayer'simmediately succeeding taxable year. The following example illustratesthe application of this pragraph (f)(4):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example. </T3>The facts are the same as in example (1) in paragraph(f)(2)(i)(D) of this section. The $7,560 of loss from activity A and the$13,440 of loss from activity B that are disallowed for the taxable yearunder paragraph (f)(2) of this section are allocated among the passiveactivity deductions from those activities for such year under paragraph(f)(2)(ii) of this section and are treated under this paragraph (f)(4)as deductions from activities A and B, respectively, for the succeedingtaxable year.</ITAG>(g) <T3>Application of these rules to C corporations</T3>_(1) <T3>In general. </T3>Except as otherwise provided in the rules to be containedin paragraph (k) of this section, section 469 and the regulations thereunderdo not apply to any corporation that is not a personal service corporationor a closely held corporation for the taxable year. See paragraphs (g)(4) and (5) of this section for special rules for computing the passiveactivity loss and passive activity credit, respectively, of a closely heldcorporation.(2) <T3>Definitions. </T3>For purposes of section 469 and the regulations thereunder_(i) The term ``personal service corporation'' means a C corporation thatis a personal service corporation for the taxable year (within the meaningof andSection; 1.441-4T(d)); and(ii) The term ``closely held corporation'' means a C corporation that meetsthe stock ownership requirements of section 542(a)(2) (taking into accountthe modifications in section 465(a)(3)) for the taxable year and is nota personal service corporation for such year.(3) <T3>Participation of corporations</T3>_(i) <T3>Material participation. </T3>For purposes of section 469 and the regulationsthereunder, a corporation described in paragraph (g)(2) of this sectionshall be treated as materially participating in an activity for a taxableyear if and only if_(A) One or more individuals, each of whom is treated under paragraph (g)(3)(iii)of this section as materially participating in such activity for the taxableyear, directly or indirectly hold (in the aggregate) more than 50 percent(by value) of the outstanding stock of such corporation; or(B) In the case of a closely held corporation (within the meaning of paragraph(g)(2)(ii) of this section), the requirements of section 465(c)(7)(C) (withoutregard to clause (iv) thereof and taking into account section 465(c)(7)(D))are met with respect to such activity.(ii) <T3>Significant participation. </T3>For purposes of andSection; 1.469-2T(f)(2),an activity of a corporation described in paragraph (g)(2) of this sectionshall be treated as a significant participation passive activity for ataxable year if and only if_(A) The corporation is not treated as materially participating in suchactivity for the taxable year; and(B) One or more individuals, each of whom is treated under paragraph (g)(3)(iii)of this section as significantly participating in such activity, directlyor indirectly hold (in the aggregate) more than 50 percent (by value) ofthe outstanding stock of such corporation.(iii) <T3>Participation of individual. </T3>Whether an individual is treatedfor purposes of this paragraph (g)(3) as materially participating or significantlyparticipating in an activity of a corporation shall be determined underthe rules of andSection; 1.469-5T, except that in applying such rules_(A) All activities of the corporation shall be treated as activities inwhich the individual holds an interest in determining whether the individualparticipates (within the meaning of andSection; 1.469-5T(f)) in an activityof the corporation; and(B) The individual's participation in all activities other than activitiesof the corporation shall be disregarded in determining whether the individual'sparticipation in an activity of the corporation is treated as materialparticipation under andSection; 1.469-5T(a)(4) (relating to material participationin significant participation activities).(4) <T3>Modified computation of passive activity loss in the case of closelyheld corporations.</T3>_(i) <T3>In general. </T3>A closely held corporation's passive activity lossfor the taxable year is the amount, if any, by which the corporation'spassive activity deductions for the taxable year (within the meaning ofandSection; 1.469-2T(d)) exceed the sum of_(A) The corporation's passive activity gross income for the taxable year(within the meaning of andSection; 1.469-2T(c)); and(B) The corporation's net active income for the taxable year.  (ii) <T3>Net active income</T3>. For purposes of this paragraph (g)(4), a corporation'snet active income for the taxable year is such corporation's taxable incomefor the taxable year, determined without regard to the following itemsfor the year:  (A) Passive activity gross income;(B) Passive activity deductions; (C) Portfolio income (within the meaning of andSection;1.469-2T(c)(3)(i)),including any gross income that is treated as portfolio income under anyother provision of the regulations (see, e.g., andSection;1.469-2T(c)(2)(iii)(E)(relating to gain from the disposition of substantially appreciated propertyformerly held for investment) and andSection;1.469-2T(f)(10) (relating tocertain recharacterized passive activity gross income);  (D) Gross income that is treated under andSection;1.469-2T(c)(6) (relatingto gross income from certain oil or gas properties) as not from a passiveactivity;  (E) Gross income and deductions from any trade or business activity (withinthe meaning of paragraph (e)(2) of this section) that is described in paragraph(e)(6) of this section (relating to certain activities of trading personalproperty) but only if the corporation did not materially participate insuch activity for the taxable year;  (F) Deductions described in andSection;1.469-2T(d)(2)(i), (ii), and (iv)(relating to certain deductions attributable to portfolio income); and (G) Interest expense allocated under andSection;1.163-8T to a portfolio expenditure(within the meaning of andSection;1.163-8T(b)(6)).  (iii) <T3>Examples</T3>. The following examples illustrate the application ofthis paragraph (g)(4):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1).</T3> (i) For 1987, X, a closely held corporation, is engagedin two activities, a trade or business activity in which X materially participatesfor 1987 and a rental activity. X also holds portfolio investments. For1987, X has the following gross income and deductions:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L0,tp0,p0,8/9,g1,t1,s120,10</C>  <H1> </H1><H1> </H1> Gross income:  <ITAG tagnum="2">Rents <D>$60,000  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Gross income from business <D>100,000  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Portfolio income <D>35,000</D><R>n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Total </ITAG><D>$195,000</D><R>n,d</R>Deductions:  <ITAG tagnum="2">Rental deductions <D>($100,000)  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Business deductions (80,000)  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Interest expense allocable to portfolio expenditures under andSection;1.163-8T<D>(10,000)  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Deductions (other than interest expense) clearly and directly allocableto portfolio income <D>(5,000)</D><R>n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Total </ITAG><D>($195,000)</D><R>n,d</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) The corporation's net active income for 1987 is $20,000, computedas follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>4,L0,tp0,p0,8/9,g1,t1,s50,10,10,10</C> <H1> </H1><H1> </H1><H1> </H1><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Gross income<D> </D><D>$195,000</D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Amounts not taken into account in computing net active income:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Rents (see paragraph (g)(4)(ii)(A) of this section)<D>$60,000</D><D> </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Portfolio income (see paragraph (g)(4)(ii)(C) of this section) <D>$35,000 </D><D>  </D><D> </D><R>n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>$95,000</D><D>($95,000)</D><D> </D><R>n,s,s,n</R><ITAG tagnum="1">Gross income taken into account in computing net active income<D> </D><D>$100,000</D><D>$100,000</D><R>n,n,d,n</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Deductions<D> </D><D>($195,000)</D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Amounts not taken into account in computing net active income:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Rental deductions (see paragraph (g)(4)(ii)(B) of this section) <D>($100,000)</D><D> </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Interest expense allocated to portfolio expenditures (see paragraph(g)(4)(ii)(G) of this section) <D>($10,000)</D><D> </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Other deductions clearly and directly allocable to portfolio income(see paragraph (g)(4)(ii)(F) of this section) <D>($5,000)</D><D> </D><D> </D><R>n,n,s,n</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>($115,000)</D><D>$115,000</D><D> </D><R>n,n,s,n</R><ITAG tagnum="1">Deductions taken into account in computing net active income<D> </D><D>($80,000)</D><D>($80,000)</D><R>n,n,d,n</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Net active income<D> </D><D> </D><D>$20,000</D><R>n,n,n,d</R></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Under paragraph(g)(4)(i) of this section, X's passive activityloss for 1987 is $20,000, the amount by which the passive activity deductionsfor the taxable year ($100,000) exceed the sum of (a) the passive activitygross income for the taxable year ($60,000) and (b) the net active incomefor the taxable year ($20,000). Under paragraph (f)(4) of this section,the $20,000 of deductions from X's rental activity that are disallowedfor 1987 are treated as deductions from the rental activity for 1988. Ifcomputed without regard to the net active income for the taxable year,X's passive activity loss would be $40,000 ($100,000 of rental deductionsminus $60,000 of rental income). Thus, the effect of the rule in paragraph(g)(4)(i) of this section is to reduce the corporation's passive activityloss for the taxable year by the amount of the corporation's net activeincome for such year.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Under these facts, X's taxable income for 1987 is $20,000, computedas follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L0,tp0,p0,8/9,g1,t1,s80,10,10</C> <H1> </H1><H1> </H1><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Gross income<D> </D><D>$195,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Deductions:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Total deductions<D>($195,000)</D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Passive activity loss<D>$20,000</D><D> </D><R>n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Allowable deductions<D>($175,000)</D><D>($175,000)</D><R>n,n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Taxable income<D> </D><D>$20,000</D><R>n,n,d</R></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2). </T3>(i) The facts are the same as in example (1), exceptthat, in 1988, X has a loss from the trade or business activity, and anet operating loss (``NOL'') of $15,000 that is carried back under section172(b) to 1987. Since NOL carrybacks are taken into account in computingnet active income, X's net active income for 1987 must be recomputed asfollows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L0,tp0,p0,8/9,g1,t1,s50,10</C> <H1> </H1><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Net active income before NOL carryback <D>$20,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">NOL carryback <D>($15,000)</D><R>n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Net active income <D>$5,000</D><R>n,d</R></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Under these facts, X's disallowed passive activity loss for 1987is $35,000, the amount by which the passive activity deductions for thetaxable year ($100,000) exceed the sum of (a) the passive activity grossincome for the taxable year ($60,000) and (b) the net active income forthe taxable year ($5,000).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Under paragraph (f)(4) of this section, the $35,000 of deductionsfrom X's rental activity that are disallowed for 1987 are treated as deductionsfrom the rental activity for 1988. X's taxable income for 1987 is $20,000,computed as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L0,tp0,p0,8/9,g1,t1,s50,10,10</C> <H1> </H1><H1> </H1><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Gross income <D>  </D><D>$195,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Deductions: <D>  </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Total deductions <D>($210,000 </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Passive activity loss <D>$35,000 </D><D> </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Allowable deductions <D>($175,000) </D><D>($175,000)</D><R>n,n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Taxable income <D>  </D><D>$20,000</D><R>n,n,d</R></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Thus, taking the NOL carryback into account in computing net activeincome for 1987 does not affect X's taxable income for 1987, but increasesthe deductions treated under paragraph (f)(4) as deductions from X's rentalactivity for 1988 and decreases X's NOL carryover to years other than 1987.</ITAG>(5) <T3>Allowance of passive activity credit of closely held corporations toextent of net active income tax liability</T3>_(i) <T3>In general. </T3>Solely for purposes of determining the amount disallowedunder paragraph (a)(1)(ii) of this section, a closely held corporation'spassive activity credit for the taxable year shall be reduced by such corporation'snet active income tax liability for such year.(ii) <T3>Net active income tax liability. </T3>For purposes of paragraph (g)(5)(i)of this section, a corporation's net active income tax liability for ataxable year is the amount (if any) by which_(A) The corporation's regular tax liability (within the meaning of section26(b)) for the taxable year, determined by reducing the corporation's taxableincome for such year by an amount equal to the excess (if any) of the corporation'spassive activity gross income for such year over the corporation's passiveactivity deductions for such year; exceeds(B) The sum of_(<T3>1</T3>) The corporation's regular tax liability for the taxable year,determined by reducing the corporation's taxable income for such year byan amount equal to the excess (if any) of the sum of the corporation'snet active income (within the meaning of paragraph (g)(4)(ii) of this section)and passive activity gross income for such year over the corporation'spassive activity deductions for such year; and(<T3>2</T3>) The corporation's credits (other than credits from passiveactivities) that are allowable for the taxable year (without regard tothe limitations contained in sections 26(a), 28(d)(2), 29(b)(5), 38(c),and 469).(h) <T3>Special rules for affiliated group filing consolidated return</T3>_(1)<T3>In general. </T3>For purposes of computing the consolidated taxableincome and tax liability of an affiliated group of corporations filinga consolidated return for the taxable year, and the separate taxable income(within the meaning of andSection; 1.1502-12) of each member of such group,section 469 and the regulations thereunder shall be applied in the mannerprovided in this paragraph (h).(2) <T3>Definitions. </T3>For purposes of this paragraph (h)_(i) The terms ``group,'' ``member,'' ``subsidiary,'' and ``consolidatedreturn year'' shall have the meanings set forth in andSection; 1.1502-1;(ii) The term ``consolidated group'' means a group filing a consolidatedreturn for the taxable year; and(iii) The term ``consolidated taxable income'' shall have the meaning setforth in andSection; 1.1502-11.(3) <T3>Disallowance of consolidated group's passive activity loss or credit.</T3>A consolidated group's passive activity loss or passive activity creditfor the taxable year shall be disallowed to the extent provided in paragraph(a) of this section. For purposes of the preceding sentence, a consolidatedgroup's passive activity loss and passive activity credit shall be determinedby taking into account the following items of each member of such group:(i) Passive activity gross income;(ii) Passive activity deductions;(iii) Net active income (in the case of a consolidated group treated asa closely held corporation under paragraph (h)(4)(ii) of this section);and(iv) Credits from passive activities.(4) <T3>Status and material participation of members_</T3>(i) <T3>Determination by reference to status and participation of group. </T3>Forpurposes of section 469 and the regulations thereunder_(A) Each member of a consolidated group shall be treated as a closely heldcorporation or personal service corporation, respectively, for the taxableyear, if and only if the consolidated group is treated (under the rulesof paragraph (h)(4)(ii) of this section) as a closely held corporationor personal service corporation for such year; and(B) The determination of whether a trade or business activity (within themeaning of paragraph (e)(2) of this section) conducted by one or more membersof a consolidated group is a passive activity of such members shall bemade by reference to the consolidated group's participation in such activity.(ii) <T3>Determination of status and material participation of consolidatedgroup. </T3>For purposes of determining under paragraph (g)(2) of thissection whether a consolidated group is treated as a closely held corporationor a personal service corporation, and determining under paragraph (g)(3)of this section whether the consolidated group materially participatesin any activity conducted by one or more members of such group_(A) The members of such consolidated group shall be treated as one corporation;(B) Only the outstanding stock of the common parent shall be treated asoutstanding stock of such corporation;(C) An employee of any member of such group shall be treated as an employeeof such corporation; and (D) An activity is treated as the principal activity of such corporationif and only if it is the principal activity (within the meaning of andSection;1.44-4T(f))of the consolidated group. (5) <T3>Modification of rules for identifying disallowed passive activity deductionsand credits</T3>_(i) <T3>Identification of disallowed deductions. </T3>In applying paragraphs(f) (2) and (4) of this section to a consolidated group for purposes ofidentifying the passive activity deductions of such consolidated groupand of each member of such consolidated group that are disallowed for thetaxable year and treated as deductions from activities for the succeedingtaxable year, the following rules shall apply: (A) A ratable portion (within the meaning of paragraph (h)(5)(ii) of thissection) of the passive activity loss of the consolidated group that isdisallowed for the taxable year shall be allocated to each member of thegroup; (B) Pararaph (f)(2) of this section shall then be applied to each memberof the group as if_ (<T3>1</T3>) Such member were a separate taxpayer; and (<T3>2</T3>) The amount allocated to such member under paragraph (h)(5)(i)(A)of this section were the amount of such member's passive activity lossthat is disallowed for the taxable year; and (C) Paragraph (f)(4) of this section shall be applied to each member ofthe group as if it were a separate taxpayer. (ii) <T3>Ratable portion of disallowed passive activity loss. </T3>For purposesof paragraph (h)(5)(i)(A) of this section, a member's ratable portion ofthe disallowed passive activity loss of the consolidated group is the amountof such disallowed loss multiplied by the fraction obtained by dividing_(A) The amount of the passive activity loss of such member of the consolidatedgroup that would be disallowed for the taxable year if the items of grossincome and deduction of such member were the only items of the group forsuch year; by (B) The sum of the amounts described in paragraph (h)(5)(ii)(A) of thissection for all members of the group. (iii) <T3>Identification of disallowed credits. </T3>In applying paragraph (f)(3)of this section to a consolidated group for purposes of identifying thecredits from passive activities of members of such consolidated group thatare disallowed for the taxable year, the consolidated group shall be treatedas one taxpayer. Thus, a ratable portion of each of the group's creditsfrom passive activities is disallowed. (6) <T3>Transactions between members of a consolidated group</T3>_(i) <T3>Scope. </T3>This paragraph (h)(6) provides rules regarding the treatment,for purposes of section 469 and the regulations thereunder, of items ofincome and deduction attributable to intercompany transactions. See paragraph(h)(6)(iv) of this section for the definition of ``intercompany transaction''and certain other terms used in this paragraph (h)(6). (ii) <T3>Recharacterization of gain or loss from intercompany transactions otherthan deferred intercompany transactions</T3>_(A) <T3>In general. </T3>If the selling member in an intercompany transaction(other than a deferred intercompany transaction) recognizes an item ofgain or loss described in andSection;1.1502-13(b) that is directly relatedto an item of deduction of the purchasing member, and both the gain orloss and the directly related item of deduction are taken into accountin computing consolidated taxable income for the same taxable year, theitems of income or deduction that are taken into account by the sellingmember in computing such gain or loss shall be taken into account in computingconsolidated taxable income for such taxable year as items of income ordeduction of the selling member from the activity to which the directlyrelated deduction of the purchasing member is attributable.(B) <T3>Recharacterization of gain or loss as portfolio items. </T3>Any itemof income or deduction of a selling member that is recharacterized underthis paragraph (h)(6)(ii) shall be treated as an item of income or deductiondescribed in andSection;1.469-2T(c)(3)(i) (relating to portfolio income)or andSection;1.469-2T(d)(2)(i) (relating to expenses clearly and directlyallocable to portfolio income), as the case may be, if and only if thedirectly related item of deduction is a deduction described in andSection;1.469-2T(d)(2)(i) or a deduction for interest expense that is allocated under andSection;1.163-8Tto a portfolio expenditure (within the meaning of andSection;1.163-8T (b)(6)).(iii) <T3>Deferred intercompany transactions</T3>_(A) <T3>In general</T3>. For purposes of section 469 and the regulations thereunder,the treatment of deferred gain or loss on a deferred intercompany transactionbetween members of a group shall be determined in accordance with thisparagraph (h)(6)(iii). (B) <T3>Deferred intercompany transactions involving property subject to depreciation,amortization, or depletion. </T3>If, for any consolidated return year,the selling member in a deferred intercompany transaction is required totake into account deferred gain or loss under andSection; 1.1502-13(d) asa result of depreciation, amortization, or depletion of a member of thegroup, then for purposes of section 469 and the regulations thereundersuch deferred gain or loss shall be taken into account for such year asgain or loss of the selling member from the activity (or activities) towhich such depreciation, amortization, or depletion deductions are attributable.(C) <T3>Restoration of deferred gain or loss on dispositions. </T3>If, forany consolidated return year, the selling member in a deferred intercompanytransaction (other than a deferred intercomapny transaction described inandSection; 1.1502-13(e)(1)) is required to take deferred gain or loss intoaccount under andSection; 1.1502-13(e)(2) or (f), then for purposes of section469 and the regulations thereunder_(<T3>1</T3>) Such deferred gain or loss shall be treated as gain or lossof the selling member from a disposition of the property involved in suchdeferred intercompany transaction at the time of (<T3>i</T3>) the event that requires such gain or loss to be taken intoaccount or (<T3>ii</T3>) in the case of a transaction described in andSection; 1.1502-13(e)(2),the disposition of such property outside the consolidated group; and(<T3>2</T3>) Such deferred gain or loss shall, except as otherwise providedin andSection; 1.1502-2T (c)(2) or (d)(5), be taken into account for suchyear as gain or loss of the selling member from the activity (or activities)of the affiliated group in which the property involved in such deferredintercompany transaction is used immediately preceding the time specifiedin paragraph (h)(6)(iii)(C)(<T3>1</T3>) of this section. See paragraph (h)(8) of this section, relating to dispositions by a memberof substantially appreciated property formerly used in a nonpassive activity.(D) <T3>Certain recharacterized items treated as portfolio items. </T3>Anydeferred gain or loss or a selling member that is recharacterized underthis paragraph (h)(6)(iii) shall be treated as an item of income or deductiondescribed in andSection; 1.469-2T(c)(3)(i) (relating to portfolio income)or andSection; 1.469-2T(d)(2)(i) (relating to expenses clearly and directlyallocable to portfolio income), as the case may be, if and only if theproperty involved in the transaction is property that produces portfolioincome (within the meaning of andSection; 1.469-2T(c)(3)((i)).(E) <T3>Property involved in deferred intercompany transaction. </T3>For purposesof this paragraph (h)(6)(iii), the property involved in a deferred intercompanytransaction is the property sold or exchanged in such transaction or theproperty with respect to which expenditures incurred in such transactionare capitalized. (iv) <T3>Definitions. </T3>For purposes of this paragraph (h)(6), the termsset forth below shall have the following meanings:(A) <T3>Deferred intercompany transaction. </T3>The term ``deferred intercompanytransaction'' shall have the meaning set forth in andSection; 1.1502-13(a)(2).(B) <T3>Directly related. </T3>An item of gross income and an item of deductionare ``directly related'' if and to the extent that the same amount paidor accrued generates both the income and the deduction, without regardto whether the income and the deduction are taken into account by the taxpayerin the same taxable year. (C) <T3>Intercompany transaction. </T3>The term ``intercompany transaction''shall have the meaning set forth in andSection; 1.1502-13(a)(1).(D) <T3>Purchasing member. </T3>The term ``purchasing member'' shall have themeaning set forth in andSection; 1.1502-13(a).(E) <T3>Selling member. </T3>The term ``selling member'' shall have the meaningset forth in andSection; 1.502-13(a).(7) <T3>Disposition of stock of a member of an affiliated group. </T3>Any gainrecognized by a member on the disposition of stock of a subsidiary (includingincome resulting from the recognition of an excess loss account under andSection;1.1502-19 (a)) shall be treated as portfolio income (within the meaningof andSection; 1.469-2T (c)(3)(i)).(8) <T3>Dispositions of property used in multiple activities. </T3>The determinationof whether andSection; 1.469-2T(c)(2)(ii) or (iii) or (d)(5)(ii) appliesto a disposition (including a deemed disposition described in paragraph(h)(6)(iii)(C)(<T3>1</T3>) of this section) of property by a member of a consolidatedgroup shall be made by treating such member as having held the propertyfor the entire period that the group has owned such property and as havingused the property in all of the activities in which the group has usedsuch property (i) [Reserved](j) <T3>Spouses filing joint return_</T3>(1) <T3>In general. </T3>Except as otherwise provided in the regulations undersection 469, spouses filing a joint return for a taxable year shall betreated for such year as one taxpayer for purposes of section 469 and theregulations thereunder Thus, for example, spouses filing a joint returnare treated as one taxpayer for purposes of_(i) Section 1.469-2T (relating generally to the computation of such taxpayer'spassive activity loss); and (ii) Paragraph (f) of this section (relating to the allocation of suchtaxpayer's disallowed passive activity loss and passive activity creditamong activities and the identification of disallowed passive activitydeductions and credits from passive activities). (2) <T3>Exceptions to treatment as one taxpayer</T3>_(i) <T3>Identification of disallowed deductions and credits. </T3>For purposesof paragraphs (f)(2)(iii) and (3) (iii) of this section, spouses filinga joint return for the taxable year must account separately for the deductionsand credits attributable to the interests of each spouse in any activity.(ii) <T3>Treatment of deductions disallowed under sections 704(d), 1366(d),and 465. </T3>Notwithstanding any other provision of this section or andSection;1.469-2T, this paragraph (j) shall not affect the application of section704(d), section 1366(d), or section 465 to taxpayers filing a joint returnfor the taxable year.(iii) <T3>Treatment of losses from working interests.</T3> Paragraph (e)(4) ofthis section (relating to losses and credits from certain interests inoil and gas wells) shall be applied by treating a husband and wife (whetheror not filing a joint return) as separate taxpayers.(3) <T3>Joint return no longer filed.</T3> If an individual_(A) Does not file a joint return for the taxable years; and (B) Filed a joint return for the immediately preceding taxable year;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">then the passive activity deductions and credits allocable to suchindividual's activities for the taxable year under paragraph (f)(4) ofthis section shall be determined by taking into account the items of deductionand credit attributable to such individual's interests in passive activitiesfor the immediately preceding taxable year. See paragraph (j)(2)(i) ofthis section.(4) <T3>Participation of spouses.</T3> Rules treating an individual's participationin an activity as participation of such individual's spouse in such activity(without regard to whether the spouses file a joint return) are containedin andSection; 1.469-5T(f)(3).(k) <T3>Former passive activities and changes in status of corporations. </T3>[Reserved]<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1.469-2T</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Passive activity loss (temporary).</ITAG>(a) <T3>Scope of this section.</T3> This section contains rules for determiningthe amount of the taxpayer's passive activity loss for the taxable yearfor purposes of section 469 and the regulations thereunder. The rules containedin this section_(1) Provide general guidance for identifying items of income and deductionthat are taken into account in determining the amount of the passive activityloss for the taxable year;(2) Specify particular items of income and deduction that are not takeninto account in determining the amount of the passive activity loss forthe taxable year; and (3) Specify the manner in which provisions of the Internal Revenue Codeand the regulations, other than section 469 and the regulations thereunder,are applied for purposes of determining the extent to which items of deductionare taken into account for a taxable year in computing the amount of thepassive activity loss for such year.(b) <T3>Definition of passive activity loss_</T3>(1) <T3>In general.</T3> In the case of a taxpayer other than a closely heldcorporation (within the meaning of andSection; 1.469-1T(g)(2)(ii)), the passiveactivity loss for the taxable year is the amount, if any, by which thepassive activity deductions for the taxable year exceed the passive activitygross income for the taxable year.(2) <T3>Cross references.</T3> See paragraph (c) of this section for the definitionof ``passive activity gross income,'' paragraph (d) of this section forthe definition of ``passive activity deduction,'' and andSection; 1.469-1T(g)(4)for the computation of the passive activity loss of a closely held corporation.(c) <T3>Passive activity gross income_</T3>(1)<T3> In general.</T3> Except as otherwise provided in the regulations undersection 469, passive activity gross income for a taxable year includesan item of gross income if and only if such income is from a passive activity.(2) <T3>Treatment of gain from disposition of an interest in an activity oran interest in property used in an activity_</T3>(i) <T3>In general</T3>_(A) <T3>Treatment of gain.</T3> Except as otherwise provided in the regulationsunder section 469, any gain recognized upon the sale, exchange or otherdisposition (a ``disposition'') of an interest in property used in an activityat the time of the disposition or of an interest in an activity held througha partnership or S corporation is treated in the following manner:(<T3>1</T3>) The gain is treated as gross income from such activity forthe taxable year or years in which it is recognized;(<T3>2</T3>) If the activity is a passive activity of the taxpayer for thetaxable year of the disposition, the gain is treated as passive activitygross income for the taxable year or years in which it is recognized; and(<T3>3</T3>) If the activity is not a passive activity of the taxpayer forthe taxable year of the disposition, the gain is treated as not from apassive activity.(B) <T3>Dispositions of partnership interests and S corporation stock. </T3>Apartnership interest or S corporation stock is not property used in anactivity for purposes of this paragraph (c)(2). See paragraph (e)(3) ofthis section for rules treating the gain recognized upon the dispositionof a partnership interest or S corporation stock as gain from the dispositionof interests in the activities in which the partnership or S corporationhas an interest.(C) <T3>Interest in property.</T3> For purposes of applying this paragraph(c)(2) to a disposition of property_(<T3>1</T3>) Any material portion of the property that was used, at anytime before the disposition, in any activity at a time when the remainderof the property was not used in such activity shall be treated as a separateinterest in property; and(<T3>2</T3>) The amount realized from the disposition and the adjusted basisof the property must be allocated among the separate interests in a reasonablemanner.(D) <T3>Examples.</T3> The following examples illustrate the application ofthis paragraph (c)(2)(i):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1).</T3> A owns an interest in a trade or business activityin which A has never materially partcipated. In 1987, A sells equipmentthat was used exclusively in the activity and realizes a gain on the sale.Under paragraph (c)(2)(i)(A)(<T3>2</T3>) of this section, the gain is passive activity gross income.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2).</T3> B owns an interest in a trade or business activityin which B materially participates for 1987. In 1987, B sells a buildingused in the activity in an installment sale and realizes a gain on thesale. B does not materially participate in the activity for 1988 or anysubsequent year. Under paragraph (c)(2)(i)(A)(<T3>3</T3>) of this section, none of B's gain from the sale (includinggain taken into account after 1987) is passive activity gross income.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (3).</T3> C enters into a contract to acquire property usedby the seller in a rental activity. Before acquiring the property pursuantto the contract, C sells all rights under the contract and realizes a gainon the sale. Since C's rights under the contract are not property usedin a rental activity, the gain is not income from a rental activity. Theresult would be the same if C owned an option to acquire the property andsold the option.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (4).</T3> D sells a ten-floor office building. D owned thebuilding for three years preceding the sale and at all times during thatperiod used seven floors of the building in a trade or business activityand three floors in a rental activity. The fair market value per squarefoot is substantially the same throughout the building, and D did not maintaina separate adjusted basis for any part of the building. Under paragraph(c)(2)(i)(C)(<T3>1</T3>) of this section, the seven floors used in the trade or businessactivity and the three floors used in the rental activity are treated asseparate interests in property. Under paragraph (c)(2)(i)(C)(<T3>2</T3>) of this section, the amount realized and the adjusted basisof the building must be allocated between the separate interests in a reasonablemanner. Under these facts, an allocation based on the square footage ofthe parts of the building used in each activity would be reasonable.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (5).</T3> The facts are the same as in example (4), exceptthat two of the seven floors used in the trade or business activity wereused in the rental activity until five months before the sale. Under paragraph(c)(2)(i)(C)(<T3>1</T3>) of this section, the five floors used exclusively in the tradeor business activity and the two floors used first in the rental activityand then in the trade or business activity are treated as separate interestsin property. See paragraph (c)(2)(ii) of this section for rules for allocatingamount realized and adjusted basis upon a disposition of an interest inproperty used in more than one activity during the 12-month period endingon the date of the disposition.</ITAG>(ii) <T3>Disposition of property used in more than one activity in 12-monthperiod preceding disposition.</T3> In the case of a disposition of an interestin property that is used in more than one activity during the 12-monthperiod ending on the date of the disposition, the amount realized fromthe disposition and the adjusted basis of such interest must be allocatedamong such activities on a basis that reasonably reflects the use of suchinterest in property during such 12-month period. For purposes of thisparagraph (c)(2)(ii), an allocation of the amount realized and adjustedbasis solely to the activity in which an iterest in property is predominantlyused during the 12-month period ending on the date of the disposition reasonablyreflects the use of such interest in property if the fair market valueof such interest does not exceed the lesser of_(A) $10,000; and (B) 10 percent of the sum of the fair market value of such interest andthe fair market value of all other property used in such activity immediatelybefore the disposition.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">The following examples illustrate the application of this paragraph(c)(2)(ii):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1). </T3>The facts are the same as in example (5) of paragraph(c)(2)(i)(D) of this section. Under paragraph (c)(2)(i)(C)(<T3>2</T3>) of this section, D allocates the amount realized and adjustedbasis of the building 30 percent to the three floors used exclusively inthe rental activity, 50 percent to the five floors used exclusively inthe trade or business activity, and 20 percent to the two floors used firstin the rental activity and then in the trade or business activity. Underthis paragraph (c)(2)(ii), the amount realized and adjusted basis allocatedto the two floors that were used in both activities during the 12-monthperiod ending on the date of the disposition must also be allocated betweensuch activities. Under these facts, an allocation of 7/12 of such amountsto the rental activity and 5/12 of such amounts to the trade or businessactivity would reasonably reflect the use of the two floors during the12-month period ending on the date of the disposition.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2).</T3> B is a limited partner in a partnership that sellsa tractor-trailer. During the 12-month period ending on the date of thesale, the tractor-trailer was used in several activities, and the partnershipallocates the amount realized from the disposition and the adjusted basisof the tractor-trailer among the activities based on the number of daysduring the 12-month period that the partnership used the tractor-trailerin each activity. Under these facts, the partnership's allocation reasonablyreflects the use of the tractor-trailer during the 12-month period endingon the date of the sale.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (3).</T3> C sells a personal computer for $8,000. During the12-month period ending on the date of the sale, 70 percent of C's use ofthe computer was in a passive activity. Immediately before the sale, thefair market value of all property used in the passive activity (includingthe personal computer) was $200,000. Under these facts, the computer waspredominatly used in the passive activity during the 12-month period endingon the date of the sale, and the value of the computer, as measured byits sale price ($8,000), does not exceed the lesser of (a) $10,000, and(b) 10 percent of the value of all property used in the activity immediatelybefore the sale ($20,000). C allocates the amount realized and the adjustedbasis solely to the passive activity. Under this paragraph (c)(2)(ii),C's allocation reasonably reflects the use of the computer during the 12-monthperiod ending on the date of the sale.</ITAG>(iii) <T3>Disposition of substantially appreciated property formerly used innonpassive activity</T3>_(A) <T3>In general.</T3> If an interest in property used in an activity issubstantially appreciated at the time of its disposition, any gain fromthe disposition shall be treated as not from a passive activity unlesssuch interest in property was used in a passive activity for either_(<T3>1</T3>) 20 percent of the period during which the taxpayer held suchinterest in property; or (<T3>2</T3>) The entire 24-month period ending on the date of the disposition. (B) <T3>Date of disposition. </T3>For purposes of this paragraph (c)(2)(iii),a disposition of an interest in property shall be deemed to occur on thedate that such interest in property becomes subject to an oral or writtenagreement that either requires the owner or gives the owner an option totransfer such interest in property for consideration that is fixed or otherwisedeterminable on such date.  (C) <T3>Substantially appreciated property. </T3>For purposes of this paragraph(c)(2)(iii), an interest in property is substantially appreciated if thefair market value of such interest in property exceeds 120 percent of theadjusted basis of such interest.  (D) <T3>Coordination with paragraph (c)(2)(ii) of this section. </T3>If paragraph(c)(2)(ii) of this section applies to the disposition of an interest inproperty, this paragraph (c)(2)(iii) shall apply only to that portion ofthe gain from the disposition of such interest in property that is characterizedas gain from a passive activity after the application of paragraph (c)(2)(ii)of this section.  (E) <T3>Coordination with section 163(d). </T3>Gain that is treated as notfrom a passive activity under this paragraph (c)(2)(iii) shall be treatedas income described in section 469(e)(1)(A) and paragraph (c)(3)(i) ofthis section if and only if such gain is from the disposition of an interestin property that was held for investment for more than 50 percent of theperiod during which the taxpayer held such interest in property in activitiesother than passive activities.  (F) <T3>Example. </T3>The following example illustrates the application ofthis paragraph (c)(2)(iii): <ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example. </T3>A acquires a building on January 1, 1987, and uses thebuilding in a trade or business activity in which A materially participatesuntil March 31, 1997. On April 1, 1998, A leases the building to B. OnDecember 31, 1999, A sells the building. Assuming A's lease of the buildingto B constitutes a rental activity (within the meaning of andSection; 1.469-1T(e)(3)),the building is used in a passive activity for 21 months (April 1, 1998,through December 31, 1999). Thus, the building was not used in a passiveactivity for the entire 24-month period ending on the date of the sale.In addition, the 21-month period during which the building was used ina passive activity is less than 20 percent of A's holding period for theproperty (13 years). Therefore, the gain from the sale is treated underthis paragraph (c)(2)(iii) as not from a pasive activity. </ITAG>(3) <T3>Items of portfolio income specifically excluded_</T3>(i) <T3>In general. </T3>Passive activity gross income does not include portfolioincome. For purposes of the preceding sentence, portfolio income includesall gross income, other than income derived in the ordinary course of atrade or business (within the meaning of paragraph (c)(3)(ii) of this section),that is attributable to_  (A) Interest (including amounts treated as interest under paragraph (e)(2)(ii)of this section, relating to certain payments to partners for the use ofcapital); annuities; royalties (including fees and other payments for theuse of intangible property); dividends on C corporation stock; and income(including dividends) from a real estate investment trust (within the meaningof section 856), regulated investment company (within the meaning of section851), real estate mortgage investment conduit (within the meaning of section860D), common trust fund (within the meaning of section 584), controlledforeign corporation (within the meaning of section 957), qualified electingfund (within the meaning of section 1295(a)), or cooperative (within themeaning of section 1381(a));  (B) Dividends on S corporation stock (within the meaning of section 1368(c)(2); (C) The disposition of property that produces income of a type describedin paragraph (c)(3)(i)(A) of this section; and  (D) The disposition of property held for investment (within the meaningof section 163 (d)).  (ii) <T3>Gross income derived in the ordinary course of a trade or business.</T3>Solely for purposes of paragraph (c)(3)(i) of this section, grossincome derived in the ordinary course of a trade or business includes only_ (A) Interest income on loans and investments made in the ordinary courseof a trade or business of lending money;  (B) Interest on accounts receivable arising from the performance of servicesor the sale of property in the ordinary course of a trade or business ofperforming such services or selling such property, but only if credit iscustomarily offered to customers of the business;  (C) Income from investments made in the ordinary course of a trade or businessof furnishing insurance or annuity contracts or reinsuring risks underwrittenby insurance companies;  (D) Income or gain derived in the ordinary course of an activity of tradingor dealing in any property if such activity constitutes a trade or business(but see paragraph (c)(3)(iii)(A) of this section);(E) Royalties derived by the taxpayer in the ordinary course of a tradeor business of licensing intangible property (within the meaning of paragraph(c)(3)(iii)(B) of this section);(F) Amount included in the gross income of a patron of a cooperative (withinthe meaning of section 1381(a), without regard to paragraph (2)(A) or (C)thereof) by reason of any payment or allocation to the patron based onpatronage occurring with respect to a trade or business of the patron;and (G) Other income identified by the Commissioner as income derived by thetaxpayer in the ordinary course of a trade or business. (iii) <T3>Special rules</T3>_(A) <T3>Income from property held for investment by dealer. </T3>For purposesof paragraph (c)(3)(i) of this section, a dealer's income or gain froman item of property is not dervied by the dealer in the ordinary courseof a trade or business of dealing in such property if the dealer held theproperty for investment at any time before such income or gain is recognized.(B) <T3>Royalties derived in the ordinary course of the trade or business oflicensing intangible property_</T3>(<T3>1</T3>) <T3>In general. </T3>Royalties received by any person with respect to alicense or other transfer of any rights in intangible property shall beconsidered to be derived in the ordinary course of the trade or businessof licensing such property only if such person_(<T3>i</T3>) Created such property; or (<T3>ii)</T3> Performed substantial services or incurred substantial costswith respect to the development or marketing of such property.(<T3>2</T3>) <T3>Substantial services or costs_</T3>(<T3>i</T3>) <T3>In general. </T3>Except as provided in paragraph (c)(3)(iii)(B)(<T3>2</T3>)(<T3>ii</T3>) of this section, the determination of whether a person hasperformed substantial services or incurred substantial costs with respectto the development or marketing of an item of intangible property shallbe made on the basis of all the facts and circumstances. (<T3>ii</T3>) <T3>Exception. </T3>A person has performed substantial services or incurredsubstantial costs for a taxable year with respect to the development ormarketing of an item of intangible property if_(<T3>a</T3>) The expenditures reasonably incurred by such person in suchtaxable year with respect to the development or marketing of the propertyexceed 50 percent of the gross royalties from licensing such property thatare includible in such person's gross income for the taxable year; or (<T3>b</T3>) The expenditures reasonably incurred by such person in suchtaxable year and all prior taxable years with respect to the developmentor marketing of the property exceed 25 percent of the aggregate capitalexpenditures (without any adjustment of amortization) made by such personwith respect to the property in all such taxable years. (<T3>iii) </T3><T3>Expenditures taken into account. </T3>For purposes of paragraph (c)(3)(iii)(B)(<T3>2</T3>)(<T3>ii</T3>) of this section, expenditures in a taxable year include amountschargeable to capital account for such year without regard to the yearor years (if any) in which any deduction for such expenditure is allowed.(<T3>3) </T3><T3>Passthrough entities. </T3>For purposes of this paragraph (c)(3)(iii)(B),in the case of any intangible property held by a partnership, S corporation,estate, or trust, the determination of whether royalties from such propertyare derived in the ordinary course of a trade or business shall be madeby applying the rules of this paragraph (c)(3)(iii)(B) to such entity andnot to any holder of an interest in such entity. (<T3>4</T3>) <T3>Cross reference. </T3>For special rules applicable to certain grossincome from a trade or business of licensing intangible property, see paragraph(f)(7) of this section.(C) <T3>Mineral production payments. </T3>For purposes of section 469 and theregulations thereunder_(<T3>1</T3>) If a mineral production payment is treated as a loan undersection 636, the portion of any payment in discharge of the productionpayment that is the equivalent of interest shall be treated as interest;and (<T3>2</T3>) If a mineral production payment is not treated as a loan undersection 636, payments in discharge of the production payment shall be treatedas royalties. (iv) <T3>Examples. </T3>The following examples illustrate the application ofthis paragraph (c)(3):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1). </T3>A, an individual engaged in the trade or businessof farming, disposes of farmland in an installment sale. A is not engagedin a trade or business of selling farmland. Therefore, A's interest incomefrom the installment note is not gross income derived in the ordinary courseof a trade or business.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2). </T3>P, a partnership, operates a rental apartment buildingfor low-income tenants in City Y. Under Y's laws relating to the operationof low-income housing, P is required to maintain a reserve fund to payfor the maintenance and repair of the building. P invests the reserve fundin short-term interest-bearing deposits. Because P's interest income fromthe investment of the reserve fund is not interest income described inparagraph (c)(3)(ii) of this section, such income is not treated as derivedin the ordinary course of a trade or business. Accordingly, P's interestincome from the deposits is portfolio income (within the meaning of paragraph(c)(3)(i) of this section).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (3). </T3>(i) B is a partner in a partnership that is engagedin an activity involving the conduct of a trade or business of dealingin securities. On February 1, the partnership acquires certain securitiesfor investment (within the meaning of section 163(d)). On February 2, beforerecognizing any income with respect to the securities, the partnershipdetermines that it would be advisable to hold the securities primarilyfor sale to customers and subsequently sells them to customers in the ordinarycourse of its business.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Under paragraph (c)(3)(iii)(A) of this section, income or gainfrom any security (including any security acquired pursuant to an investmentof working capital) held by a dealer for investment at any time beforesuch income or gain is recognized is not treated for purposes of paragraph(c)(3)(i) of this section as derived by the dealer in the ordinary courseof its trade or business of dealing in securities. Accordingly, B's distributiveshare of the partnership's interest, dividends, or gains from the securitiesacquired by the partnership for investment on February 1 is portfolio incomeof B, notwithstanding that such securities were held by the partnership,subsequent to February 1, primarily for sale to customers in the ordinarycourse of the partnership's trade or business of dealing in securities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (4). </T3>C is a partner in a partnership that is engaged inan activity of trading or dealing in royalty interests in mineral properties.The partnership derives royalty income from royalty interests held in theactivity. If the activity is a trade or business activity, C's distributiveshare of the partnership's royalty income from such royalty interests istreated under paragraph (c)(3)(ii)(D) of this section as derived in theordinary course of the partnership's trade or business.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (5).</T3> (i) D, a calendar year individual, is a partner ina calendar year partnership that is engaged in an activity of developingand marketing a design for a system that reduces air pollution in officebuildings. D has a 10 percent distributive share of all items of partnershipincome, gain, loss, deduction, and credit. In 1987, the partnership acquiredthe rights to the design for $100,000. In 1987, 1988, and 1989, the partnershipincurs expenditures with respect to the development and marketing of thedesign, and derives gross royalties from licensing the design, in the amountsset forth in the table below. The expenditures incurred in 1987 and 1988are currently deductible expenses. The expenditures incurred in 1989 arecapitalized and may be deducted only in subsequent taxable years.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>4,L2,tp0,i1,s25,8,7,9</C> <H1>Year</H1><H1>Gross royalties</H1><H1>Expenditures</H1><H1>Cumulative capital expenditures</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">1987 <D>$20,000 </D><D>$8,000 </D><D>$100,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1988 <D>20,000 </D><D>12,000 </D><D>100,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1989 <D>60,000 </D><D>15,000 </D><D>115,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1990 <D>120,000 </D><D>0 </D><D>115,000</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Under paragraph (c)(3)(iii)(B)(<T3>3</T3>) of this section, the determination of whether royalties fromintangible property are derived in the ordinary course of a trade or businessof a partnership is made by applying the rules of paragraph (c)(3)(iii)(B)of this section to the partnership rather than the partners. The expendituresreasonably incurred by the partnership in 1987 with respect to the developmentor marketing of the design ($8,000) do not exceed 50 percent of the partnership'sgross royalties for such year from licensing the design ($20,000). In addition,the sum of such expenditures incurred in 1987 and all prior taxable years($8,000) does not exceed 25 percent of the aggregate capital expendituresmade by the partnership in all such taxable years with respect to the design($100,000). Accordingly, for 1987, the partnership is not treated underparagraph (c)(3)(iii)(B)(<T3>2</T3>)(<T3>ii</T3>) of this section as performing substantial services or incurringsubstantial costs with respect to the development or marketing of the design.Therefore, unless all of the facts and circumstances indicate that thepartnership performed substantial services or incurred substantial costswith respect to the development or marketing of the design, D's distributiveshare of the partnership's royalty income for 1987 is portfolio income.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) As of the end of 1988, the sum of the expenditures reasonablyincurred by the partnership during such taxable year and all prior taxableyears with respect to the development or marketing of the design ($20,000)does not exceed 25 percent of the aggregate capital expenditures made bythe partnership in all such years with respect to the design ($100,000).However, the amount of such expenditures incurred by the partnership in1988 ($12,000) exceeds 50 percent of the partnership's gross royaltiesfor such year from licensing the design ($20,000). Accordingly, for 1988,under paragraph (c)(3)(iii)(B)(<T3>2</T3>)(<T3>ii</T3>)(<T3>a</T3>) of this section, the partnership is treated as performing substantialservices or incurring substantial costs with respect to the developmentor marketing of the design, and D's distributive share of the partnership'sroyalty income for 1988 is considered for purposes of paragraph (c)(3)(i)of this section to be derived in the ordinary course of a trade or businessand therefore is not portfolio income.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) The expenditures reasonably incurred by the partnership in 1989with respect to the development or marketing of the design ($15,000) donot exceed 50 percent of the partnership's gross royalties for such yearfrom licensing the design ($60,000). However, the sum of such expendituresincurred by the partnership in 1989 and all prior taxable years ($35,000)exceeds 25 percent of the partnership's aggregate capital expendituresmade in all such years with respect to the design ($115,000). Accordingly,for 1989, under paragraph (c)(3)(iii)(B)(<T3>2</T3>)(<T3>ii</T3>)(<T3>b</T3>) of this section, the partnership is treated as performing substantialservices or incurring substantial costs with respect to the developmentor marketing of the design, and D's distributive share of the partnership'sroyalty income in 1989 is considered for purposes of paragraph (c)(3)(i)of this section to be derived in the ordinary course of a trade or businessand therefore is not portfolio income.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(v) The result for 1990 is the same as for 1989, notwithstanding thatthe partnership incurs no expenditures in 1990 with respect to the developmentor marketing of the design.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (6). </T3>The facts are the same as in example (5), exceptthat, for 1987, D's distributive share of the partnership's developmentand marketing costs is 15 percent, while D's distributive share of thepartnership's gross royalties is 10 percent. Although D's distributiveshare of the expenditures reasonably incurred by the partnership during1987 with respect to the development and marketing of the design ($1,200)is more than 50 percent of D's distributive share of the partnership'sgross royalties from licensing the design ($2,000), D is not treated asperforming substantial services or incurring substantial costs with respectto the development or marketing of the design for 1987 under paragraph(c)(3)(iii)(B)(<T3>2</T3>)(<T3>ii</T3>)(<T3>a</T3>) of this section. This is because, under paragraph (c)(3)(iii)(B)(<T3>3</T3>) of this section, the determination of whether the royaltiesare derived in the ordinary course of a trade or business is made by applyingparagraph (c)(3)(iii)(B) of this section to the partnership, and not toD.</ITAG>(4) <T3>Items of personal service income specifically excluded_</T3>(i) <T3>In general. </T3>Passive activity gross income does not include compensationpaid to or on behalf of an individual for personal services performed orto be performed by such individual at any time. For purposes of this paragraph(c)(4), compensation for personal services includes only_(A) Earned income (within the meaning of section 911(d)(2)(A)), includinggross income from a payment described in paragraph (e)(2) of this sectionthat represents compensation for the performance of services by a partner;(B) Amounts includible in gross income under section 83;(C) Amounts includible in gross income under sections 402 and 403;(D) Amounts (other than amounts described in paragraph (c)(4)(i)(C) ofthis section) paid pursuant to retirement, pension, and other arrangementsfor deferred compensation for services;(E) Social security benefits (within the meaning of section 86(d)) includiblein gross income under section 86; and(F) Other income identified by the Commissioner as income derived by thetaxpayer from personal services;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">provided, however, that no portion of a partner's distributive shareof partnership income (within the meaning of section 704(b)) or a shareholder'spro rata share of income from an S corporation (within the meaning of section1377(a)) shall be treated as compensation for personal services.(ii) <T3>Example. </T3>The following example illustrates the application ofthis paragraph (c)(4):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example. </T3>C owns 50 percent of the stock of X, an S corporation.X owns rental real estate, which it manages. X pays C a salary for servicesperformed by C on behalf of X in connection with the management of X'srental properties. Under this paragraph (c)(4), although C's pro rata shareof X's gross rental income is passive activity gross income (even if thesalary paid to C is less than the fair market value of C's services), thesalary paid to C does not constitute passive activity gross income.</ITAG>(5) <T3>Income from section 481 adjustment</T3>_(i) <T3>In general. </T3>If a change in accounting method results in a positivesection 481 adjustment with respect to an activity, a ratable portion (withinthe meaning of paragraph (c)(5)(iii) of this section) of the amount takeninto account for a taxable year as a net positive section 481 adjustmentby reason of such change shall be treated as gross income from the activityfor such taxable year, and such gross income shall be treated as passiveactivity gross income if and only if such activity is a passive activityfor the year of the change (within the meaning of section 481(a)).(ii) <T3>Positive section 481 adjustments. </T3>For purposes of applying thisparagraph (c)(5)_(A) The term ``net positive section 481 adjustment'' means the increase(if any) in taxable income taken into account under section 481(a) to preventamounts from being duplicated or omitted by reason of a change in accountingmethod; and(B) The term ``positive section 481 adjustment with respect to an activity''means the increase (if any) in taxable income that would be taken intoaccount under section 481(a) to prevent only the duplication or omissionof amounts from such activity by reason of the change in accounting method.(iii) <T3>Ratable portion.</T3> The ratable portion of the amount taken intoaccount as a net positive section 481 adjustment for a taxable year byreason of a change in accounting method is determined with respect to anactivity by multiplying such amount by the fraction obtained by dividing_(A) The positive section 481 adjustment with respect to the activity; by(B) The sum of the positive section 481 adjustments with respect to allof the activities of the taxpayer.(6) <T3>Gross income from certain oil or gas properties</T3>_(i) <T3>In general. </T3>Notwithstanding any other provision of the regulationsunder section 469, passive activity gross income for any taxable year doesnot include an amount of the taxpayer's gross income for such year from_(A) An oil or gas property, if any loss from a working interest in suchproperty for any prior taxable year beginning after December 31, 1986,was treated by the taxpayer, solely by reason of andSection; 1.469-1T(e)(4)(relating to a special rule for losses from oil and gas working interests),and not by reason of the taxpayer's material participation in the activity,as a loss that is not from a passive activity; or(B) Any property the basis of which is determined in whole or in part byreference to the basis of property described in paragraph(c)(6)(i)(A) ofthis section;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">equal to the taxpayer's net income from such property for the taxableyear. The preceding sentence applies without regard to whether the taxpayer'sinterest in the property is held through an entity that limits the taxpayer'sliability (within the meaning of andSection; 1.469-1T(e)(4)(v)).(ii) <T3>Net income from the property. </T3>For purposes of this paragraph (c)(6),the taxpayer's net income for the taxable year from any property describedin paragraph (c)(6)(i) of this section is the amount, if any, by whichthe taxpayer's gross income from such property exceeds the taxpayer's deductionsfor such taxable year (including any deduction treated as a deduction forsuch year under andSection; 1.469-1T(f)(4)) that are reasonable allocableto such property.(iii) <T3>Property. </T3>For purposes of paragraph (c)(6)(i)(A) of this section,the term ``property'' does not have the meaning given such term by section614(a) or the regulations thereunder, but means any property the valueof which is directly enhanced by any drilling, logging, seismic testing,or other activities any part of the costs of which were borne by the taxpayeras a result of holding the working interest described in such paragraph(c)(6)(i)(A).(iv) <T3>Examples. </T3>The following examples illustrate the application ofthis (c)(6):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1)</T3>. A is a general partner in partnership P and a limitedpartner in partnership R. P and R own oil and gas working interests intwo separate tracts of land acquired from two separate landowners. In 1987,P drills a well on its tract, and A's distributive share of P's lossesfrom drilling the well are treated under andSection; 1.469-1T(e)(4) as notfrom a passive activity. In the course of selecting the drilling site anddrilling the well, P develops information indicating that the reservoirin which the well was drilled underlies R's tract as well as P's. Underthese facts, P's and R's tracts are treated as one property for purposesof this paragraph (c)(6), even if A's interests in the mineral depositsin the tracts are treated as separate properties under section 614(a).Accordingly, in 1988 and subsequent years, A's distributive share of bothP's and R's income and expenses from their respective tracts is taken intoaccount in computing A's net income from the property for purposes of thisparagraph (c)(6).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2)</T3>. B is a general partner in partnership S. S owns anoil and gas working interest in a single tract of land. In 1987, S drillsa well, and B's distributive share of S's losses from drilling the wellis treated under andSection; 1.469-1T(e)(4) as not from a passive activity.In the course of drilling the well, S discovers two oil-bearing formations,one underlying the other. On December 1, 1987, S completes the well inthe underlying formation. On January 1, 1988, B converts B's entire generalpartnership interest in S into a limited partnership interest. In 1988,S completes in, and commences production from, the shallow formation. Underthese facts, the two mineral deposits in S's tract are treated as one propertyfor purposes of this paragraph (c)(6), even if they are treated as separateproperties under section, 614 (a). Accordingly, B's distributive shareof S's income and expenses from both the underlying formation and fromrecompletion in and production from the shallow formation is taken intoaccount in computing B's net income from the property for purposes of thisparagraph (c)(6).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (3)</T3>. C is a general partner in partnership T and a limitedpartner in partnership U. T and U both own oil and gas working interestsin tracts of land in County X. In 1987, T drills a well, and C's distributiveshare of T's losses from drilling the well is treated under andSection; 1.469-1T(e)(4)as not from a passive activity. In the course of selecting the drillingsite and drilling the well, T develops information indicating a significantprobability that substantial oil and gas reserves underlie most portionsof County X. As a result, the value of all oil and gas properties in CountyX is enhanced. The information developed by T does not, however, indicatethat the reservoir in which T's well is drilled underlies U's tract. Underthese facts, T's and U's tracts are not treated as one property for purposesof this paragraph (c)(6), because the value of U's tract is not directlyenhanced by T's activities.</ITAG>(7) <T3>Other items specifically excluded</T3>. Notwithstanding any other provisionof the regulations under section 469, passive activity gross income doesnot include the following:(i) Gross income of an individual from intangible property, such as a patent,copyright, or literary, musical, or artistic composition, if the taxpayer'spersonal efforts significantly contributed to the creation of such property;(ii) Gross income from a qualified low-income housing project (within themeaning of section 502 of the Tax Reform Act of 1986) for any taxable yearin the relief period (within the meaning of section 502(b) of such Act;(iii) Gross income attributable to a refund of any state, local, or foreignincome, war profits, or excess profits tax;(iv) Gross income of an individual from a covenant by such individual notto compete; and(v) Gross income that is treated as not from a passive activity under anyprovision of the regulations under section 469, including but not limitedto andSection; 1.469-1T(h)(6) (relating to income from intercompany transactionsof members of an affiliated group of corporations filing a consolidatedreturn) and paragraph (f) of this section (relating to recharacterizedpassive income).(d) <T3>Passive activity deductions</T3>_(1) <T3>In general. </T3>Except as otherwise provided in section 469 and theregulations thereunder, a deduction is a passive activity deduction fora taxable year if and only if such deduction_(i) Arises (within the meaning of paragraph (d)(8) of this section) inconnection with the conduct of a activity that is a passive activity forthe taxable year; or(ii) Is treated as a deduction from an activity under andSection; 1.469-1T(f)(4)for the taxable year.The following example illustrates the application of this paragraph (d)(1):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example</T3>. (i) In 1987, A, a calendar year individual, acquiresa partnership interest in R, a calendar year partnership. R's only activityis a trade or business activity in which A materially participates for1987. R incurs a loss in 1987. A's distributive share of R's 1987 lossis $1,000. However, A's basis in the partnership interest at the end of1987 (without regard to A's distributive share of partnership loss) is$600; accordingly, section 704(d) disallows any deduction in 1987 for $400of A's distributive share of R's loss. The remainder of A's distributiveshare of R's loss would be allowed as a deduction for 1987 if taxable incomefor all taxable years were determined without regard to sections 469 and1211. See paragraph (d)(8) of this section.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) A does not materially participate in R's activity for 1988. In1988, R again incurs a loss, and A's distributive share of the loss isagain $1,000. At the end of 1988, A's basis in the partnership interest(without regard to A's distributive share of partnership loss) is $2,000;accordingly, in 1988 section 704(d) does not limit A's deduction for eitherA's $1,000 distributive share of R's 1988 loss or the $400 loss carriedover from 1987 under the second sentence of section 704(d). These losseswould be allowed as a deduction for 1988 if taxable income for all taxableyears were determined without regard to sections 469 and 1211. See paragraph(d)(8) of this section.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Under these facts, only $400 of A's distributive share of R'sdeductions from the activity are disallowed under section 704(d) in 1987.A's remaining deductions from the activity are treated as deductions thatarise in connection with the activity for 1987 under paragraph (d)(8) ofthis section. Because A materially participates in the activity for 1987,the activity is not a passive activity (within the meaning of andSection;1.469-1T(e)(1)) of A for such year. Accordingly, the deductions that arenot disallowed in 1987 are not passive activity deductions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) A does not materially participate in R's activity for 1988. Accordingly,the activity is a passive activity of A for such year. No portion of A'sdistributive share of R's deductions from the activity is disallowed undersection 704(d) in 1988. Accordingly, A's distributive share of R's deductionsfor 1988 and the $400 of deductions carried over from 1987 are both treatedunder paragraph (d)(8) of this section as deductions that arise in 1988.Since the activity is a passive activity for 1988, such deductions arepassive activity deductions.</ITAG>(2) <T3>Exceptions</T3>. Passive activity deductions do not include_(i) A deduction for an item of expense (other than interest) that is clearlyand directly allocable (within the meaning of paragraph (d)(4) of thissection) to portfolio income (within the meaning of paragraph (c)(3)(i)of this section);(ii) A deduction allowed under section 243, 244, or 245 with respect toany dividend that is not included in passive activity gross income;(iii) Interest expense (other than interest expense described in paragraph(d)(3) of this section);(iv) A deduction for a loss from the disposition of property of a typethat produces portfolio income (within the meaning of paragraph (c)(3)(i)of this section);(v) A deduction that, under section 469(g) and andSection;1.469-6T (relatingto the allowance of passive activity losses upon certain dispositions ofinterests in passive activities), is treated as a deduction that is nota passive activity deduction; (vi) A deduction for any state, local, or foreign income, war profits,or excess profits tax; (vii) A miscellaneous itemized deduction (within the meaning of section67(b)) that is subject to disallowance in whole or in part under section67(a) (without regard to whether any amount of such deduction is disallowedunder section 67); (viii) A deduction allowed under section 170 for a charitable contribution;(ix) An item of loss or deduction that is carried to the taxable year undersection 172(a), section 1212(a)(1)(B) (in the case of corporations), orsection 1212(b) (in the case of taxpayers other than corporations); and(x) An item of loss or deduction that would have been allowed for a taxableyear beginning before January 1, 1987, but for section 704(d), 1366, or465. (3) <T3>Interest expense. </T3>Except as otherwise provided in the regulationsunder section 469, interest expense is taken into account as a passiveactivity deduction if and only if such interest expense_ (i) Is allocated under andSection;1.163-8T to a passive activity expenditure(within the meaning of andSection;1.163-8T(b)(4)); and (ii) Is not_ (A) Qualified residence interest (within the meaning of andSection;1.163-10T);or (B) Capitalized pursuant to a capitalization provision (within the meaningof andSection;1.163-8T(m)(7)(i)). (4) <T3>Clearly and directly allocable expenses. </T3>For purposes of section469 and the regulations thereunder, an expense (other than interest expense)is clearly and directly allocable to portfolio income (within the meaningof paragraph (c)(3)(i) of this section) if and only if such expense isincurred as a result of, or incident to, an activity in which such grossincome is derived or in connection with property from which such grossincome is derived. For example, general and administrative expenses andcompensation paid to officers attributable to the performance of servicesthat do not directly benefit or are not incurred by reason of a particularactivity or particular property are not clearly and directly allocableto portfolio income (within the meaning of paragraph (c)(3)(i) of thissection).(5) <T3>Treatment of loss from disposition</T3>_(i) <T3>In general. </T3>Except as otherwise provided in the regulations undersection 469_ (A) Any loss recognized in any year upon the sale, exchange, or other disposition(a ``disposition'') of an interest in property used in an activity at thetime of the disposition or of an interest in an activity held through apartnership or S corporation and any deduction allowed on account of theabandonment or worthlessness of such an interest is treated as a deductionfrom such activity; and(B) Any such deduction is a passive activity deduction if and only if theactivity is a passive activity of the taxpayer for the taxable year ofthe disposition (or other event giving rise to the deduction).(ii) <T3>Disposition of property used in more than one activity in 12-monthperiod preceding disposition. </T3>In the case of a disposition of an interestin property that is used in more than one activity during the 12-monthperiod ending on the date of the disposition, the amount realized fromthe disposition and the adjusted basis of such interest must be allocatedamong such activities in the manner described in paragraph (c)(2)(ii) ofthis section.(iii) <T3>Other applicable rules</T3>_(A) <T3>Interest in property. </T3>For purposes of this paragraph (d)(5), ataxpayer's interests in property used in an activity and the amounts allocatedto such interests shall be determined under paragraph (c)(2)(i)(C) of thissection.(B) <T3>Dispositions of partnership interests and S corporation stock.</T3>A partnership interest or S corporation stock is not property used in anactivity for purposes of this paragraph (d)(5). See paragraph (e)(3) ofthis section for rules treating the loss recognized upon the dispositionof a partnership interest or S corporation stock as loss from the dispositionof interests in the activities in which the partnership or S corporationhas an interest.(6)<T3> Coordination with other limitations on deductions that apply beforesection 469_</T3>(i)<T3> In general.</T3> An item of deduction from a passive activity thatis disallowed for a taxable year under section 704(d), 1366(d), or 465is not a passive activity deduction for the taxable year. Paragraphs (d)(6)(ii) and (iii) of this section provide rules for determining the extentto which items of deduction from a passive activity are disallowed fora taxable year under sections 704(d), 1366(d), and 465.(ii) <T3>Proration of deductions disallowed under basis limitations_</T3>(A)<T3>Deductions disallowed under section 704(d).</T3> If any amount of apartner's distributive share of a partnership's loss for the taxable yearis disallowed under section 704(d), a ratable portion of the partner'sdistributive share of each item of deduction or loss of the partnershipis disallowed for the taxable year. For purposes of the preceding sentence,the ratable portion of an item of deduction or loss is the amount of suchitem multiplied by the fraction obtained by dividing_(<T3>1</T3>) The amount of the partner's distributive share of partnershiploss that is disallowed for the taxable year; by(<T3>2</T3>) The sum of the partner's distributive shares of all items ofdeduction and loss of the partnership for the taxable year.(B) <T3>Deductions disallowed under section 1366(d).</T3> If any amount ofan S corporation shareholder's pro rata share of an S corporation's lossfor the taxable year is disallowed under section 1366(d), a ratable portionof the taxpayer's pro rata share of each item of deduction or loss of theS corporation is disallowed for the taxable year. For purposes of the precedingsentence, the ratable portion of an item of deduction or loss is the amountof such item multiplied by the fraction obtained by dividing_(<T3>1</T3>) The amount of the shareholder's pro rata share of S corporationloss that is disallowed for the taxable year; by (<T3>2</T3>) The sum of the shareholder's pro rata shares of all items ofdeduction and loss of the corporation for the taxable year.(iii) <T3>Proration of deductions disallowed under at-risk limitation.</T3> Ifany amount of the taxpayer's loss from an activity (within the meaningof section 465(c)) is disallowed under section 465 for the taxable year,a ratable portion of each item of deduction or loss from the activity isdisallowed for the taxable year. For purposes of the preceding sentence,the ratable portion of an item of deduction or loss is the amount of suchitem multiplied by the fraction obtained by dividing_(<T3>1</T3>) The amount of the loss from the activity that is disallowedfor the taxable year; by(<T3>2</T3>) The sum of all deductions from the activity for the taxableyear.(iv) <T3>Coordination of basis and at-risk limitations.</T3> The portion ofany item of deduction or loss that is disallowed for the taxable year undersection 704(d) or 1366(d) is not taken into account for the taxable yearin determining the loss from an activity (within the meaning of section465(c)) for purposes of applying section 465.(v) <T3>Separately identified items of deduction and loss.</T3> In identifyingthe items of deduction and loss from an activity that are not disallowedunder sections 704(d), 1366(d), and 465 (and that therefore may be treatedas passive activity deductions), the taxpayer need not account separatelyfor any item of deduction or loss unless such item may, if separately takeninto account, result in an income tax liability different from that whichwould result were such item of deduction or loss taken into account separately.For related rules applicable to partnerships and S corporations, see andSection;1.702-1(a)(8)(ii) and section 1366(a)(1)(A), respectively. Items of deductionor loss that must be accounted for separately include (but are not limitedto) items of deduction or loss that_(A) Are attributable to separate activities (within the meaning of therules to be contained in andSection; 1.469-4T);(B) Arise in a rental real estate activity (within the meaning of section469(i) and the rules to be contained in andSection; 1.469-9T) in taxableyears in which the taxpayer activity participates (within the meaning ofsection 469(i) and the rules to be contained in andSection; 1.469-9T) insuch activity;(C) Arise in a rental real estate activity (within the meaning of section469(i) and the rules to be contained in andSection; 1.469-9T) in taxableyears in which the taxpayer does not actively participate (within the meaningof section 469(i) and the rules to be contained in andSection; 1.469-9T)in such activity;(D) Arose in a taxable year beginning before 1987 and were not allowedfor such taxable year under section 704(d), 1366(d), or 465(a)(2);(E) Are taken into account under section 1211 (relating to the limitationon capital losses) or section 1231 (relating to property used in a tradeor business and involuntary conversions); or (F) Are attributable to pre-enactment interests in activities (within themeaning of andSection; 1.469-11T(c)).(7) <T3>Deductions from section 481 adjustment_</T3>(i) <T3>In general.</T3> If a change in accounting method results in a negativesection 481 adjustment with respect to an activity, a ratable portion (withinthe meaning of paragraph (d)(7)(iii) of this section) of the amount takeninto account for a taxable year as a net negative section 481 adjustmentby reason of such change shall be treated as a deduction from the activityfor such taxable year, and such deduction shall be treated as a passiveactivity deduction if and only if such activity is a passive activity forthe year of the change (within the meaning of section 481(a)). See therules to be contained in andSection; 1.469-1T(k) for the treatment of passiveactivity deductions from an activity in taxable years in which the activityis a former passive activity.(ii) <T3>Negative section 481 adjustments.</T3> For purposes of applying thisparagraph (d)(7)_(A) The term ``net negative section 481 adjustment'' means the decrease(if any) in taxable income taken into account under section 481(a) to preventamounts from being duplicated or omitted by reason of a change in accountingmethod; and(B) The term ``negative section 481 adjustment with respect to an activity''means the decrease (if any) in taxable income that would be taken intoaccount under section 481(a) to prevent only the duplication or omissionof amounts from such activity by reason of the change in accounting method.(iii) <T3>Ratable portion.</T3> The ratable portion of the amount taken intoaccount as a net negative section 481 adjustments for a taxable year byreason of a change in accounting method is determined with respect to anactivity by multiplying such amount by the fraction obtained by dividing_(A) The negative section 481 adjustment with respect to the activity; by(B) The sum of the negative section 481 adjustments with respect to allof the activities of the taxpayer.(8) <T3>Taxable year in which item arises.</T3> For purposes of this paragraph(d), an item of deduction arises in the taxable year in which such itemwould be allowable as a deduction under the taxpayer's method of accountingif taxable income for all taxable years were determined without regardto sections 469 and 1211.(e) <T3>Special rules for partners and S corporation shareholders_</T3>(1)<T3>In general.</T3> For purposes of section 469 and the regulations thereunder,the character (as an item of passive activity gross income or passive activitydeduction) of each item of gross income and deduction allocated to a taxpayerfrom a partnership or S corporation (a ``passthrough entity'') shall bedetermined, in any case in which participation is relevant, by referenceto the participation of the taxpayer in the activity (or activities) thatgenerated such item. Such participation is determined for the taxable yearof the passthrough entity (and not the taxable year of the taxpayer). Thefollowing example illustrates the application of this paragraph (e)(1):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example.</T3> A, a calendar year individual, is a partner in a partnershipthat has a taxable year ending January 31. During its taxable year endingon January 31, 1988, the partnership engages in a single trade or businessactivity. For the period from February 1, 1987, through January 31, 1988,A does not materially participate in this activity. In A's calendar year1988 return, A's distributive share of the partnership's gross income anddeductions from the activity must be treated as passive activity grossincome and passive activity deductions, without regard to A's participationin the activity from February 1, 1988, through December 31, 1988. See alsoandSection; 1.469-11T(a)(4) (relating to the effective date of, and transitionrules under, section 469 and the regulations thereunder).</ITAG>(2) <T3>Payments under sections 707(a), 707(c), and 736(b).</T3> Items of grossincome and deduction attributable to a transaction described in section707(a), 707(c), or 736(b) shall be characterized for purposes of section469 and the regulations thereunder in accordance with the following rules:(i) <T3>Section 707(a).</T3> Any item of gross income or deduction attributableto a transaction that is treated under section 707(a) as a transactionbetween a partnership and a partner acting in a capacity other than asa member of such partnership shall be characterized for purposes of section469 and the regulations thereunder in a manner that is consistent withthe treatment of such transaction under section 707(a).(ii) <T3>Section 707(c)</T3>_(A) <T3>In general. </T3>Except as provided in paragraph(e)(2)(ii)(B) of thissection, any payment to a partner for services or the use of capital thatis described in section 707(c) (including any payment described in section736(a)(2) (relating to guaranteed payments made in liquidation of the interestof a retiring or deceased partner)) shall be characterized as the paymentof compensation for services or as the payment of interest, respectively,and not as a distributive share of partnership income.(B) <T3>Exception. </T3>(<T3>1</T3>) If section 736(a)(2) applies to a payment made in liquidationof a retiring or deceased partner's interest, any income that_(<T3>i</T3>) Is taken into account by a retiring partner (or any other personthat owns (directly or indirectly) an interest in such partner if suchpartner is a passthrough entity) or a deceased partner's successor in interestas a result of such payment; and(<T3>ii</T3>) Is attributable to the portion (if any) of such payment thatis allocable to the unrealized receivables (within the meaning of section751(c)) and goodwill of an activity of the partnership; shall be treatedas passive activity gross income if and only if the activity was a passiveactivity of such retiring or deceased partner (or such other person) forthe taxable year of such retiring or deceased partner (or such other person)in which the liquidation of such partner's interest commenced.(<T3>2</T3>) If section 736(a)(2) applies to a payment made in liquidationof a retiring or deceased partner's interest, the portion (if any) of suchpayment that is allocable to the unrealized receivables (within the meaningof section 751(c)) and goodwill of an activity of the partnership is determined,for purposes of this paragraph (e)(2)(ii)(B), by multiplying the amountof such payment by the fraction obtained by dividing_(<T3>i</T3>) The amount to be paid under section 736(a)(2) in liquidationof such partner's interest in the unrealized receivables and goodwill ofsuch activity of the partnership; by(<T3>ii</T3>) The sum of all payments to be made under section 736(a)(2)in liquidation of such partner's interest.(iii) <T3>Section 736(b). </T3>If any gain or loss is taken into account by aretiring partner (or any other person that owns (directly or indirectly)an interest in such partner if such partner is a passthrough entity) ora deceased partner's successor in interest as a result of a payment towhich section 736(b) (relating to payments made in exchange for a retiringor deceased partner's interest in partnership property) applies, such gainor loss shall be treated as passive activity gross income or a passiveactivity deduction only to the extent that such gain or loss would havebeen passive activity gross income or a passive activity deduction of suchretiring or deceased partner (or such other person) if it had been recognizedat the time the liquidation of such partner's interest commenced.(3) <T3>Sale or exchange of interest in passthrough entity</T3>_(i) <T3>Application of this paragraph (e)(3). </T3>In the case of the sale,exchange, or other disposition (a ``disposition'') of an interest in apassthrough entity, the amount of the seller's gain or loss from each activityin which such entity has an interest is determined, for purposes of section469 and the regulations thereunder, under this paragraph (e)(3). In thecase of any such disposition, except as otherwise provided in paragraph(e)(3)(iii) or (iv) of this section, paragraph (e)(3)(ii) of this sectionshall apply. See paragraphs (c)(2) and (d)(5) of this section for rulesfor determining the character of gain or loss, respectively, recognizedupon a disposition of an interest in an activity held through a passthroughentity.(ii) <T3>General rule</T3>_(A) <T3>Allocation among activities.</T3> Except as otherwise provided in thisparagraph (e)(3)(ii) or in paragraph (e)(3) (iii) or (iv) of this section,if a holder of an interest in a passthrough entity disposes of such interest,a ratable portion (within the meaning of paragraph (e)(3)(ii)(B) of thissection) of any gain or loss from such disposition shall be treated asgain or loss from the disposition of an interest in each trade or business,rental, or investment activity in which such passthrough entity owns aninterest on the applicable valuation date. (B) <T3>Ratable portion</T3>_(<T3>1</T3>) <T3>Dispositions on which gain is recognized.</T3> The ratable portionof any gain from the disposition of an interest in a passthrough entitythat is allocable to an activity described in paragraph (e)(3)(ii)(A) ofthis section is determined by multiplying the amount of such gain by thefraction obtained by dividing_ (<T3>i</T3>) The amount of net gain (within the meaning of paragraph (e)(3)(ii)(E)(<T3>3</T3>) of this section) that would have been allocated to the holderof such interest with respect thereto if the passthrough entity had soldits entire interest in such activity for its fair market value on the applicablevaluation date; by (<T3>ii</T3>) The sum of the amounts of net gain that would have been allocatedto the holder of such interest with respect thereto if the passthroughentity had sold its entire interest in each appreciated activity (withinthe meaning of paragraph (e)(3)(ii)(E)(<T3>1</T3>) of this section) described in paragraph (e)(3)(ii)(A) of thissection for the fair market value of each such activity on the applicablevaluation date. (<T3>2</T3>) <T3>Dispositions on which loss is recognized.</T3> The ratable portionof any loss from the disposition of an interest in a passthrough entitythat is allocable to an activity described in paragraph (e)(3)(ii)(A) ofthis section is determined by multiplying the amount of such loss by thefraction obtained by dividing_ (<T3>i</T3>) The amount of net loss (within the meaning of paragraph (e)(3)(ii)(E)(<T3>4</T3>) of this section) that would have been allocated to the holderof such interest with respect thereto if the passthrough entity had soldits entire interest in such activity for its fair market value on the applicablevaluation date; by (<T3>ii</T3>) The sum of the amounts of net loss that would have been allocatedto the holder of such interest with respect thereto if the passthroughentity had sold its entire interest in each depreciated activity (withinthe meaning of paragraph (e)(3)(ii)(E)(<T3>2</T3>) of this section) described in paragraph (e)(3)(ii)(A) of thissection for the fair market value of each such activity on the applicablevaluation date. (C) <T3>Default rule.</T3> If the gain or loss recognized upon the dispositionof an interest in a passthrough entity cannot be allocated under paragraph(e)(3)(ii)(A) of this section, such gain or loss shall be allocated amongthe activities described in paragraph (e)(3)(ii)(A) of this section inproportion to the respective fair market values of the passthrough entity'sinterests in such activities at the applicable valuation date, and thegain or loss allocated to each activity of the passthrough entity shallbe treated as gain or loss from the disposition of an interest in suchactivity. (D) <T3>Special rules.</T3> For purposes of this paragraph (e)(3)(ii), thefollowing rules shall apply: (<T3>1</T3>) <T3>Applicable valuation date</T3>_(<T3>i</T3>) <T3>In general.</T3> Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (e)(3)(ii)(D)(<T3>1</T3>)(<T3>ii</T3>) of this section, the applicable valuation date with respectto any disposition of an interest in a passthrough entity is whicheverone of the following dates is selected by the passthrough entity: (<T3>a</T3>) The beginning of the taxable year of the passthrough entityin which such disposition occurs; or (<T3>b</T3>) The date on which such disposition occurs. (<T3>ii</T3>) <T3>Exception. </T3>If, after the beginning of a passthrough entity's taxableyear in which a holder's disposition of an interest in such passthroughentity occurs and before the time of such disposition_ (<T3>a</T3>) The passthrough entity disposes of more than 10 percent ofits interest (by value as of the beginning of such taxable year) in anyactivity; (<T3>b</T3>) More than 10 percent of the property (by value as of the beginningof such taxable year) used in any activity of the passthrough entity isdisposed of; or (<T3>c</T3>) The holder of such interest contributes to the passthroughentity substantially appreciated property or substantially depreciatedproperty with a total fair market value or adjusted basis, respectively,which exceeds 10 percent of the total fair market value of the holder'sinterest in the passthrough entity as of the beginning of such taxableyear;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">then the applicable valuation date shall be the date immediately precedingthe date on which such disposition occurs. (<T3>2</T3>) <T3>Basis adjustments. </T3>Any adjustment to the basis of partnershipproperty under section 743(b) made with respect to the holder of an interestin a partnership shall be taken into account in computing the net gainor net loss that would have been allocated to the holder with respect tosuch interest if the partnership had sold its entire interest in an activity.(<T3>3</T3>) <T3>Tiered passthrough entities. </T3>In the case of a disposition of aninterest in a passthrough entity (the ``subsidiary passthrough entity'')by a holder that is also a passthrough entity, any gain or loss from suchdisposition that is taken into account by any person that owns (directlyor indirectly) an interest in such holder shall be allocated among theactivities of the subsidiary passthrough entity by applying the rules ofthis paragraph (e)(3)(ii) to the person taking such gain or loss into accountas if such person has been the holder of an interest in such subsidiarypassthrough entity and had recognized such gain or loss as a result ofa disposition of such interest. (E) <T3>Meaning of certain terms. </T3>For purposes of this paragraph (e)(3)(ii)_(<T3>1</T3>) An activity is an appreciated activity with respect to a holderthat has disposed of an interest in a passthrough entity if a net gainwould have been allocated to the holder with respect to such interest ifthe passthrough entity has sold its entire interest in such activity forits fair market value on the applicable valuation date; (<T3>2</T3>) An activity is a depreciated activity with respect to a holderthat has disposed of an interest in a passthrough entity if a net losswould have been allocated to the holder with respect to such interest ifthe passthrough entity had sold its entire interest in such activity forits fair market value on the applicable valuation date; (<T3>3</T3>) The term ``net gain'' means, with respect to the sale of apassthrough entity's entire interest in an activity, the amount by whichthe gains from the sale of all of the property used by (or representingthe interest of) the passthrough entity in such activity exceed the losses(if any) from such sale; (<T3>4</T3>) The term ``net loss'' means, with respect to the sale of apassthrough entity's entire interest in an activity, the amount by whichthe losses from the sale of all of the property used by (or representingthe interest of) the passthrough entity in such activity exceed the gains(if any) from such sale. (iii) <T3>Treatment of gain allocated to certain passive activities as not froma passive activity. </T3>If, in the case of a disposition of an interestin a passthrough entity_(A) An amount of gain recognized on account of such disposition by theholder of such interest (or any other person that owns (directly or indirectly)an interest in such holder if such holder is a passthrough entity) is allocatedto a passive activity of such holder (or such other person) under paragraph(e)(3)(ii) of this section; (B) An amount of gain that would have been treated as gain that is notfrom a passive activity under paragraph (c)(2)(iii) of this section (relatingto substantially appreciated property formerly used in a nonpassive activity)would have been allocated to such holder (or such other person) with respectto such interest if all of the property used in such passive activity hadbeen sold immediately prior to the disposition for its fair market valueon the applicable valuation date (within the meaning of paragraph (e)(3)(ii)(D)(<T3>1</T3>) of this section; and (C) The amount of the gain of the holder (or such other person) describedin paragraph (e)(3)(iii)(B) of this section exceeds 10 percent of the amountof the gain of the holder (or such other person) described in paragraph(e)(3)(iii)(A) of this section;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">then the gain of the holder (or such other person) that is describedin paragraph (e)(3)(iii)(A) of this section shall be treated as gain thatis not from a passive activity to the extent that such gain does not exceedthe amount of the gain of the holder (or such other person) described inparagraph (e)(3)(iii)(B) of this section. For purposes of applying thepreceding sentence to the disposition of an interest in a partnership,the amount of gain that would have been allocated to the holder (or suchother person) if all of the property used in an activity had been soldshall be determined by taking into account any adjustment to the basisof partnership property made with respect to such holder (or such otherperson) under section 743(b). (iv) <T3>Dispositions occurring in taxable years beginning before February 19,1988</T3>_(A) <T3>In general</T3>. Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (e)(3)(iv),if the holder of an interest in a passthrough entity sells, exchanges,or otherwise disposes of all or part of such interest during a taxableyear of such entity beginning prior to February 19, 1988, any gain or lossrecognized from such disposition shall be allocated among the activitiesof the passthrough entity under any reasonable method selected by the passthroughentity, and the gain or loss allocated to each activity of the passthroughentity shall be treated as gain or loss from the disposition of an interestin such activity. For purposes of the preceding sentence, a reasonablemethod shall include the method prescribed by paragraph (e)(3)(ii) of thissection. In addition, a method that allocates gain or loss among the passthroughentity's activities on the basis of the fair market value, cost, or adjustedbasis of the property used in such activities shall generally be considereda reasonable method for purposes of this paragraph (e)(3)(iv). (B) <T3>Exceptions</T3>. This paragraph (e)(3)(iv) shall not apply to any dispositionof an interest in a passthrough entity occurring after February 19, 1988,if after such date, but before the holder's disposition of such interest,the holder (or any other person that owns (directly or indirectly) an interestin such holder if such holder is a passthrough entity) contributes to thepassthrough entity substantially appreciated portfolio assets or any othersubstantially appreciated property that was used in any trade or businessactivity (within the meaning of andSection;1.469-1T(e)) of the holder (orsuch other person) during_ (<T3>1</T3>) The taxable year of such person in which such contributionoccurs; or (<T3>2</T3>) The immediately preceding taxable year of such person;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">but only if such person materially participated (within the meaningof andSection;1.469-5T) in the activity for such year. (v) <T3>Treatment of portfolio assets</T3>. For purposes of the paragraph (e)(3),all portfolio assets owned by a passthrough entity shall be treated asheld in a single investment activity. (vi) <T3>Definitions</T3>. For purposes of this paragraph (e)(3)_ (A) The term ``portfolio asset'' means any property of a type that producesportfolio income (within the meaning of paragraph (c)(3)(i) of this section);(B) The term ``substantially appreciated property'' means property witha fair market value that exceeds 120 percent of its adjusted basis; and(C) The term ``substantially depreciated property'' means property withan adjusted basis that exceeds 120 percent of its fair market value.(vii) <T3>Examples.</T3> The following examples illustrate the application ofthis paragraph (e)(3):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1). </T3>(i) A owns a one-half interest in P, a calendar yearpartnership. In 1993, A sells 50 percent of such interest for $50,000.A's adjusted basis for the interest sold is $30,000. Thus, A recognizes$20,000 of gain from the sale. P is engaged in three trade or businessactivities, X, Y, and Z, and owns marketable securities that are portfolioassets. For 1993, A materially participates in activity Z, but does notparticipate in activities X and Y. Paragraph (c)(2)(iii) of this sectionwould not have applied to any of the gain that A would have been allocatedif, immediately before A's sale, P had disposed of all of the propertyused in its trade or business activities. During the portion of 1993 precedingA's sale, P did not sell any of the property used in its activities, andA did not contribute any property to P.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Under paragraph (e)(3)(ii) of this section, a ratable portionof A's $20,000 gain is allocated to each appreciated activity in whichP owned an interest on the applicable valuation date (within the meaningof paragraph (e)(3)(ii)(D)(<T3>1</T3>) of this section). For this purpose, paragraph (e)(3)(v) ofthis section treats the marketable securities owned by P as a single investmentactivity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) P selects the beginning of 1993 as the applicable valuationdate pursuant to paragraph (e)(3)(ii)(D)(<T3>1</T3>)(<T3>i</T3>) of this section. P is not required to use the date of A's saleas the applicable valuation date under paragraph (e)(3)(ii)(D)(<T3>1</T3>)(<T3>ii</T3>) of this section because during the portion of 1993 precedingA's sale, P did not sell any of its property and A did not contribute anyproperty to P. At the beginning of 1993, the fair market value and adjustedbasis of the property used in P's activities are as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp0,i1,s25,8,8</C> <H1> </H1><H1>Adjusted basis</H1><H1>Fair market value</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">X<D>$68,000</D><D>$48,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Y<D>30,000</D><D>62,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Z<D>20,000</D><D>80,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Marketable securities<D>2,000</D><D>10,000</D><R>n,s,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total<D>120,000</D><D>200,000</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Under paragraph (e)(3)(ii)(B) of this section, the portion ofA's $20,000 gain that is allocated to an appreciated activity of P (i.e.,activities Y and Z and the marketable securities) is the amount of suchgain multiplied by the fraction obtained by dividing (a) the net gain thatwould have been allocated to A with respect to the interest sold by A ifP had sold its entire interest in such activity at the beginning of 1993by (b) the sum of the amounts of net gain that would have been allocatedto A with respect to the interest sold by A if P had sold its entire interestin each appreciated activity at the beginning of 1993.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(v) If P had sold its entire interest in activities Y and Z and themarketable securities at the beginning of 1993, A would have been allocatedthe following amounts of net gain with respect to the interest in P thatA sold in 1993:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s25,8</C> <H1>Activity</H1><H1>Net gain</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Y<D>$8,000 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Z<D>15,000 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Marketable securities<D>2,000</D><R>n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total<D>25,000</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(vi) Accordingly, under paragraph (e)(3)(ii) of this section, $6,400of A's $20,000 gain ($20,000 andmultiply; $8,000/$25,000) is allocated toactivity Y, $12,000 of A's $20,000 gain ($20,000 andmultiply; $15,000/$25,000)is allocated to activity Z, and $1,600 of A's $20,000 gain ($20,000 andmultiply;$2,000/$25,000) is allocated to the marketable securities. The gain allocatedto activity Y is passive activity gross income. None of that gain is treatedas gain that is not from a passive activity under paragraph (e)(3)(iii)of this section because paragraph (c)(2)(iii) of this section would nothave applied to any of the gain that A would have been allocated if P hadsold all of the property used in activity Y immediately prior to A's sale.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2).</T3> (i) B and C, calendar year individuals, are equalpartners in calendar year partnership R, which they formed on January 1,2005, with contributions of property and money. The only item of property(other than money) contributed by B was a building that B had used for12 years preceding the contribution in an activity that was not a passiveactivity during such period. At the time of its contribution, the buildinghad an adjusted basis of $40,000 and a fair market value of $66,000. Ris engaged in a single activity: the sale of equipment to customers inthe ordinary course of the business of dealing in such property. R usesthe building contributed by B in the dealership activity. B did not materiallyparticipate in the dealership activity during 2005. On July 1, 2005, Dpurchases one-half of B's interest in R for $37,500 in cash. At the timeof the sale, the balance sheet of R, which uses the accrual method of accounting,is as follows: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp0,i1,s25,8,8</C><H1>  </H1><H1>Adjusted basis per books </H1><H1>Fair market value</H1> <ITAG tagnum="21"><T2>Assets</T2><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Cash <D>$30,000 </D><D>$30,000 </D></ITAG>Accounts receivable: <ITAG tagnum="2">Dealership <D>20,000 </D><D>18,000 </D></ITAG>Inventory: <ITAG tagnum="2">Dealership <D>52,000 </D><D>66,000 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Building <D>40,000 </D><D>66,000</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total <D>142,000 </D><D>180,000</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T2>Liabilities and Capital</T2><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Liabilities <D>$30,000 </D><D>$30,000 </D></ITAG>Capital: <ITAG tagnum="2">B <D>47,000 </D><D>75,000 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">C <D>65,000 </D><D>75,000</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total <D>142,000 </D><D>180,000</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Thus, B's gain from the sale is $14,000 ($45,000 amount realized fromthe sale (consisting of $37,500 of cash and $7,500 of liabilities assumedby the purchaser) minus B's $31,000 adjusted basis for the interest sold(one-half of B's total adjusted basis of $62,000)). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Under paragraph (e)(3)(ii) of this section, all $14,000 of B'sgain from the sale is allocated to R's dealership activity, which is apassive activity of B for 2005. If, however, R had sold its interest inthe building immediately prior to B's sale for its fair market value onthe applicable valuation date (the valuation date selected by R is irrelevantsince the building had a fair market value of $66,000 at the beginningof 2005 and at the time of the sale), B would have been allocated $13,000of gain under section 704(c) with respect to the interest in R that B soldto D. This gain would have been treated as gain that is not from a passiveactivity under paragraph (c)(2)(iii) of this section and would have exceeded10 percent of the total amount of B's gain that is allocated to the dealershipactivity under paragraph (e)(3)(ii) of this section. Accordingly, underparagraph (e)(3)(iii) of this section, B's gain from the sale ($14,000)is treated as gain that is not from a passive activity to the extent thatsuch gain does not exceed the amount of gain subject to paragraph (c)(2)(iii)of this section that B would have been allocated with respect to the interestsold to D if R had sold all of the property used in the dealership activityimmediately prior to B's sale ($13,000). Thus, $13,000 of B's gain fromthe sale is treated as gain that is not from a passive activity.</ITAG>(f)<T3> Recharacterization of passive income in certain situations</T3>_(1)<T3> In general.</T3> This paragraph (f) sets forth rules that requireincome from certain passive activities to be treated as income that isnot from a passive activity (regardless of whether such income is treatedas passive activity gross income under section 469 or any other provisionof the regulations thereunder). For definitions of certain terms used inthis paragraph (f), see paragraph (f)(9) of this section. (2)<T3> Special rule for significant participation</T3>_(i)<T3> In general.</T3> An amount of the taxpayer's gross income from eachsignificant participation passive activity for the taxable year equal toa ratable portion of the taxpayer's net passive income from such activityfor the taxable year shall be treated as not from a passive activity ifthe taxpayer's passive activity gross income from all significant participationpassive activities for the taxable year (determined without regard to paragraphs(f) (2) through (4) of this section) exceeds the taxpayer's passive activitydeductions from all such activities for such year. For purposes of thisparagraph (f)(2), the ratable portion of the net passive income from anactivity is determined by multiplying the amount of such income by thefraction obtained by dividing_ (A) The amount of the excess described in the preceding sentence; by (B) The amount of the excess described in the preceding sentence takinginto account only significant participation passive activities from whichthe taxpayer has net passive income for the taxable year. (ii)<T3> Significant participation passive activity.</T3> For purposes of thisparagraph (f)(2), the term ``significant participation passive activity''means any trade or business activity (within the meaning of andSection; 1.469-1T(e)(2))in which the taxpayer significantly participates (within the meaning ofandSection; 1.469-5T(c)(2)) for the taxable year but in which the taxpayerdoes not materially participate (within the meaning of andSection; 1.469-5T)for such year. (iii)<T3> Example.</T3> The following example illustrates the application ofthis paragraph (f)(2):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example.</T3> (i) A owns interests in three trade or business activities,X, Y, and Z. A does not materially participate in any of these activitiesfor the taxable year, but participates in activity X for 110 hours, inactivity Y for 160 hours, and in activity Z for 125 hours. A owns no interestin any other trade or business activity in which A does not materiallyparticipate for the taxable year but in which A participates for more than100 hours during the taxable year. A's net passive income (or loss) forthe taxable year from activities X, Y, and Z is as follows: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>4,L2,tp0,i1,s25,4)0,6)0,4)0 </C> <H1>  </H1><H1>X </H1><H1>Y </H1><H1>Z</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">Passive activity gross income <D>$600 </D><D>$700 </D><D>$900 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Passive activity deductions <D>(200) </D><D>(1,000) </D><D>(300)</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Net passive income <D>400 </D><D>(300) </D><D>600</D></ITAG></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Under paragraph (f)(2)(ii) of this section, activities X, Y,and Z are A's only significant participation passive activities for thetaxable year. A's passive activity gross income from significant participationpassive activities ($2,200) exceeds A's passive activity deductions fromsignificant participation passive activities ($1,500) by $700 for suchyear. Therefore, under paragraph (f)(2)(i) of this section, a ratable portionof A's gross income from activities X and Z (A's significant participationpassive activities with net passive income for the taxable year) is treatedas gross income that is not from a passive activity. The ratable portionis determined by dividing (a) the amount by which A's passive activitygross income from significant participation passive activities exceedsA's passive activity deductions from significant participation passiveactivities for the taxable year ($700) by (b) such excess taking into accountonly A's significant participation passive activities having net passiveincome for the taxable year ($1,000). Accordingly, $280 of gross incomefrom activity X ($400 x 700/1000) and $420 of gross income from activityZ ($600 x 700/1000) is treated as gross income that is not from a passiveactivity.</ITAG>(3)<T3> Rental of nondepreciable property.</T3> If less than 30 percent ofthe unadjusted basis of the property used or held for use by customersin a rental activity (within the meaning of andSection; 1.469-1T(e)(3)) duringthe taxable year is subject to the allowance for depreciation under section167, an amount of the taxpayer's gross income from the activity equal tothe taxpayer's net passive income from the activity shall be treated asnot from a passive activity. For purposes of this paragraph (f)(3), theterm ``unadjusted basis'' means adjusted basis determined without regardto any adjustment described in section 1016 that decreases basis. The followingexample illustrates the application of this paragraph (f)(3):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example.</T3> C is a limited partner in a partnership. The partnershipacquires vacant land for $300,000, constructs improvements on the landat a cost of $100,000, and leases the land and improvements to a tenant.The partnership then sells the land and improvements for $600,000, therebyrealizing a gain on the disposition. The unadjusted basis of the improvements($100,000) equals 25 percent of the unadjusted basis of all property ($400,000)used in the rental activity. Therefore, under this paragraph (f)(3), anamount of C's gross income from the activity equal to the net passive incomefrom the activity (which is computed by taking into account the gain fromthe disposition, including gain allocable to the improvements) is treatedas not from a passive activity.</ITAG>(4) <T3>Net interest income from passive equity-financed lending activity</T3>_(i)<T3>In general. </T3>An amount of the taxpayer's gross income for the taxableyear from any equity-financed lending activity equal to the lesser of_(A) The taxpayer's equity-financed interest income from the activity forsuch year; and(B) The taxpayer's net passive income from the activity for such year</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">shall be treated as not from a passive activity.(ii) <T3>Equity-financed lending activity</T3>_(A) <T3>In general. </T3>For purposes of this paragraph (f)(4), an activityis an equity-financed lending activity for a taxable year if_(<T3>1</T3>) The activity involves a trade or business of lending money;and(<T3>2</T3>) The average outstanding balance of the liabilities incurredin the activity for the taxable year does not exceed 80 percent of theaverage outstanding balance of the interest-bearing assets held in theactivity for such year.(B) <T3>Certain liabilities not taken into account. </T3>For purposes of paragraph(f)(4)(ii)(A)(<T3>2</T3>) of this section, liabilities incurred principally for the purposeof increasing the percentage described in paragraph (f)(4)(ii)(A)(<T3>2</T3>) of this section shall not be taken into account in computingsuch percentage.(iii) <T3>Equity-financed interest income. </T3>For purposes of this paragraph(f)(4), the taxpayer's equity-financed interest income from an activityfor a taxable year is the amount of the taxpayer's net interest incomefrom the activity for such year multiplied by the fraction obtained bydividing_(A) The excess of the average outstanding balance for such year of theinterest-bearing assets held in the activity over the average outstandingbalance for such year of the liabilities incurred in the activity; by(B) The average outstanding balance for such year of the interest-bearingassets held in the activity.(iv) <T3>Net interest income. </T3>For purposes of this paragraph (f)(4), thenet interest income from an activity for a taxable year is_(A) The gross interest income from the activity for such year; reducedby(B) Expenses from the activity (other than interest on liabilities describedin paragraph (f)(4)(vi) of this section) for such year that are reasonablyallocable to such gross interest income.(v) <T3>Interest-bearing assets. </T3>For purposes of this paragraph (f)(4),the interest-bearing assets held in an activity include all assets thatproduce interest income, including loans to customers.(vi) <T3>Liabilities incurred in the activity. </T3>For purposes of this paragraph(f)(4), liabilities incurred in an activity include all fixed and determinableliabilities incurred in the activity that bear interest or are issued withoriginal issue discount other than debts secured by tangible property usedin the activity. In the case of an activity conducted by an entity in whichthe taxpayer owns a interest, liabilities incurred in an activity includeonly liabilities with respect to which the entity is the borrower.(vii) <T3>Average outstanding balance. </T3>For purposes of this paragraph (f)(4),the average outstanding balance of liabilities incurred in an activityor of the interest-bearing assets held in an activity may be computed ona daily, monthly, or quarterly basis at the option of the taxpayer.(viii) <T3>Example. </T3>The following example illustrates the application ofthis paragraph (f)(4):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example: </T3>(i) A, a calendar year individual, acquires on January1, 1988, a limited partnership interest in P, a calendar year partnership.Under the partnership agreement, A has a one percent share of each itemof income, gain, loss, deduction, and credit of P. A acquires the partnershipinterest for $90,000, using $50,000 of unborrowed funds and $40,000 ofproceeds of a loan bearing interest at an annual rate of 10 percent. Apays $4,000 of interest on the loan in 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) P's sole activity is a trade or business of lending money. Adoes not materially participate in the activity for 1988. During 1988,the average outstanding balance of P's interest-bearing assets (includingloans to customers, temporary deposits with other lending institutions,and government and corporate securities) is $20 million. P incurs numerousinterest-bearing liabilities in connection with its lending activity, includingliabilities for deposits taken from customers, unsecured short-term andlong-term loans from other lending institutions, and a mortgage loan securedby the building, owned by P, in which P conducts its business. For 1988,the average outstanding balance of all of these liabilities (other thanthe mortgage loan) is $11 million. None of these liabilities was incurredby P principally for the purpose of increasing the percentage describedin paragraph (f)(4)(ii)(<T3>2</T3>) of this section.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) The interest income derived by P for 1988 from its interest-bearingassets is $2.2 million. The interest expense paid by P for 1988 with respectto the liabilities incurred in connection with its lending activity (otherthan the mortgage loan) is $990,000. P's other expenses for 1988 that arereasonably allocable to P's gross interest income (including expenses foradvertising, loan processing and servicing, and insurance, and depreciationon P's building) total $250,000. P's interest expense for 1988 on the mortgageloan secured by the building used in P's lending activity is $50,000. Allof the interest expense paid or incurred by P for 1988 is allocated underandSection; 1.63-8T to expeditures in connection with P's lending activity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Under paragraph (f)(4)(ii) of this section, P's activity is anequity-financed lending activity for 1988, since, for 1988, the activityinvolves a trade or business of lending money and the average outstandingbalance of the liabilities incurred in the activity ($11 million) doesnot exceed 80 percent of the average outstanding balance of the interest-bearingassets held in the activity ($20 million). Accordingly, under paragraph(f)(4)(i) of this section, an amount of A's gross income from the activityequal to the lesser of (a) A's equity-financed interest income from theactivity for 1988, or (b) A's net passive income from the activity for1988, is treated as income that is not from a passive activity. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(v) Under paragraph (f)(4)(iii) of this section, A's equity-financedinterest income from the activity for 1988 is determined by multiplyingA's net interest income from the activity for 1988 by the fraction obtainedby dividing $9 million (the excess of the average interest-bearing assetsfor 1988 over the average interest-bearing liabilities for 1988) by $20million (the average interest-bearing assets for 1988). Under paragraph(f)(4)(iv) of this section, A's net interest income from the activity for1988 is $19,000 (A's distributive share of $2.2 million of gross interestincome less A's distributive share of $300,000 of expenses described inparagraph (f)(4)(iv)(B) of this section, including interest expense onthe mortgage loan). A's distributive share of P's other interest expense($990,000) is not taken into account in computing A's net interest incomefor 1988. Accordingly, A's equity-financed interest income from the activityfor 1988 is $8,550 ($19,000 x $9 million/$20 million).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(vi) Under paragraph (f)(9)(i) of this section, A's net passive incomefrom the activity for 1988 is determined by taking into account A's distributiveshare of P's gross income and deductions from the activity for 1988, aswell as any interest expense incurred by A individually that is taken intoaccount under andSection;1.163-8T in determining A's income or loss fromthe activity for 1988. Assuming that for 1988 all $4,000 of interest expenseon the loan that A used to finance the acquisition of A's interest in Pis allocated under andSection;1.163-8T to expenditures of A in connectionwith the lending activity for 1988, A's net passive income from the activityfor 1988 is $5,100, computed as set forth in the following table: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L0,tp0,p0,8/9,g1,t1,i1,s25,5)0</C> <H1> </H1><H1> </H1> <T3>Gross income: </T3><ITAG tagnum="2">Interest income <D>$22,000 </D></ITAG><T3>Deductions: </T3><ITAG tagnum="2">Distributive share of P's expenses from the activity <D>(12,900) </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Interest expense on A's acquisition debt <D>(4,000</D>) <R>n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Net passive income <D>5,100 </D></ITAG></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="21">(vii) A's net passive income from the activity for 1988 ($5,100) isless than A's equity-financed income form the activity for 1988 ($8,550).Accordingly, under this paragraph (f)(4), $5,100 of A's gross income fromthe activity for 1988 is treated as not from a passive activity.</ITAG>(5) <T3>Net income from certain property rented incidental to development activity</T3>_(i)<T3>In general. </T3>An amount of the taxpayer's gross rental activityincome for the taxable year from an item of property used in a rental activityfor such year equal to the net rental activity income for the year fromsuch item of property shall be treated as not from a passive activity if_(A) Any gain from the sale, exchange, or other disposition of the itemof property is included in the taxpayer's income for the taxable year;(B) The use of the item of property in an activity involving the rentalof such property commenced less than 24 months before the date of the disposition(within the meaning of paragraph (c)(2)(iii)(B) of this section) of suchproperty; and (C) The taxpayer materially participated (within the meaning of andSection;1.469-5T,but without regard to paragraph (e) thereof) or significantly participated(within the meaning of andSection;1.469-5T(c)(2)) for any taxable year inan activity that involved for such year the performance of services forthe purpose of enhancing the value of such item of property (or any otheritem of property if the basis of the item of property that is sold, exchanged,or otherwise disposed of is determined in whole or in part by referenceto the basis of such other item of property). (ii) <T3>Commencement of use. </T3>For purposes of paragraph (f)(5)(i)(B) ofthis section, the use of an item of property in an activity involving therental of such property commences when substantially all of the propertyis first held out for rent and is in a state of readiness for rental. (iii) <T3>Services performed for the purpose of enhancing the value of property.</T3>For purposes of paragraph (f)(5)(i)(C) of this section, services thatare treated as performed for the purpose of enhancing the value of an itemof property include but are not limited to_ (A) Construction; (B) Renovation; and (C) Lease-up (but only if, as of the time the taxpayer commences usingthe property in the activity described in paragraph (f)(5)(i)(B), a substantialportion of the property is not leased). (iv) <T3>Example. </T3>The following example illustrates the application ofthis paragraph (f)(5):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example. </T3>(i) A, a calendar year individual, is a partner in calendaryear partnership P, which is engaged in an activity of developing commercialreal estate. In 1988, P acquires an interest in undeveloped land, and arrangesfor the financing and construction of an office building on the land. Beginningon March 1, 1990, substantially all of the building is held out for rentand is in a state of readiness for rental. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) P holds the building for rent for the remainder of 1990 and allof 1991 and 1992, and sells the building on January 15, 1993, pursuantto a contract entered into on January 15, 1992. P did not hold the buildingfor sale to customers in the ordinary course of P's trade or business (seeandSection; 1.469-1T (e)(3)(vi)(D)). A's distributive share of P's taxablelosses from the rental of the building is $50,000, $30,000, and $30,000,respectively, for 1990, 1991, and 1992. All of A's losses from the rentalof the building are disallowed under andSection; 1.469-1T (a)(1)(i). A'sdistributive share of the gain recognized by P on the sale of the buildingis $150,000. A has no other gross income or deductions from the activityof renting the building. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) For purposes of paragraph (f)(5)(i)(C), in 1988, 1989, and 1990,P's real estate development activity involves the performance of servicesfor the purpose of enhancing the value of the building. In 1993, the buildingis sold, and the date on which the use of the building in the rental activitycommenced (March 1, 1990) was less then 24 months before the date on whicha binding contract for such sale was entered into (January 15, 1992). Accordingly,if A materially participated in P's real estate development activity in1988, 1989, or 1990 (without regard to whether A materially participatedin the activity in more than one of those years), an amount of A's grossrental activity income for 1993 from the building equal to A's net rentalactivity income for 1993 from such building ($150,000_$110,000 of previouslydisallowed deductions = $40,000) is treated under this paragraph (f)(5)as gross income that is not from a passive activity.</ITAG>(6) <T3>Property rented to a nonpassive activity. </T3>An amount of the taxpayer'sgross rental activity income for the taxable year from an item of propertyused in a rental activity for such year equal to the net rental activityincome for the year from such item of property shall be treated as notfrom a passive activity if such property_(i) Is rented for use in a trade or business activity (within the meaningof andSection; 1.469-1T (e)(2)) in which the taxpayer materially participates(within the meaning of andSection; 1.469-5T, but without regard to paragraph(e) thereof) for the taxable year; and (ii) Is not described in paragraph (f)(5) of this section.(7) <T3>Special rules applicable to the acquisition of an interest in a passthroughentity engaged in the trade or business of licensing intangible property_</T3>(i)<T3>In general. </T3>If a taxpayer acquires an interest in an entity describedin paragraph (c)(3)(iii)(B)(<T3>3</T3>) of this section (the ``development entity'') after the developmententity has created an item of intangible property or performed substantialservices or incurred substantial costs with respect to the developmentor marketing of an item of intangible property, an amount of the taxpayer'sgross royalty income for the taxable year from such item of property equalto the taxpayer's net royalty income for the year from such item of propertyshall be treated as not from a passive activity. (ii) <T3>Royalty income from property. </T3>For purposes of this paragraph (f)(7)_(A) A taxpayer's gross royalty income for a taxable year from an item ofproperty is the taxpayer's share of passive activity gross income for suchyear (determined without regard to paragraphs (f)(2) through (7) of thissection) from the licensing or transfer of any right in such property;and (B) A taxpayer's net royalty income for a taxable year from an item ofproperty is the excess, if any, of_(<T3>1</T3>) The taxpayer's gross royalty income for the taxable year fromsuch item of property; over (<T3>2</T3>) Any passive activity deductions for such taxable year (includingany deduction treated as a deduction for such year under andSection; 1.469-1T(f)(4)) that are reasonably allocable to such item of property. (iii) <T3>Exceptions. </T3>Paragraph (f)(7)(i) of this section shall not applyto a taxpayer's gross royalty income for a taxable year from the licensingof an item of intangible property if_(A) The expenditures reasonably incurred by the development entity forthe taxable year of the entity ending with or within the taxpayer's taxableyear with respect to the development or marketing of such property satisfyparagraph (c)(3)(iii)(B)(<T3>2</T3>)(<T3>ii</T3>) (<T3>a</T3>) of this section; or (B) The taxpayer's share of the expenditures reasonably incurred by thedevelopment entity with respect to the development or marketing of suchproperty for all taxable years of the entity beginning with the taxableyear of the entity in which the taxpayer acquired the interest in the entityand ending with the taxable year of the entity ending with or within thetaxpayer's current taxable year exceeds 25 percent of the fair market valueof the taxpayer's interest in such property at the time the taxpayer acquiredthe interest in the entity.(iv) <T3>Capital expenditures. </T3>For purposes of paragraph (f)(7)(iii)(B)of this section, a capital expenditure shall be taken into account forthe taxable year of the entity in which such expenditure is chargeableto capital account, and the taxpayer's share of such expenditure shallbe determined as though such expenditure were allowed as a deduction forsuch year. (v) <T3>Example. </T3>The following example illustrates the application ofthis paragraph (f)(7):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example.</T3> (i) The facts are the same as in example (5) in paragraph(c)(3)(iv) of this section, except that, in 1988, D's 10 percent partnershipinterest is sold to F for $13,000, all of which is attributable to thedesign licensed by the partnership.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) For 1988, the expenditures reasonably incurred by the partnershipwith respect to the development or marketing of the design satisfy paragraph(c)(3)(iii)(B)(<T3>2</T3>)(<T3>ii</T3>)(<T3>a</T3>) of this section. Accordingly, under paragraph (f)(7)(iii)(A)of this section, paragraph (f)(7)(i) of this section does not apply toF's distributive share of the partnership's gross income from licensingthe design.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) For 1989, the expenditures reasonably incurred by the partnershipwith respect to the development or marketing of the design do not satisfyparagraph (c)(3)(iii)(B)(<T3>2</T3>)(<T3>ii</T3>)(<T3>a</T3>) of this section. Moreover, F's distributive share of such expendituresreasonably incurred by the partnership for 1988 and 1989 ($27,000 x .10= $2,700) does not exceed 25 percent of the fair market value of F's interestin the design at the time F acquired the partnership interest ($13,000).Accordingly, neither of the exceptions provided in paragraph (f)(7)(iii)of this section applies for 1989 and, under paragraph (f)(7)(i) of thissection, an amount of F's gross royalty income from the design equal toF's net royalty income from the design is treated as not from a passiveactivity.</ITAG>(8) <T3>Limitation on recharacterized income.</T3> The amount of gross incomefrom an activity that is treated as not from a passive activity for thetaxable year under subparagraphs (f) (2) through (4) of this paragraph(f) shall not exceed the greatest amount of gross income treated as notfrom a passive activity under any one of such subparagraphs. (9) <T3>Meaning of certain terms.</T3> For purposes of this paragraph (f),the terms set forth below shall have the following meanings:(i) The net passive income from an activity for a taxable year is the amountby which the taxpayer's passive activity gross income from the activityfor the taxable year (determined without regard to paragraphs (f) (2) through(4) of this section) exceeds the taxpayer's passive activity deductionsfrom the activity for such year;(ii) The net passive loss from an activity for a taxable year is the amountby which the taxpayer's passive activity deductions from the activity forthe taxable year exceeds the taxpayer's passive activity gross income fromthe activity for such year (determined without regard to paragraphs (f)(2) through (4) of this section).(iii) The gross rental activity income for a taxable year from an itemof property used in a rental activity for such year is any passive activitygross income for such year (determined without regard to paragraphs (f)(2) through (6) of this section) from the rental or disposition of suchitem of property; and (iv) The net rental activity income from an item of property for a taxableyear is the excess, if any, of_ (A) The gross rental activity income from such item of property for thetaxable year; over(B) Any passive activity deductions for such taxable year (including anydeduction treated as a deduction for such year under andSection;  1.469-1T(f)(4))that are reasonably allocable to the use of such item of property in therental activity.(10) <T3>Coordination with section 163(d).</T3> Gross income that is treatedas not from a passive activity under paragraph (f) (3), (4), or (7) ofthis section shall be treated as income described in section 469 (e)(1)(A)and paragraph (c)(3)(i) of this section except in determining whether_(i) Any property is treated for purposes of section 469(e)(1)(A)(ii)(I)and paragraph (c)(3)(i)(C) of this section as property that produces incomeof a type described in paragraph (c)(3)(i)(A) of this section;(ii) An expense (other than interest expense) is treated for purposes ofsection 469(e)(1)(A)(i)(II) and paragraph (d)(4) of this section as clearlyand directly allocable to portfolio income (within the meaning of paragraph(c)(3)(i) of this section); and (iii) Interest expense is allocated under andSection;  1.163-8T to an investmentexpenditure (within the meaning of andSection; 1.163-8T(b)(3)) or to a passiveactivity expenditure (within the meaning of andSection; 1.163-8T(b)(4)).(11) <T3>Effective date.</T3> For the effective date of the rules in this paragraph(f), see andSection; 1.469-11T (relating to effective date and transitionrules).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1.469-3T </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Passive activity credit (temporary). </ITAG>(a) <T3>Computation of passive activity credit.</T3> The taxpayer's passiveactivity credit for the taxable year is the amount (if any) by which_ (1) The sum of all of the taxpayer's credits that are subject to section469 for such year; exceeds (2) The taxpayer's regular tax liability allocable to all passive activitiesfor such year. (b) <T3>Credits subject to section 469</T3>_(1) <T3>In general.</T3> Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (b),a credit is subject to section 469 for a taxable year if and only if_ (i) Such credit_(A) Is attributable to such taxable year and arises in connection withthe conduct of an activity that is a passive activity for such taxableyear; and (B) Is decribed in_ (<T3>1</T3>) Section 38(b) (1) through (5) (relating to general businesscredits); (<T3>2</T3>) Section 27(b) (relating to corporations described in section936); (<T3>3</T3>) Section 28 (relating to clinical testing of certain drugs);or (<T3>4</T3>) Section 29 (relating to fuel from nonconventional sources);or (ii) Such credit is allocable to an activity for such taxable year underandSection; 1.469-1T(f)(4). (2) <T3>Treatment of credits attributable to qualified progress expenditures.</T3>Any credit attributable to an increase in qualified investment under section46(d)(1)(A) (relating to qualified progress expenditures) with respectto progress expenditure property (as defined in section 46(d)(2)) is subjectto section 469 for a taxable year if_ (i) Such credit is attributable to such taxable year; (ii) Such credit is described in paragraph (b)(1)(i)(B) of this section;and (iii) It is reasonable to believe that such progress expenditure propertywill be used in a passive activity of the taxpayer when it is placed inservice. (3) <T3>Special rule for partners and S corporation shareholders.</T3> Thecharacter of a credit of a taxpayer arising in connection with an activityconducted by a partnership or S corporation (as a credit subject to section469) shall be determined, in any case in which participation is relevant,by reference to the participation of the taxpayer in such activity. Suchparticipation is determined for the taxable year of the partnership orS corporation (and not the taxable year of the taxpayer). See andSection;1.469-2T(e)(1).(4) <T3>Exception for pre-1987 credits.</T3> A credit is not subject to section469 if it is attributable to a taxable year of the taxpayer beginning priorto January 1, 1987. (c) <T3>Taxable year to which credit is attributable.</T3> A credit is attributableto the taxable year in which such credit would be (or would have been)allowed if the credits regard to the limitations contained in sections26(a), 28(d)(2), 29(b)(5), 38(c), and 469. (d) <T3>Regular tax liability allocable to passive activities</T3>_(1) <T3>In general.</T3> For purposes of paragraph (a)(2) of this section,the taxpayer's regular tax liability allocable to all passive activitiesfor the taxable year is the excess (if any) of_ (i) The taxpayer's regular tax liability for such taxable year; over (ii) The amount of such regular tax liability determined by reducing thetaxpayer's income for such year by the excess (if any) of the taxpayer'spassive activity gross income for such year over the taxpayer's passiveactivity deductions for such year. (2) <T3>Regular tax liability.</T3> For purposes of this section, the term``regulary tax liability'' has the meaning given such term in section 26(b).(e) <T3>Coordination with section 39.</T3> For purposes of section 39 (relatingto the carryback and carryforward of unused business credits), any creditdescribed in section 38(b) (1) through (5) is treated as a current yearbusiness credit for the first taxable year in which such credit is subjectto section 469 and is not disallowed by section 469 and the regulationsthereunder. (f) <T3>Examples.</T3> The following examples illustrate the application ofthis section: <ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1).</T3> (i) A, a calendar year individual, is a general partnerin calendar year partnership P. P purchases a building in 1987 and, in1987, 1988, and 1989, incurs rehabilitation costs with respect to the building.The building is placed in service in the rental activity in 1989. P's rehabilitationcosts are qualified rehabilitation expenditures (within the meaning ofsection 48(g)(2)) and are taken into account in determining the amountof the investment credit for rehabilitation expenditures. P's qualifiedrehabilitation expenditures are not qualified progress expenditures (withinthe meaning of section 46(d)). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Because, under section 46(c)(1), the credit is allowable forthe taxable year in which the rehabilitated property is placed in service,the credit allowable for P's qualified rehabilitation expenditures arisesin connection with the activity in which the property is placed in service.In addition, the credit is attributable to 1989, the year in which theproperty is placed in service, because it would be allowed for such yearif A's credits allowed for all taxable years were determined without regardto the limitations contained in sections 26(a), 28(d)(2), 29(b)(5), 38(c),and 469. Accordingly, under paragraph (b)(1) of this section, A's distributiveshare of the credit is subject to section 469 for 1989 because the creditarises in connection with a rental activity for such year. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2). </T3>The facts are the same as in example (1), exceptthat the rehabilitation costs are incurred in anticipation of placing thebuilding in service in a rental activity, the qualified rehabilitationexpenditures in 1987 and 1988 are qualified progress expenditures (``QPEs'')(within the meaning of section 46(d)(3)), the improvements resulting fromthe expenditures are progress expenditure property (within the meaningof paragraph (d)(2) of this section), and it is reasonable to expect thatsuch property will be transition property (within the meaning of section49(e)) when the property is placed in service. Therefore, under section46(d)(1)(A), the qualified investment for 1987 and 1988 is increased byan amount equal to the aggregate of the applicable percentage of the qualifiedrehabilitation expenditures incurred in such years. The credits that arebased on these expenditures are attributable (under paragraph (c) of thissection) to 1987 and 1988, respectively. It is reasonable to believe in1987 and 1988 that the progress expenditure property will be used in arental activity when it is placed in service. Accordingly, under paragraph(b)(2) of this section, A's distributive share of the credit for 1987 and1988 is subject to section 469. Under paragraph (b)(1) of this section(as in example (1)), A's distributive share of the credit for 1989 is alsosubject to section 469. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (3). </T3>(i) B, a single individual, acquires an interestin a partnership that, in 1988, rehabilitates a building and places itin service in a trade or business activity in which B does not materiallyparticipate. For 1988, B has the following items of gross income, deduction,and credit: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L0,tp0,p0,8/9,g1,t1,i1,s25,8,8 </C> <H1> </H1><H1> </H1><H1> </H1><T3>Gross income: </T3><ITAG tagnum="2">Income other than passive activity gross income <D>$110,000 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Passive activity gross income <D>20,000 </D><D>$130,000</D><R>n,s,n</R></ITAG><T3>Deductions: </T3><ITAG tagnum="2">Deductions other than passive activity deductions <D>23,950 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Passive activity deductions <D>18,000 </D><D>(41,950)</D><R>n,s,d</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Taxable income <D> </D><D>88,050</D><R>n,n,d</R></ITAG><T3>Credits: </T3><ITAG tagnum="2">Rehabilitation credit from the passive activity <D> </D><D>8,000 </D></ITAG></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) For 1988, the amount by which B's passive activity gross incomeexceeds B's passive activity deductions (B's net passive income) is $2,000.Under paragraph (d) of this section, B's regular tax liability allocableto passive activities for 1988 is determined as follows: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L0,tp0,p0,8/9,g1,t1,i1,s25,7,10 </C>  <H1>  </H1><H1>  </H1><H1>  </H1> <ITAG tagnum="2">(A) Taxable income <D>$88,050 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">(B) Regular tax liability <D> </D><D>$24,578.50 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">(C) Taxable income minus net passive income <D>86,050 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">(D) Regular tax liability for taxable income of $86,050.00 <D> </D><D>23,918.50</D><R>n,n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">(E) Regular tax liability allocable to passive activities ((B) minus(D)) <D> </D><D>$660.00 </D></ITAG></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Under paragraph (a) of this section, B's passive activity creditfor 1988 is the amount by which B's credits that are subject to section469 for 1988 ($8,000) exceed B's regular tax liability allocable to passiveactivities for 1988 ($660.00). Accordingly, B's passive activity creditfor 1988 is $7,340. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (4). </T3>(i) The facts are the same as in example (3) exceptthat, in 1988, B also has additional deductions of $100,000 from a tradeor business activity in which B materially participates for 1988. Thus,B has a taxable loss for 1988 of $11,950, determined as follows: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L0,tp0,p0,8/9,g1,t1,i1,s25,8,8)0 </C>  <H1>  </H1><H1>  </H1><H1>  </H1> <T3>Gross income: </T3><ITAG tagnum="2">Income other than passive activity gross income <D>$110,000 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Passive activity gross income <D>20,000 </D><D>$130,000</D><R>n,s,n</R></ITAG><T3>Deductions: </T3><ITAG tagnum="2">Deductions other than passive activity deductions <D>123,950 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Passive activity deductions <D>18,000 </D><D>(141,950)</D><R>n,s,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Taxable income <D> </D><D>(11,950) </D></ITAG></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Under section 26(b) and paragraph (d)(2) of this section, theregular tax liability for a taxable year cannot exceed the tax imposedby chapter 1 of subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code for the taxableyear. Therefore, under paragraph (d)(1) of this section, B's regular taxliability allocable to passive activities for 1988 is zero. Although B'snet operating loss for the taxable year is reduced by B's net passive income,and B's regular tax liability for other taxable years may increase as aresult of the reduction, such an increase does not change B's regular taxliability allocable to passive activities for 1988. Accordingly, B's passiveactivity credit for 1988 is $8,000. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1.469-4T </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definition of activity (temporary). [Reserved] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1.469-5T </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Material participation (temporary). </ITAG>(a) <T3>In general. </T3>Except as provided in paragraphs (e) and (h)(2) ofthis section, an individual shall be treated, for purposes of section 469and the regulations thereunder, as materially participating in an activityfor the taxable year if and only if_ (1) The individual participates in the activity for more than 500 hoursduring such year; (2) The individual's participation in the activity for the taxable yearconstitutes substantially all of the participation in such activity ofall individuals (including individuals who are not owners of interestsin the activity) for such year; (3) The individual participates in the activity for more than 100 hoursduring the taxable year, and such individual's participation in the activityfor the taxable year is not less than the participation in the activityof any other individual (including individuals who are not owners of interestsin the activity) for such year; (4) The activity is a significant participation activity (within the meaningof paragraph (c) of this section) for the taxable year, and the individual'saggregate participation in all significant participation activities duringsuch year exceeds 500 hours; (5) The individual materially participated in the activity (determinedwithout regard to this paragraph (a)(5)) for any five taxable years (whetheror not consecutive) during the ten taxable years that immediately precedethe taxable year; (6) The activity is a personal service activity (within the meaning ofparagraph (d) of this section), and the individual materially participatedin the activity for any three taxable years (whether or not consecutive)preceding the taxable year; or (7) Based on all of the facts and circumstances (taking into account therules in paragraph (b) of this section), the individual participates inthe activity on a regular, continuous, and substantial basis during suchyear. (b) <T3>Facts and circumstances</T3>_(1) <T3>In general. </T3>[Reserved] (2) <T3>Certain participation insufficient to constitute material participationunder this paragraph (b) </T3>_(i) <T3>Participation satisfying standards not contained in section 469. </T3>Exceptas provided in section 469(h)(3) and paragraph (h)(2) of this section (relatingto certain retired individuals and surviving spouses in the case of farmingactivities), the fact that an individual satisfies the requirements ofany participation standard (whether or not referred to as ``material participation'')under any provision (including sections 1402 and 2032A and the regulationsthereunder) other than section 469 and the regulations thereunder shallnot be taken into account in determining whether such individual materiallyparticipates in any activity for any taxable year for purposes of section469 and the regulations thereunder. (ii) <T3>Certain management activities. </T3>An individual's services performedin the management of an activity shall not be taken into account in determiningwhether such individual is treated as materially participating in suchactivity for the taxable year under paragraph (a)(7) of this section unless,for such taxable year_ (A) No person (other than such individual) who performs services in connectionwith the management of the activity receives compensation described insection 911(d)(2)(A) in consideration for such services; and (B) No individual performs services in connection with the management ofthe activity that exceed (by hours) the amount of such services performedby such individual. (iii) <T3>Participation less than 100 hours. </T3>If an individual participatesin an activity for 100 hours or less during the taxable year, such individualshall not be treated as materially participating in such activity for thetaxable year under paragraph (a)(7) of this section. (c) <T3>Significant participation activity </T3>_(1) <T3>In general. </T3>For purposes of paragraph (a)(4) of this section,an activity is a significant participation activity of an individual ifand only if such activity_ (i) Is a trade or business activity (within the meaning of andSection;1.469-1T(e)(2))in which the individual significantly participates for the taxable year;and (ii) Would be an activity in which the individual does not materially participatefor the taxable year if material participation for such year were determinedwithout regard to paragraph (a)(4) of this section. (2) <T3>Significant participation. </T3>An individual is treated as significantlyparticipating in an activity for a taxable year if and only if the individualparticipates in the activity for more than 100 hours during such year.(d) <T3>Personal service activity.</T3> An activity constitutes a personalservice activity for purposes of paragraph (a)(6) of this section if suchactivity involves the performance of personal services in_(A) The fields of health, law, engineering, architecture, accounting, actuarialscience, performing arts, or consulting; or(B) Any other trade or business in which capital is not a material income-producingfactor.(e) <T3>Treatment of limited partners_</T3>(1)<T3> General rule.</T3> Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph(e), an individual shall not be treated as materially participating inany activity of a limited partnership for purposes of applying section469 and the regulations thereunder to_(i) The individual's share of any income, gain, loss, deduction, or creditfrom such activity that is attributable to a limited partnership interestin the partnership; and (ii) Any gain or loss from such activity recognized upon a sale or exchangeof such an interest.(2) <T3>Exceptions.</T3> Paragraph (e)(1) of this section shall not apply toan individual's share of income, gain, loss, deduction, and credit fora taxable year from any activity in which the individual would be treatedas materially participating for the taxable year under paragraph (a)(1),(5), or (6) of this section if the individual were not a limited partnerfor such taxable year.(3) <T3>Limited partnership interest</T3>_(i)<T3> In general.</T3> Except as provided in paragraph (e)(3)(ii) of thissection, for purposes of section 469(h)(2) and this paragraph (e), a partnershipinterest shall be treated as a limited partnership interest if_(A) Such interest is designated a limited partnership interest in the limitedpartnership agreement or the certificate of limited partnership, withoutregard to whether the liability of the holder of such interest for obligationsof the partnership is limited under the applicable State law; or (B) The liability of the holder of such interest for obligations of thepartnership is limited, under the law of the State in which the partnershipis organized, to a determinable fixed amount (for example, the sum of theholder's capital contributions to the partnership and contractural obligationsto make additional capital contributions to the partnership).(ii) <T3>Limited partner holding general partner interest.</T3> A partnershipinterest of an individual shall not be treated as a limited partnershipinterest for the individual's taxable year if the individual is a generalpartner in the partnership at all times during the partnership's taxableyear ending with or within the individual's taxable year (or the portionof the partnership's taxable year during which the individual (directlyor indirectly) owns such limited partnership interest).(f) <T3>Participation_</T3>(1) <T3>In general. </T3>Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (f),any work done by an individual (without regard to the capacity in whichthe individual does such work) in connection with an activity in whichthe individual owns (directly or indirectly, other than through a C corporation)an interest at the time the work is done shall be treated for purposesof this section as participation of such individual in the activity.(2)<T3> Exceptions</T3>_(i)<T3> Certain work not customarily done by owners.</T3> Work done in connectionwith an activity shall not be treated as participation in the activityfor purposes of this section if_(A) Such work is not of a type that is customarily done by an owner ofsuch an activity; and(B) One of the principal purposes for the performance of such work is toavoid the disallowance, under section 469 and the regulations thereunder,of any loss or credit from such activity. (ii) <T3>Participation as an investor</T3>_(A) <T3>In general.</T3> Work done by an individual in the individual's capacityas an investor in an activity shall not be treated as participation inthe activity for purposes of this section unless the individual is directlyinvolved in the day-to-day management or operations of the activity. (B) <T3>Work done in individual's capacity as an investor.</T3> For purposesof this paragraph (f)(2)(ii), work done by an individual in the individual'scapacity as an investor in an activity includes_ (<T3>1</T3>) Studying and reviewing financial statements or reports on operationsof the activity; (<T3>2</T3>) Preparing or compiling summaries or analyses of the financesor operations of the activity for the individual's own use; and (<T3>3</T3>) Monitoring the finances or operations of the activity in anon-managerial capacity. (3) <T3>Participation of spouse.</T3> In the case of any person who is a marriedindividual (within the meaning of section 7703) for the taxable year, anyparticipation by such person's spouse in the activity during the taxableyear (without regard to whether the spouse owns an interest in the activityand without regard to whether the spouses file a joint return for the taxableyear) shall be treated, for purposes of applying section 469 and the regulationsthereunder to such person, as participation by such person in the activityduring the taxable year. (4) <T3>Methods of proof.</T3> The extent of an individual's participationin an activity may be established by any reasonable means. Contemporaneousdaily time reports, logs, or similar documents are not required if theextent of such participation may be established by other reasonable means.Reasonable means for purposes of this paragraph may include but are notlimited to the identification of services performed over a period of timeand the approximate number of hours spent performing such services duringsuch period, based on appointment books, calendars, or narrative summaries.(g) <T3>Material participation of trusts and estates.</T3> [Reserved] (h) <T3>Miscellaneous rules</T3>_(1) <T3>Participation of corporations.</T3> For rules relating to the participationin an activity of a personal service corporation (within the meaning ofandSection; 1.468-1T(g)(2)(i)) or a closely held corporation (within themeaning of andSection; 1.469-1T(g)(2)(ii)), see andSection; 1.469-1T(g)(3).(2) <T3>Treatment of certain retired farmers and surviving spouses of retiredor disabled farmers.</T3> An individual shall be treated as materiallyparticipating for a taxable year in any trade or business activity of farmingit paragraph (4) or (5) of section 2032A(b) would cause the requirementsof section 2032A(b)(1)(C)(ii) to be met with respect to real property usedin such activity had the individual died during such taxable year. (i) [Reserved] (j) <T3>Material participation for taxable years beginning before January 1,1987.</T3> In any case in which it is necessary to determine whether anindividual materially participated in any activity for a taxable year beginningbefore January 1, 1987 (other than a taxable year of a partnership, S corporation,estate, or trust ending after December 31, 1986), such determination shallbe made without regard to paragraphs (a) (2) through (7) of this section.(k) <T3>Examples.</T3> The following examples illustrate the application ofthis section:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1).</T3> A, a calendar year individual, owns all of the stockof X, a C corporation. X is the general partner, and A is the limited partner,in P, a calendar year partnership. P has a single activity, a restaurant,which is a trade or business activity (within the meaning of andSection;1.469-1T(e)(2)). During the taxable year, A works for an average of 30hours per week in connection with P's restaurant activity. Under paragraphs(a)(1) and (e)(2) of this section, A is treated as materially participatingin the activity for the taxable year because A participates in the restaurantactivity during such year for more than 500 hours. In addition, under andSection;1.469-1T(g)(3)(i), A's participation will cause X to be treated as materiallyparticipating in the restaurant activity. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2).</T3> The facts are the same as in example (1), exceptthat the partnership agreement provides that P's restaurant activity isto be managed by X, and A's work in the activity is performed pursuantto an employment contract between A and X. Under paragraph (f)(1) of thissection, work done by A in connection with the activity in any capacityis treated as participation in the activity by A. Accordingly, the conclusionis the same as in example (1). The conclusion would be the same if A ownedno stock in X at any time, although in that case A's participation wouldnot be taken into account in determining whether X materially participatesin the restaurant activity. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (3).</T3> B, an individual, is employed fulltime as a carpenter.B also owns an interest in a partnership which is engaged in a van conversionactivity, which is a trade or business activity (within the meaning ofandSection; 1.469-1T(e)(2)). B and C, the other partner, are the only participantsin the activity for the taxable year. The activity is conducted entirelyon Saturdays. Each Saturday throughout the taxable year, B and C work foreight hours in the activity. Although B does not participate in the activityfor more than 500 hours during the taxable year, under paragraph (a)(3)of this section, B is treated for such year as materially participatingin the activity because B participates in the activity for more than 100hours during the taxable year, and B's participation in the activity forsuch year is not less than the participation of any other person in theactivity for such year. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (4). </T3>C, an individual, is employed full-time as an accountant.C also owns interests in a restaurant and a shoe store. The restaurantand shoe store are trade or business activities (within the meaning ofandSection; 1.469-1T(e)(2)) that are treated as separate activities underthe rules to be contained in andSection; 1.469-4T. Each activity has severalfull-time employees. During the taxable year, C works in the restaurantactivity for 400 hours and in the shoe store activity for 150 hours. Underparagraph (c) of this section, both the restaurant and shoe store activitiesare significant participation activities of C for the taxable year. Accordingly,since C's aggregate participation in the restaurant and shoe store activitiesduring the taxable year exceeds 500 hours, C is treated under paragraph(a)(4) of this section as materially participating in both activities.    </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (5). </T3>In 1990, D, an individual, acquires stock in an Scorporation engaged in a trade or business activity (within the meaningof andSection; 1.469-1T(e)(2)). For every taxable year from 1990 through1994, D is treated as materially participating (without regard to paragraph(a)(5) of this section) in the activity. D retires from the activity atthe beginning of 1995, and would not be treated as materially participatingin the activity for 1995 and subsequent taxable years if material participationfor such years were determined without regard to paragraph (a)(5) of thissection. Under paragraph (a)(5) of this section, however, D is treatedas materially participating in the activity for taxable years 1995 through1999 because D materially participated in the activity (determined withoutregard to paragraph (a)(5) of this section ) for five taxable years duringthe ten taxable years that immediately precede each of those years. D isnot treated under paragraph (a)(5) of this section as materially participatingin the activity for taxable years after 1999 because of such years D hasnot materially participated in the activity (determined without regardto paragraph (a)(5) of this section) for five of the ten immediately precedingtaxable years.     </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (6). </T3>The facts are the same as in example (5), exceptthat D does not acquire any stock in the S corporation until 1994. Underparagraph (f)(1) of this section, D is not treated as participating inthe activity for any taxable year prior to 1994 because D does not ownas interest in the activity for any such taxable year. Accordingly, D materiallyparticipates in the activity for only one taxable year prior to 1995, andD is not treated under paragraph (a)(5) of this section as materially participatingin the activity for 1995 or subsequent taxable years.    </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (7). </T3>(i) E, a married individual filing a separate returnfor the taxable year, is employed full-time as an attorney. E also ownsan interest in a professional football team that is a trade or businessactivity (within the meaning of andSection; 1.469-1T(e)(2)). E does no workin connection with this activity. E anticipates that, for the taxable year,E's deductions from the activity will exceed E's gross income from theactivity and that, if E does not materially participate in the activityfor the taxable year, part or all of F's passive activity loss for thetaxable year will be disallowed under andSection; 1.469-1T(a)(1)(i). Accordingly,E pays E's spouse to work as an office for an average of 15 hours per weekduring the taxable year.    </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Under paragraph (f)(3) of this section any participation in theactivity by E's spouse is treated as participation in the activity by E.However, under paragraph (f)(2)(i) of this section, the work done by E'sspouse is not treated as participation in the activity because work asan office receptionist is not work of a type customarily done by an ownerof a football team, and one of E's principal purposes for paying E's spouseto do this work is to avoid the disallowance under andSection; 1.469-1T(a)(1)(i)of E's passive activity loss. Accordingly, E is not treated as participatingin the activity for the taxable year.    </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (8). </T3>(i) F, an individual, owns an interest in a partnershipthat feeds and sells cattle. The general partner of the partnership periodicallymails F a letter setting forth certain proposed actions and decisions withrespect to the cattle-feeding operation. Such actions and decisions include,for example, what kind of feed to purchase, how much to purchase, and whento purchase it, how often to feed cattle, and when to sell cattle. Theletters explain the proposed actions and decisions, emphasize that takingor not taking a particular action or decision is solely within the discretionof F and other partners, and ask F to indicate a decision with respectto each proposed action by answering certain questions. The general partnerreceives a fee that constitutes earned income (within the meaning of section911 (d)(2)(A)) for managing the cattle-feeding operation. F is not treatedas materially participating in the cattle-feeding operation under paragraph(a) (1) through (6) of this section.    </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) F's only participation in the cattle-feeding operation is tomake certain managerial decisions. Under paragraph (b)(2)(ii) of this section,such management services are not taken into account in determining whetherthe taxpayer is treated as materially participating in the activity fora taxable year under paragraph (a)(7) of this section, if any other personperforms services in connection with the management of the activity andreceives compensation described in section 911(d)(2)(A) for such services.Therefore, F is not treated as materially participating for the taxableyear in the cattle-feeding operation.    </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1.469-6T    </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Treatment of losses upon certain dispositions (temporary). [Reserved]   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1.469-7T    </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Treatment of self-charged items of income and expense (temporary).[Reserved]    </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1.469-8T    </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Application of section 469 and the regulations thereunder to trusts,estates, and their beneficiaries (temporary). [Reserved]    </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1.469-9T    I89Treatment of income, deductions, and creditsfrom certain rental real estate activities (temporary). [Reserved]    </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1.469-10T     </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Application of section 469 to publicly traded partnerships (temporary).[Reserved]       </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1.469-11T</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Effective date and transition rules (temporary).</ITAG>(a) <T3>Effective date_</T3>(1) <T3>In general.</T3> Except as provided in paragraph (a)(2) of this section,section 469 and the regulations thereunder apply for taxable years beginningafter December 31, 1986.(2) <T3>Application of certain income recharacterization rules_</T3>(i) <T3>In general.</T3> No amount of gross income shall be treated under andSection;1.469-2T(f)(3) through (7) as income that is not from a passive activityfor any taxable year of the taxpayer beginning before January 1, 1988.(ii) <T3>Property rented to a nonpassive activity.</T3> In applying andSection;1.469-2T(f)(6) to a taxpayer's rental of an item of property, the taxpayer'snet rental activity income (within the meaning of andSection; 1.469-2T(f)(9)(iv))from such property for any taxable year beginning after December 31, 1987,shall not include the portion of such income (if any) that is attributableto the rental of such item of property pursuant to a written binding contractentered into before February 19, 1988.(3) <T3>Qualified low-income housing projects.</T3> For a transitional ruleconcerning the application of section 469 to losses from qualified low-incomehousing projects, see section 502 of the Tax Reform Act of 1986.(4) <T3>Effect of events occurring in years prior to 1987.</T3> The treatmentfor a taxable year beginning after December 31, 1986, of any item of income,gain, loss, deduction, or credit as an item of passive activity gross income,passive activity deduction, or credit from a passive activity, shall bedetermined as if section 469 and the regulations thereunder had been ineffect for taxable years beginning before January 1, 1987, but withoutregard to any passive activity loss or passive activity credit that wouldhave been disallowed for any taxable year beginning before January 1, 1987,if section 469 and the regulations thereunder had been in effect for suchyear. For example, in determining whether a taxpayer materially participatesin an activity under andSection; 1.469-5T(a)(5) (relating to taxpayers whohave materially participated in an activity for five of the ten immediatelypreceding taxable years) for any taxable year beginning after December31, 1986, the taxpayer's participation in the activity for all prior taxableyears (including taxable years beginning before 1987) is taken into account.See andSection; 1.469-5T(j) (relating to the determination of material participationfor taxable years beginning before January 1, 1987).(5) <T3>Examples.</T3> The following examples illustrate the application ofthis paragraph (a):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1).</T3> A, a calendar year individual, is a partner in apartnership with a taxable year ending on January 31. During its taxableyear ending January 31, 1987, the partnership was engaged in a single activityinvolving the conduct of a trade or business. In applying section 469 andthe regulations thereunder to A for calendar year 1987, A's distributiveshare of partnership items for the partnership's taxable year ending January31, 1987, is taken into account. Therefore, under andSection; 1.469-2T(e)(1)and paragraph (a)(4) of this section, A's participation in the activitythroughout the partnership's taxable year beginning February 1, 1986, andending January 31, 1987, is taken into account for purposes of determiningthe character under section 469 of the items of gross income, deduction,and credit allocated to A for the partnership's taxable year ending January31, 1987.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2).</T3> B, a calendar year individual, is a beneficiary ofa trust described in section 651 that has a taxable year ending January31. The trust conducts a rental activity (within the meaning of andSection;1.469-1T(e)(3)). Because the trust's taxable year ending January 31, 1987,began before January 1, 1987, section 469 and the regulations thereunderdo not apply to the trust for such year. Section 469 and the regulationsthereunder do apply, however, to B for B's calendar year 1987. Therefore,income of the trust from the rental activity for the trust's taxable yearending January 31, 1987, that is included in B's gross income for 1987is taken into account in applying section 469 to B for 1987.</ITAG>(b) <T3>Transitional rule for pre-enactment loss and pre-enactment credit</T3>_(1)<T3>In general.</T3> For taxable years beginning after December 31, 1986,and before January 1, 1991, andSection; 1.469-1T(a)(1) shall not apply to_(i) An amount of the passive activity loss equal to the applicable percentageof the pre-enactment loss; and(ii) An amount of the passive activity credit equal to the applicable percentageof the pre-enactment credit.(2) <T3>Applicable percentage.</T3> For purposes of this paragraph (b), theapplicable percentage of the pre-enactment loss or the pre-enactment creditfor a taxable year shall be determined in accordance with the followingtable:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s25,10</C> <H1>In the case of a taxable year beginning in:</H1><H1>The applicable percentage is:</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">1987<D>65</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1988<D>40</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1989<D>20</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1990<D>10</D></ITAG></ITAG>(3) <T3>Pre-enactment loss.</T3> The pre-enactment loss for any taxable yearis the lesser of_(i) The amount of the passive activity loss that would be disallowed forthe taxable year under andSection; 1.469-1T(a)(1)(i) if this section weredisregarded; and(ii) The amount of the passive activity loss that would be disallowed forthe taxable year under andSection; 1.469-1T(a)(1)(i) if this section weredisregarded and the following items were not taken into account:(A) Any deduction treated as a deduction from an activity for the taxableyear under andSection; 1.469-1T(f)(4); and(B) Any item from an interest (other than a pre-enactment interest) inany passive activity.(4) <T3>Pre-enactment credit.</T3> The pre-enactment credit for any taxableyear is the lesser of_(i) The amount of the passive activity credit that would be disallowedfor the taxable year under andSection; 1.469-1T(a)(1)(ii) if this sectionwere disregarded; and(ii) The amount of the passive activity credit that would be disallowedfor the taxable year under andSection; 1.469-1T(a)(1)(ii) if this sectionwere disregarded and the following items were not taken into account:(A) Any deduction or credit treated as a deduction or credit from an activityfor the taxable year under andSection; 1.469-1T(f)(4); and(B) Any item from an interest (other than a pre-enactment interest) ina passive activity.(5) <T3>Examples.</T3> The following examples illustrate the application ofthis paragraph (b):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1).</T3> A, an individual, owns interest in two passive activities,X and Y. A's interest in activity X is a pre-enactment interest (withinthe meaning of paragraph (c) of this section), while A's interest in activityY is not a pre-enactment interest. For 1987 A has a $10,000 loss from activityX and $9,000 of income from activity Y. The amount determined under paragraph(b)(3)(i) of this section is $1,000. The amount determined under paragraph(b)(3)(ii) of this section is $10,000. Therefore, A's pre-enactment lossfor 1987 is $1,000. Accordingly, andSection; 1.469-1T(a)(1)(i) does not applyto $650 ($1,000 andmultiply; .65) of A's $1,000 passive activity loss for1987.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2).</T3> (i) B, an individual, owns an interest in one passiveactivity, and B's interest in the activity is a pre-enactment interest(within the meaning of paragraph (c) of this section). For 1987 and 1988,B has the following passive activity gross income and passive activitydeductions from the activity:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp0,i1,s25,10,10</C> <H1> </H1><H1>1987</H1><H1>1988</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Gross income<D>$20,000</D><D>$20,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Deductions<D>($50,000)</D><D>($40,000)</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Under andSection; 1.469-2T(b), B's passive activity loss for 1987is $30,000 ($50,000 of passive activity deductions minus $20,000 of passiveactivity gross income). Under paragraph (b)(3) of this section, B's pre-enactmentloss for 1987 is $30,000. Accordingly, under paragraphs (b) (1) and (2)of this section, andSection; 1.469-1T(a)(1)(i) does not apply to $19,500($30,000 andmultiply; .65) of B's $30,000 passive activity loss for 1987.Under andSection; 1.469-1T(a)(1)(i), $10,500 of B's loss for 1987 ($30,000andmultiply; .35) is disallowed. Under andSection; 1.469-1T(f) (2) and (4),the disallowed loss is allocated among deductions from the activity, andthe disallowed deductions are treated as deductions from the activity for1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) For 1988, B's pre-enactment loss is computed as shown in thefollowing table:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp0,i1,s25,10,10</C> <H1> </H1><H1>(b)(3)(i)</H1><H1>(b)(3)(ii)</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Gross income<D>$20,000</D><D>$20,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Current deductions<D>(40,000)</D><D>(40,000)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 1.469-1T(f)(4)<D>(10,500)</D><D>-0-</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Net loss</ITAG><D>($30,500)</D><D>($20,000)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Therefore, B's pre-enactment loss for 1988 is $20,000.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Under paragraph (b)(2) of this section, the applicable percentagefor 1988 is 40 percent. Therefore, under paragraph (b)(1) of this sectionandSection; 1.469-1T(a)(1)(i) does not apply to $8,000 ($20,000 andmultiply;.40) of B's $30,500 passive activity loss for 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (3).</T3> (i) C, an individual, owns interests in three passiveactivities, R, S, and T. C's interest in each activity is a pre-enactmentinterest. For 1987 and 1988, C's gross income, deductions, and net income(loss) from each of the three activities are as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>4,L2,tp0,i1,s25,8,8,8</C> <H1> </H1><H1>R</H1><H1>S</H1><H1>T</H1>1987:<ITAG tagnum="2">Gross income<D>$8,000</D><D>$5,000</D><D>$2,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Deductions<D>(9,000)</D><D>(7,000)</D><D>(1,400)</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Net income (loss)</ITAG><D>($1,000)</D><D>($2,000)</D><D>$600</D><R>n,dandCx.3;</R>1988:<ITAG tagnum="2">Gross income<D>$7,000</D><D>$6,000</D><D>$2,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Deductions<D>(8,000)</D><D>(4,500)</D><D>(3,000)</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Net income (loss)</ITAG><D>($1,000)</D><D>$1,500</D><D>($1,000)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Under andSection; 1.469-2T(b), C's passive activity loss for 1987is $2,400 ($17,400 of passive activity deductions less $15,000 of passiveactivity gross income). Under paragraph (b)(3) of this section, C's pre-enactmentloss for 1987 is $2,400. Accordingly, under paragraph (b)(1) and (2) ofthis section, andSection; 1.469-1T (a)(1)(i) does not apply to $1,560 ($2,400andmultiply; .65) of C's passive activity loss for 1987. Under andSection;1.469-1T (a)(1)(i), $840 of C's passive activity loss for 1987 ($2,400x .35) is disallowed.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Under andSection; 1.469-1T (f)(2)(i), since a portion of C's passiveactivity loss for 1987 is disallowed, a ratable portion of the loss fromeach of C's activities that has a loss for 1987 (activity R and activityS) is disallowed for 1987. Accordingly, $280 of the 1987 loss from activityR ($840 andmultiply; $1,000/$3,000) and $560 of the 1987 loss from activityS ($840 andmultiply; $2,000/$3,000) is disallowed for 1987. Under andSection;1.469-1T (f)(2) and (4), corresponding portions of the deductions fromeach activity are disallowed for 1987 and treated as deductions from activitiesR and S, respectively, for 1988. The deductions that are disallowed for1987 and treated as deductions for 1988 are taken into account under paragraph(b)(3)(i) but not paragraph (b)(3)(ii) of this section. Thus, the amountsdetermined under paragraphs (b)(3)(i) and (b)(3)(ii) of this section for1988 are as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp0,i1,s25,10,10  </C> <H1>Activity</H1><H1>(b)(3)(i)</H1><H1>(b)(3)(ii)</H1>  <ITAG tagnum="1">R<D>($1,280)</D><D>($1,000)  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">S<D>940</D><D>1,500  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">T<D>(1,000)</D><D>(1,000)  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total<D>($1,340)</D><D>($500)</D></ITAG></ITAG>  <ITAG tagnum="21">Therefore, C's pre-enactment loss for 1988 is $500.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Under paragraph (b)(2) of this section, the applicable percentagefor 1988 is 40 percent. Therefore, under paragraph (b)(1) of this section,andSection; 1.469-1T (a)(1)(i) does not apply to $200 ($500 andmultiply; .40)of C's $1,340 passive activity loss for 1988.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (4). </T3>(i) D, an individual, has interests in there passiveactivities, X, Y, and Z. Activities X and Y are rental real estate activities(within the meaning of section 469(i) and the rules to be contained inandSection; 1.469-9T) in which D actively participates (within the meaningof section 469(i) and the rules to be contained in andSection; 1.469-9T)for the taxable year. D's interest in activity X is a pre-enactment interest,and D's interest in activity Y is not a pre-enactment interest. ActivityZ is not a rental real estate activity, and D's interest in activity Zis not a pre-enactment interest. The amount of income (loss) from eachactivity for the taxable year is as follows:  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s25,10  </C> <H1>Activity</H1><H1>Income (loss)</H1>  <ITAG tagnum="1">X (pre-enactment rental)<D>($40,000)  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Y (other rental)<D>$30,000  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Z (other non-rental)<D>($20,000)</D></ITAG></ITAG>  <ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) The amount determined under paragraph (b)(3)(ii) of this sectionis computed by applying section 469 to D as if D's only interests in passiveactivities were D's pre-enactment interests in such activities. If D'sonly interests in passive activities were D's pre-enactment interests insuch activities, the amount to which andSection; 1.469-1T (a)(1)(i) wouldnot apply, by reason of section 469(i) and the rules to be contained inandSection; 1.469-9T, would be $25,000. Taking into account all of D's interestsin passive activities, the amount to which andSection; 1.469-1T (a)(1)(i)would not apply, by reason of section 469(i) and the rules to be containedin andSection; 1.469-9T, is $10,000. Accordingly, the amounts determinedunder paragraph (b)(3)(i) and (b)(3)(ii) of this section for the taxableyear are as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp0,i1,s25,10,10  </C><H1>Activity</H1><H1>(b)(3)(i)</H1><H1>(b)(3)(ii)</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">X<D>($40,000)</D><D>($40,000)  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Y<D>$30,000</D><D>   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Z<D>($20,000)</D><D> </D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Subtotal<D>($30,000)</D><D>($40,000)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">andSection; 469(i) allowance<D>$10,000</D><D>$25,000</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total<D>($20,000)</D><D>($15,000)</D></ITAG></ITAG>  <ITAG tagnum="21">Therefore, D's pre-enactment loss for the taxable year is $15,000. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (5). </T3>E, an individual, has for the taxable year the followingitems of income, deduction, and credit from passive activities:  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>4,L2,tp0,i1,s25,6,6,6 </C><H1> </H1><H1>Pre-enactment interests</H1><H1>Other interests</H1><H1>Total</H1>  <ITAG tagnum="1">Income (deductions)<D>$100</D><D>($1,00)</D><D>-0-  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Credits<D>28</D><D>28</D><D>$56</D></ITAG></ITAG>   <ITAG tagnum="21">For the taxable year, E is subject to tax at a marginal rate of 28percent. Under andSection; 1.469-3T (d), E's regular tax liability allocableto passive activities for the taxable year is zero. If, however, the onlyinterests in passive activities taken into account were the pre-enactmentinterests (i.e., if the $100 loss were disregarded), E's regular tax liabilityallocable to passive activities for the taxable year would be $28. Thus,the amounts determined under paragraphs (b)(4)(i) and (b)(4)(ii) of thissection are as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s25,12  </C> <H1>(b)(4)(i)</H1><H1>(b)(4)(ii)</H1>  <ITAG tagnum="1">$56<D>-0-</D></ITAG></ITAG>  <ITAG tagnum="21">Therefore, E's pre-enactment credit for the taxable year is zero,and andSection; 1.469-1T (a)(1)(ii) applies to E's $56 passive activity creditfor the taxable year. </ITAG>(c) <T3>Definition of pre-enactment interest_</T3>(1)  <T3>Geneal rule. </T3>Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (c),the term ``pre-enactment interest'' means a qualified interest in a pre-enactmentactivity.  (2) <T3>Qualified interest_</T3>(i) <T3>In general. </T3>For purposes of this paragraph (c), a qualified interestin an activity is any interest in an activity that was_  (A) Held by the taxpayer on October 22, 1986, and at all times thereafter(but only if the activity existed on October 22, 1986); or(B) Acquired by the taxpayer after October 22, 1986, directly or indirectly,pursuant to one or more written binding contracts to which the taxpayerwas a party on October 22, 1986, and held by the taxpayer at all timesafter such acquisistion.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">See paragraph (c)(7) of this section for rules for determining whethera taxpayer was a party on October 22, 1986, to a written binding contract.(ii) <T3>Stock in a C corporation.</T3> For purposes of this paragraph (c)(2),stock in a C corporation is not treated as an interest in any activityof the corporation. The following example illustrates the application ofthis paragraph (c)(2)(ii):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example.</T3> On October 22, 1986, the taxpayer owned all of the stockof a C corporation that conducted a single activity. On December 31, 1986,the corporation liquidated and distributed to the taxpayer the assets usedin the activity. Under this paragraph (c)(2)(ii), the taxpayer does nothave a qualified interest in the corporation's activity as a result ofthe liquidation. The result would be the same if, on December 31, 1986,instead of liquidating, the corporation elected under section 1362<T3>(a) to be an S corporation.</T3></ITAG>(3) <T3>Pre-enactment activity</T3>_(i) <T3>In general.</T3> For purposes of this paragraph (c), an activity isa pre-enactment activity if_(A) The activity was being conducted by any person on October 22, 1986;or (B) At least 50 percent (by value) of the property used in the activityduring the taxable year was_(<T3>1</T3>) In existence or under construction on August 16, 1986; or (<T3>2</T3>) Acquired or constructed by any person pursuant to a writtenbinding contract (without regard to whether the taxpayer or any personrelated to the taxpayer was a party to such contract) in effect on August16, 1986.(ii)<T3> Character before 1987 irrelevant.</T3> For purposes of this paragraph(c), an activity may be treated as a pre-enactment activity without regardto whether such activity would have been a passive activity of the taxpayerfor any taxable year beginning before January 1, 1987, had section 469and the regulations thereunder been in effect for such year.(4) <T3>Examples.</T3> The following examples illustrate the application ofparagraphs (c) (1), (2), and (3) of this section:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1).</T3> On October 22, 1986, the taxpayer owned an interestin property used as a personal residence. After October 22, 1986, the taxpayerceased to use the property as a personal residence and began to use itin a rental activity. The rental activity is a pre-enactment activity (withinthe meaning of paragraph (c)(3) of this section) because the property usedin the rental activity was in existence on August 16, 1986. The taxpayerdid not hold any interest in the rental activity on October 22, 1986, however,because the activity did not exist on that date. In addition, the taxpayerdid not acquire an interest in the activity after October 22, 1986, pursuantto a written binding contract to which the taxpayer was a party on suchdate. Accordingly, the taxpayer's interest in the rental activity is nota qualified interest (within the meaning of paragraph (c)(2) of this section),and the taxpayer does not have a pre-enactment interest in the rental activity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2).</T3> The taxpayer owns an interest in a partnership, whichowns property used in a rental activity. The taxpayer acquired the partnershipinterest pursuant to a written binding contract to which the taxpayer wasa party on October 22, 1986. The partnership acquired its interest in therental property pursuant to written binding contracts to which the partnershipwas a party on October 22, 1986. Construction of the property used in therental activity commenced prior to August 16, 1986. Under paragraph (c)(7)(ii)of this section, the taxpayer is treated as a party to the contracts towhich the partnership was a party on October 22, 1986. Therefore, the taxpayer'sinterest in the partnership's rental activity is a qualified interest (withinthe meaning of paragraph (c)(2) of this section) because the taxpayer istreated as acquiring an interest in the partnership's rental activity pursuantto written binding contracts to which the taxpayer was party on October22, 1986. Since the property used in the rental activity was under constructionon August 16, 1986, the partnership's rental activity is a pre-enactmentactivity (within the meaning of paragraph (c)(3) of this section). Accordingly,the taxpayer's interest in the partnership's rental activity is a pre-enactmentinterest.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (3)</T3>. The facts are the same as in example (2), exceptthat the partnership acquired the property after October 22, 1986, pursuantto a contract entered into after October 22, 1986. The taxpayer's interestin the partnership's rental activity is not a pre-enactment interest becausesuch interest was not acquired pursuant to written binding contracts towhich the taxpayer was a party on October 22, 1986.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (4).</T3> The taxpayer owned a pre-enactment interest in anactivity on October 22, 1986. After that date, the taxpayer died, and thedecedent's interest in the activity passed to the decendent's estate. Sincea decedent and the decedent's estate are not the same taxpayer, the estatemust independently satisfy the requirements for a pre-enactment interestregardless of the fact that the decendent had a pre-enactment interestin the activity. Since the activity was being conducted by the decedenton October 22, 1986, the activity is a pre-enactment activity (within themeaning of paragraph (c)(3) of this section). Since, however, the estatedid not hold any interest in the activity on October 22, 1986, the estatedoes not have a qualified interest in the activity (within the meaningof paragraph (c)(2) of this section). Accordingly, the estate does nothave a pre-enactment interest in the activity.</ITAG>(5)<T3> Effect of changes in a taxpayer's interest in a pre-enactment activity_</T3>(i)<T3> In general.</T3> If the taxpayer's share for a taxable year of anitem of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit from a pre-enactment activitywas increased or decreased at any time after October 22, 1986, and priorto the end of such taxable year (other than pursuant to a written bindingcontract to which the taxpayer was a party on October 22, 1986), the shareof such item that is attributable to the taxpayer's pre-enactment interestin such activity shall be determined by taking into account_(A) The taxpayer's share for such taxable year of such item as of October22, 1986; reduced by (B) The greatest amount at any time subsequent to October 22, 1986, bywhich the sum of all the decreases in the taxpayer's share for such yearof such item (other than decreases pursuant to a written binding contractto which the taxpayer was a party on October 22, 1986) exceeds the sumof all the increases in the taxpayer's share for such year of such item(other than increases pursuant to a written binding contract to which thetaxpayer was a party on October 22, 1986).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">For purposes of this paragraph (c)(5)(i), the taxpayer's share ofan item as of October 22, 1986, is determined by taking into account anywritten binding contract to which the taxpayer was a party on October 22,1986.(ii) <T3>Partnership terminations under section 708(b)(1)(B). </T3>A taxpayer'sshare for a taxable year of an item of income, gain, loss, deduction, orcredit from a pre-enactment activity conducted by a partnership shall notbe treated as having increased or decreased at any time after October 22,1986, solely because the partnership is treated as terminating at any timeafter such date under section 708(b)(1)(B).(iii) <T3>Examples. </T3>The following examples illustrate the application ofthis paragraph (c)(5):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1). </T3>On October 22, 1986, an individual owned a 10 percentinterest in a pre-enactment activity. After October 22, 1986, the taxpayeracquires an additional five percent interest in the activity pursuant toa contract entered into after October 22, 1986. Under this paragraph (c)(5),only the 10 percent interest in the activity the taxpayer owned on October22, 1986, is a pre-enactment interest.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2). </T3>On October 22, 1986, individuals A and B each owneda rental activity. After October 22, 1986, A and B contribute their rentalactivities to a partnership in exchange for which each receives a 50 percentinterest in all items of income, gain, loss, deduction, and credit of thepartnership. Under paragraph (c)(5)(i) of this section, A's 50 percentinterest in each partnership item attributable to the rental activity contributedby A is attributable to a pre-enactment interest. None of A's interestin the partnership items attributable to the rental activity contributedby B is attributable to a pre-enactment interest.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (3). </T3>The facts are the same as in example (2), exceptthat under the partnership agreement the items of income, gain, loss, deduction,and credit attributable to the rental activity A contributed to the partnershipare allocated 80 percent to A and 20 percent to B. Under paragraph (c)(5)(i)of this section, A's 80 percent interest in each partnership item attributableto the rental activity contributed by A is attributable to a pre-enactmentinterest.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (4). </T3>The facts are the same as in example (3) except thaton January 1, 1988, the partnership liquidates, distributing to A the rentalactivity contributed by A to the partnership. Under paragraph (c)(5)(i)of this section, only 80 percent of A's interest in the rental activitydistributed to A is a pre-enactment interest.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (5). </T3>On October 22, 1986, an individual is the generalpartner in a limited partnership. Under the partnership agreement in effecton that date, the taxpayer is allocated one percent of each item of partnershipincome, gain, loss, deduction, and credit for 1987 and 10 percent of eachsuch item for 1988. Since the increase was provided for in a written bindingcontract to which the taxpayer was a party on October 22, 1986, the increasein the taxpayer's share of each item of partnership income, gain, loss,deduction, and credit is taken into account, under paragraph (c)(5)(i)of this section, as income, gain, loss, deduction, and credit from a pre-enactmentinterest.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (6). </T3>The facts are the same as in example (5) except thatthe partnership agreement is amended on November 30, 1986. The amendmentdecreases the taxpayer's share of partnership depreciation for 1987 from10 percent to five percent, but does not affect the partner's share ofpartnership depreciation for any other year. Since the taxpayer's shareof partnership depreciation for 1988 is not decreased by the amendment,the result, for 1988, is the same as in example (5). For 1987, however,only five percent of the partnership depreciation is attributable to thetaxpayer's pre-enactment interest even if, after November 30, 1986, anotheramendment to the partnership agreement restores the taxpayer's 10 percentshare of partnership depreciation for 1987.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (7). </T3>(i) A and B, calendar year individuals, own all thestock of X, a calendar year S corporation. On October 22, 1986, A and Beach own 50 shares of X stock. On July 1, 1987, X issues an additional100 shares of stock to B (but does not issue any additional stock to A).On December 1, 1987, A purchases 70 shares of X stock from B. Thus, A andB have the following shares of items of income, gain, loss, deduction,and credit from activities of X:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp0,i1,s25,6,6</C> <H1>Period</H1><H1>A's share</H1><H1>B's share</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">10/22/86-6/30/87<D>50%</D><D>50%</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">7/1/87-11/30/87<D>25%</D><D>75%</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">12/1/87-<D>60%</D><D>40%</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Under paragraph (c)(5)(i) of this section, A and B each havea 50 percent share of each item of X as of October 22, 1986. Since thereare no increases or decreases in their shares before June 30, 1987, their50 percent shares of items of X assigned to the period from January 1,1987, through June 30, 1987, are attributable to their pre-enactment interests.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) As a result of the decrease in A's share on June 30, 1987, onlya 25 percent share of the items of X assigned to the period from July 1,1987, through November 30, 1987, is attributable to A's pre-enactment interest.In addition, notwithstanding the increase in B's share, only a 50 percentshare of such items (B's share as of October 22, 1986) is attributableto B's pre-enactment interest.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) As a result of the decrease in B's share on November 30, 1987,only a 40 percent share of the items of X assigned to the period from December1, 1987, through December 31, 1987, is attributable to B's pre-enactmentinterest. In addition, notwithstanding the increase in A's share, onlya 25 percent share of such items (A's share as of October 22, 1986, reducedby the amount of the decrease in A's share on June 30, 1987) is attributableto A's pre-enactment interest.</ITAG>(6) <T3>Special rule for beneficiaries of trusts or estates</T3>_(i) <T3>In general. </T3>If a beneficial interest in a trust or estate washeld by a taxpayer on October 22, 1986, and at all times thereafter, anyincome, directly allocable deductions, and credits taken into account bythe taxpayer with respect to such interest shall be treated as income,deductions, and credits, respectively, from a pre-enactment interest ofthe beneficiary if and only if such income, deductions, and credits arefrom a pre-enactment interest of the trust or estate. For purposes of thepreceding sentence, ``directly allocable deductions'' means_(A) Depreciation allowable to the beneficiary under section 167(h); (B) Depletion allowable to the beneficiary under section 611(b)(3); and(C) Amortization apportioned to the beneficiary under section 642(f).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">The following example illustrates the application of this paragraph(c)(6)(i):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example</T3>. The taxpayer is a beneficiary of a trust that conductsa rental activity. The trust's interest in the activity is a pre-enactmentinterest of the trust. On October 22, 1986, under the trust agreement thetrustee had discretion to allocate any amount of the depreciation deductionsfrom the rental activity to the beneficiary. Under this paragraph (c)(6)(i),any depreciation deductions from the rental activity that are allocatedto the beneficiary will be treated as deductions attributable to a pre-enactmentinterest of the beneficiary.</ITAG>(ii) <T3>Interests distributed to beneficiaries</T3>. A beneficiary of a trustor estate to whom the trust or estate distributes an interest in an activityshall be treated as having a pre-enactment interest in the activity byreason of such distribution if and only if such interest was a pre-enactmentinterest of the trust or estate, and the beneficiary held a beneficialinterest in the trust or estate on October 22, 1986, and at all times thereafter.(7) <T3>Written binding contract</T3>_(i) <T3>In general</T3>. A contract shall be treated as a written binding contractof a person for purposes of this section if and only if the contract isenforceable against such person under the applicable State law and doesnot limit damages to a specified amount (e.g., by use of a liquidated damagesprovision). For purposes of the preceding sentence, a contractual provisionthat limits damages to an amount equal to five percent or more of the totalcontract price is not treated as limiting damages. In general, a contractis binding upon a person even if it is subject to a condition, as longas the condition is not within the control of such person. A contract isnot binding on any date with respect to a person if the contract becameenforceable against such person only by reason of an assignment occurringafter such date. The following example illustrates the application of thisparagraph (c)(7)(i):<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example</T3>. As of October 22, 1986, the taxpayer had signed a subscriptionagreement to acquire an interest in a partnership. The taxpayer's obligationto purchase an interest in the partnership was contingent on other personssigning subscription agreements by a particular date after October 22,1986, to acquire a minimum number of the total interests offered for sale.If the taxpayer acquires an interest in the partnership, such interestwill be treated as acquired pursuant to a written binding contract to whichthe taxpayer was a party on October 22, 1986. Although the taxpayer's obligationto acquire an interest in the partnership was subject to a contingency,the contingency was not within the taxpayer's control.</ITAG>(ii) <T3>Special rule for contract of partnership or S corporation</T3>. Forpurposes of this section, a person shall be treated as a party to a contracton October 22, 1986, if on such date such person is a partner in a partnershipor a shareholder in an S corporation (or is bound by a written contractto acquire an interest in such partnership or stock in such corporation)which itself is a party to such contract (or is treated under this paragraph(c)(7)(ii) as a party to such contract) on such date. (iii) <T3>Application of rule to partnership agreements</T3>. A provision ofa partnership agreement shall be treated as a binding contract with respectto a partner if the requirements of this paragraph (c)(7) are otherwisesatisfied and such partner does not have the power to amend any provisionof the partnership agreement without the consent of other partners. There is need for immediate guidance with respect to the provisions containedin this Treasury decision. For this reason, it is found impractical toissue this Treasury decision with notice and public procedure under subsection(b) of section 553 of Title 5 of the United States Code or subject to theeffective date limitation of subsection (d) of that section. <ITAG tagnum="6">Lawrence B. Gibbs, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Commissioner of Internal Revenue. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Approved: February 12, 1988. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">O. Donaldson Chapoton, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Assistant Secretary of the Treasury. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-3791 Filed 2-19-88; 4:19 pm] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4830-01-M </ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>